      "identifier" : [
         "8_06912_172"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Western home monthly. : Vol. XV. No. 4. (April, 1914)"
      ],
      "type" : "document"
   },
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06912_172/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06912_182/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "source" : [
         "Scanned from a microfilm held by Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "label" : "Vol. XVI. No. 2. (February, 1915)",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06912_182",
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06912_182",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06912",
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Winnipeg, Canada : Home Publishing Co., [1915]"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "FEBRUARY, 191 WINNIPEG. CANADA t -.",
         "w - AN ANNOUNCEMENT Dy mflu oprietors 01 BLUE RIBBON TEA If we could improve \"BLUE RIBBON TEe' we would do s.. But we canneot is aperfect tea. So we bave improved the only thing improvable-the PACKET. in future, \"1BLUE RIBBON TEX' -will be packed in the new, double- mategiai. azr-tight parcliment and cartricige paper wrappers-the \"l1ast wor' in tea packing. On te eformous sale of!44BL.UE RIBBON» permits titis improvernu No mdrate turn-over could warrant the large outlay for the special rnacbinery requ Henceforward 114E BEST 'TEA on the omarket wifl corne t you in THE BEST PACKET. Same price as belore - same u equalied same guarantee-but a fitty-per cent. befter wrapper. rPA TMORE'S RELIA BL E SEEDS, TREES, SHRUB3S A ND PL AN Ts1 The Day o? the Producer is here and now in the farrner's and gardener's Opportumity to increase hie crop and imiprove hie farim and home grounds. By s0 doing he will mn-rease bis present prosperity and ineure the increaaed value of bis holdings. A GARDEN IN ÀA VEBTEEN TOWN Seo how Our Hardy Tre.. and Ibrubs W Uchaffe 1h. loofet h.bareprairie W. are Speclal Agents for Messrs. Sudien \u0026 Sons, Reading, En gland. We 1131 la eut cata- logue the hardiest vdrieiies of Iheir World Famed Seeds ln seaked packeis ai 10c. pet packel. COLLECTION No. 1 containa 22 varieties of our Reliable Vegetable Seeds in packeta and orna. 2% Ibo. of aeed\u0026,for $1.25 prepaid. ÇOLLECTION No 2.-12 packeta of Reiable %hwer Seeda for 25c prepaid. FAEMERS' COLLECTION No. 8 containa 11lh. Mangel, lib.Sugar Beet, llb.Swede, iIb.Carrot,341b. Kale and 4 Iba. Rape-8 lbe.. eed for 32.50 prepaid. Write To-Day for OUR 1915 CATALOGUE in which we lut ail the hardieat and beet varieucas of Vegetable and Flower Seeds, Frita, Treee and Bliruba, Gi arnes and Fodders. 6000 Bushela of Choioe Seed Potatoee-aIl the buet vaieties. We have growing ln our Nursery and offer ror sale: 255,000 Native Maple, 1 Io 3 ri. blgb. 6,000 Ontarioo Maple, 2 to 6 ri. hlgb. 12,000 Native Ash, 1 to 8 rt. blsh. 150,000 Russian and other Popar lna a sizes. 115,000 Russian Golden WtIlow ln all aises. 70,000 Risslan Laurel ln ail sizes. 5.000 Crab Apple and Plîîm Trees; And a large stock or ail bardy fruits, orna- mental ýhriihq. plants. etc. Trou from 36.00 Per 11W up accrding t10ise. The Patmore Nursery Co u Grow Vegetables for home use and for sale, they pay. Grow Seede, Roots and Fodders -t4hey yield abundantly. Grow Hardy Fruits -yâou family neede them in summer Grow Trees ail over your farm they will inaure your crope in ah seieons againet drought and hot windu. WB SUPPLY EVEEYTMNlT TO MAIE A GOOD GARDEN For $10 ousà viti orderve viii siid Pr.pald 10 any addiea- 50 Currant and Goosaberry Buabea of beSt varieties, 100 Raspberry Plants, best valettles, 12 PIum and Fruit Trees, oung Mmd tbrlfty, 2 to 3 ft. blgh, p 12 Rhubarb Moots. OUI 01 the above for $10.»0 BRANPDON', Man. SA SKA TOON, \u0026*ask. se blend -",
         "Wmnlipeg, Feb., 11 The Western Home Muon thly WJHAT is LUX? It is a bs= of unuaual, purfty made, into the thinnest of flakes that readily dissolve in bot water. It makes a creaxny, foamy lather that cannot injure the daintiest fabrie or the hands. LUX la a wonderful life len1thiener of ail woollen anaflanlgerments. It absolutely preventa them from matting, thickening or shrinking mn thewah Will you lot unu od you a Mopia, froe? Addrea LUX Dept. * Lever Brothers Limited, Toronto. M 'g lOc MAD E M I ANADAU You can taste the delicious oriental fruits and spices which are blended with Pure Malt Vinegar by ~ a secret lm process. When writing advertisers please mention Tile Western Home Monthly. IThe Western -Home f Moniblyt VOI* XVI. 8 tli* Home Published Monthi aàa.N.3 Vol. xvi. y the HomePnbllshlng Co., Ltd,, Winnpeg, a\u0026N.. V The Subscription Price 6f The Western Home Monthly is 10 ero three years for $2.00 to any address in Canada, or British Isles. . The subscription to foreign countries is $1.50 a year, and wihin the City of Winnipeg limits and ~ in the United States $1.25 a year. Remittances of small sums may be made with safety in ordinary letters. Sums of one dollar or more it would be well to send by registered letter or Money Pre~ostage Stamps will be received the same as cash for the fractional parts of a dollar, and in any amount when it is impossible for patrons to procure buis. Change of Addres.-Subscribers wishing their address changed must State their former as well as new address. AIl communications relative to change of address must be received by us flot later than the 20th of the precedinr month. When You Renew be sure to sign your name exactly the sarne as it appears onth label of your paper. If this is not done it leads to confusion. If you have reetychanged your address and the paper bas been forwarded to you, be sure o e s know the address on your label. A Chat with Our Readers Our short talka with our read\"rsini the asat tbree numbers apparentlyr attraeted the attention of many and we are encouragedl to onýùnue t dis cuss th6 merits of the Monthly in this manner, in the hope that every reader wil asist in widening ita sphere.1 When we wished our readers a prosperous and happy 1914 in our 3anuary number, we men ohn oe thanacau ih that the year just entered h u d bm g our sube ri be s ay g oodt hi g , we m t that T he W estern H om e M ny wod d it b e to c nrb t o t er pe s r and we il-being. In the past y %have found mucýh to ejoy ithin the coeso the magazine, you have in rcent isefu nd wei ifomefear 1 e -oraldeýaling imipartialywt atr eader f the M 1tl myhave nligtene n o-patsnveso h usin paere alhyad aciatn0 o0hvefunysmn y P tsel dprmns eln with nvr hs o elfe h eu;s shion pagatitcand rei ae a genraiy eaingMyou he rgarded tnhe ontl as yur go red h o alw ay help inst uct ud en ertai you Youhae benthuiatM bun yT teM hly a ontus o ha ere devolin~ n lthoe wappecae hed Mdonaisn son etheuston subt ae ros m erly, butto bsed atthefredashe m the hape fuis itattn Mntraly sbring withatve monedthe vistya orgo rin h ol Indys eed itr couad be noter rmebanetoanred hn ea'usb apcrition o ThWsn hoe Monthly.etrd11 ihamotsnun prt ore coming ary oear wii om ne sdmaarer scle toudgi e tdr teli b oneft of eert k oledg iats eat e nts. The op nyt e nidatthe M on wuii ier mee ailtatoses that theirhome n daeine-the a en the de wcii n onde absr n itopesn. Tediymi fteWsenHm o in its aize surprise even its most ardent supporters, and at tis season it is teeming witb kind words of approval and generous good wishes, for ail of which we are very grateful. As we have already stated, the year 1914 was a good one for us, the beast i our bistory. It saw the sphere of the M onthly greatly extended and for this our thanks are due our subscribers. The thousands of new ones added have taken up the cause of the Monthly with truc Western zeal and enthusiasm. The Monthly is a purely Wçstern product, and its aimi is to be helpful and interesting to every Western home. As the resuit of a recent appeal to our readers in which we requested them to let us know what features in our magazine they liked and which, if any, were not pal- atable, we believe that within the next two or three months our subseribers wil readily concede the palm of magazine par excelence to The Western Home Monthly. Since our readers have in such large numbers made known their likes and dislikes a steady weeding-out process bas been going on, and those features which in deference to public request are now discontinued, have been replaced by others especially asked for. We want to draw particular attention to t he fact that we are here to publish a magazine destined to be of the greatest possible help and courtesy to our readers and we are always grateful for advice and suggestions for future development. It is no unusual thing for us to receive by a single mail, twenty or thirty letters, expressive of the gratification of our subscribers. We appreciate these kind missives and we are especiaily weil pleased with the knowledge that our readers reaily have the interests of The Western Home Monthly at heart. We are going to further encroach on the good nature of every reader and solicit his or bier help to further add to our circulation. As you are probably aware your favorite periodical enters an enormous number of Western homes every month. Having regard to Western conditions, this is bighly gratifying but we are not satisfied. Like Oliver Twist \"we want more,\" and we believe you are the only person that can be of any material assistance to us in achieving this object. Suppose for instance that one of our present readers succeeded in getting us only one new subscribr-surcly a very simple thing-our circulation would double-in other words our figures would jump to considerably over 90,000. Suppose you try this. The rnajority of our readers live in well settled districts and we believe that many of their fricnds and ncighbors would gladly subscribe to The Western 1 omie Monthly if they saw acopy so that we are not asking you to do any canvassîng for ii-simply to show the magazine to yoîîr acquaintances. Again, you may have some friends in a distant part of the cotintry who might be interested in our publication. Just send us their marnes and addres es and we will scn(l them asample ropy. Wc knowthatThe Western Home Mont hly has only to he seen to be appreeiatced and the sending of a sample copy usually means a year's subscription by refurn mai]. With every littie effort, we should have a rirculation of 100,000 in a short time. Let us determine thati this become an accomplished fact. By our latest imethod we guarantee that we can perform any kind of dental work without the least pain, or Retund Tour' New Method Dental Parlors Corner Portage and Donald WINNIIPZG Oanada's .Be\u0026t and Most Up-to-date Dental Office. Il Es Ih\u0026TaalieF oeo COCOA That M\"k ii D«edvefy Popula An absolutely pure, dcli- cious and wholesome food beverage, produced by a scientific blending of high-grade cocoa beans subjected to a perféct me- cbaIhical proceas of manu- facture. Mdeln Canada 5 walterBacr\u0026Oo.imitcd Establiahed 1780 Mostmda, Cm .Dwdchato, Mass. I '' -",
         "The Western Home Mdonthly Wlaaipeg, Freb., 1915 Fedon Vim Reumember- the Wealth of Vitality That Lies in Quaker Oats Oats are for animais needing spirit and strength-for horst%, not for placid cows This is Nature's vim-food. Here she.concentrates the very essence of energy. That is 7vhy Quaker Qats is s-o essential to children. To countiess grown-ups, too. It means activity, vivacity, power for work or play. It should be Quaker Qats because these are the choicest grains. We pick just the rich, plunip, best-fed oats for Quaker. TÉheir flavor and aroma make the dish inviting. Their fullness gives the utmost vim-producing -power. Find out how quickly two big dishes daily can make Ianguid people bubble with vitality. Quaker QOats The Lusclous Form of Vim-Food Ten pounds per bushel is il we get frein the ehoicest oas that grow. That is becs-use ail the puiny, starved grains are discarded. You get ini these flakes just tilie cream of the grain, richi in 1recious Plemients. And you get hiere a flavor, enlianced bY' on r process, wliicl iakes the disli extra- (ei t iis1. Qîmal~e (la fso 50ila u amd exquisite fint it t lovera, froni ail the world over, send to us to get Large Package 30c Contain.s-a pleco of Impoz ted china froin a ceiebrated lIqUsh pott.ry. ReguIer Package loc Thcze prices do flot appy la Par West. it. In the homes of a iîundred nations it is the premier morning dish. Here it is liandy to ytiu. Every groeer bas it. A simple eaul for Quaker Osts brings it to you aiways, andst an\u003e extra price. We urge that it pays, in a food like tlîis, te serve the inost likabie foi-ni. You vant it esten ini aiiudaiie-want it eateui often. Tue 'vax to insure that is to -,erve it ini this tenIpting forni. Onîe serving xiill con- ýIlIce vou. Hou seh old Suggestion s ASimpl e Relreshment Menu A bail of cream of chieken salad served with nut sandwiches, and a glass of lemon. squash, inke a delightful tes- or supper dish. Olives andd alted peanuts ms-y be passed. To make. the cresm of chieken salad, cbop the chieken very fine., Add to cadi haif plut one-haîf pint of cream sauce snd two tablespoonfuls of geistine thoît has been soaked in four tablespoonfuls of oold water for an hour. Mix the in- gredients together hot, season niceiy, and turu into a shallow pan te cool. When cold forin into bâIls the aize of English walnuts. Putbthree of these balla oni a neet of lettuce leaves, put one tespoonful of mayonnaise lu the middle and they are ready te serve. Use slightJy toaated unsalted almondo, for sandwiches. Afteý they have been chopped fine sprinkie them thickly be- tween thin \u0026lices of bread and butter, press together, and eut in s-ny fancy shapes desired. The Ieoin squash ms-y be ms-de the day before. Grate the yeilow rind of three leinonà and *add two pounds 'of sugar te one quart of water; boil for -ffve minutes, ;nd. etrain.- Add tbe juice of jtweive lemons, and atrain again. At serving time dilute tliia with Apollinaris water, makiug the lemon squash suffi- cienitly cool te bc paistable. Drlod Fruits ln genersl the followiug broad mIles may bie sppiied to the puroliase and preparation of ail dried fruits. -lu buy- ing such f ruits as apples and apricots, rejeet tbose which have been sulphured (te bie recognized. by tiheir light celoir). This process la objectIons-blc, becs-use though improving the appearauce, it les ens the fine fis-vor of the fruit. Remem- ber that it alwaya pays te buy the beet grade. Iu preparing dried fruit for cooking, pick over, thon cover with -tepid wster; ]et stand for five minutes, then wash thoroughly lu several waters until per- fectly les-n. Drain, cover with fresh cold water, and lort stand from twelve te thirty-six boura te sos-k. When s- simple dsh las desired, turn the soaked' fruit into a double houler, lies-t siowly, and cook st the aide of the lire for several bours, until the fruit is tender but unbroken. The fireless cooker ms-y here ho used to good advs-ntacge. This slow cooking dispels teughueses and develops the ful aweetuess of the fruit. Sugar should not be added until about twenty minutes before.taking from the fire. No definite amount can be given; use ouly enough te aweeten te taete. Thus simply prepared, sncb fruits Re apricote, peaches, pears, prunes, chierries, berries and prunelles may be used in ai- rternstiou as s- course for breakfast when fresh fruits are unattainable. Combina- tions of one or more fruits ms-y also be made te great advantage. T)ried friits can be utilized in inany good desserts. Mlieu ushîg tapioca or sago, substitute stewed and sieved fruit of some kind for blhe usuai fruit juiee, f re.sh f ruit -or milk. Make a mold of boiled ceres-i or corn starch, and serve ivith it as s- sauce the sieved fruit ma-de sweeter than usual. In place of tl'e quartered apples in dumplings, take large prunes that have been soaked and pitted, halved peaches or apricots cooked until jusit tender, or fig-s or dates steamed uintil soft. Dip stewed apnicots or peaches in a fritter batter, and fry lu .smoking-liot fs-t. Stewv a dsqh of soaked-4lried berrneq or pittcd echerries, and( sweeteil libera Il. Butter thick slesG of stale bread, ]av two ou a platter, and pouir over soine of tlîe bot fruit. Repent uintil there are tliree laxers of each, then cover witli a platter aîd a siglit wcighît. Set aw%%av% for hiaîf a dav, -aiil surve col witil cuis-m. Tu the sbortcak,. and rol'r-poly lUne ilried fruiîts inako a god fi Iiinîg. As a variation of the faini iliar Oerîîiau apple cake, inix tlire cnpfu!iý of Ilur, twvo tea- spoonfuis of baking powder, two table. spoonfula of sugar, one-half teaspoonful of sait and rub in ',two tableapoon fuis of butter. Beo± two egga, add one eupfui of milk, and, sUr into\" he dry mixture with more milksas neeesuary te inake a thiek batter. Spreàd haïf an inch thick on shallow greaaéd ns,,and press into the btter soaked and pitted prunes or any washed and soaked dried fruit. Use enough pieces to cover the top. Sprinkie thickiy with sugar (some add a speck of clnnamon), ad halte in a quick oven. The prover~bial '\u003csweet tooth\" will bc sstisfied with this confection: Take equal portions of aoft fige, dates, seeded raisins and apricota, meaauring after chopping.fine (the apr;rots te be washed, soaked for four hours, then dried on a cloth), and onehaîf as mucb cli opped aimonds and pecans or butternuts. Mix well, pouuding with a wooden beetie. Ps-ck into a square or oblong mold, let stand for three hours, -turn out, eut in amail cubes, aud rol lu powdered sugar. Iastly, when the preserve ciniiet la empty and fresh fruit a long way off, do not despair. Pick. over and waslî four pounde of prunes, soak for twenty-four bours, then steam for twenty minutes. BMIl together -forten minutes two pounis of sugor, one plot of vinegar, one ounce eaeh of whole cloves and stick cinnamon and one-fourith of an ounce of ginger. Add the prunes, and simmer gently tiattil tender, then eau. Or pick over, wa.ali aud sos-k a good grade of dried aprieots. Next day weigh Mhe fruit, sud for eaelh pound add three-fourths of a pohind of augar. To four ponnds of fruit add one cupful of water and the silgar, 811(1 eook aiowly, wit-h frequenit tirrings, until re- duced te a marinaisde. One of the Most Dreaded Peste, Iiedbugs are lis-bic te find their way into s-ny bouse or apartmnît, but it is the bousekeeper's fs-uit if they find iodg- ment there. As with aIl other insects. perfecti cleanlinesa is the grostest safe. guard. If they are found ini a room immediate action should be taken. There are ms-ny agents for exterminaMtng these bugs, but my preference is for naphtha. It is clean, doee net injure anything, is eosily applied, and la absolutely sure, if enough la used lu the right place. The only drawback ia that the vapor is very inflammable, but if the work la doue ini the morning with thie windows open, a-nd tbere la ueier light nor fine ini thec. room, there la not the sligbtest- danger. Lrt mus-t be nemembered ttîat these in- seets do nit confine theniselves -to' tle bed. They get iuto picture mouldinga, the backs of picturea, cracks iu floors sad walle, sad ln upholatcred furulture. Wheu yen are prepanrig to exterýini- ste tiiese pesta get a spring-bottem oliler (s- can such as is used for oiling machin- ery) and plenty of ns-phtha. Open thé windows of the infested room. By ineass of the oiler force napbtîa into eveny groove and crack in the room. Wet s-l the ledges over the doors sad windows, the tep of pieture moiîiding, and eve'ry crack ia the bed-wuich should previ- ousiy have been taken s-part-tue niat- tress, piliows, etc. Have s-il the elotiig' put out on the line, and bes.ten and aliaken well. Close thie noom, Ies-viing the wiîîdows open, and after s- f v hours it niay he swept, dusted a-nd pat lu order. Anotîer metlîod la te furnigate with sul- plaur. Or, oil of cedar rnay be uaed. Dip a feather or smaîl bruah ln tlîe oit and brush over tlîe cracks anud crevie. kShut up tlie room for several days.Ai well before using. Brolled FIsh A vervî tastY dish niay be preparc'l fionsnuoked lialibut, or sainrion, eut ijito tin sucees, sprinkied witli lenion juiee- aiii1 l l1\u003ciwed to imarinate iluttiîs dressinlg for -in 1our. The sucves are thien dipped ilito mlelted butter, dusted with pepper 01r paprika. and holled over a chear lire, or 11-ler the broiler of aga range. SeviWith rqute of riec. or hoiiliv, :u l ~'ii, i vitlî 5!iceS of leion.",
         "!eb., 1915 Winnipeg, POL, 1915 the wesatern HOMe\u003e àfonthly Editorial Comment twe table. Leaapoonful poonfuls Of one eupful Ty mixture te inake a inch thick press itito prunes or fruit. use ). Sprinkle a speck of tek oven. h\" will be Dn: Take te«, seeded ring after be wasked 1 Iried on a b cllopped. nute. Mix [en beetie. Smold, ]et ýut, eut in -red sugar. ciniiet je vay off, do wâmlî four venty-four r mhinutes. wo pounis one oulie cinnarnon of ginger. Waal] and aprw0t. 1 for eaeh pohind of t add one 811(1 eook tintil re- Conservation There lived, some years ago, in this city a Scotch man wbose naine need flot be given. His salary was but six hundred dollars a :year. Yet hie always seemed to be well clad and so did bis family. If tbere was any hardsbip no one knew about it. Indeed bie frequently used to refer to bis \"wee bit savings.\" At the saine time ail around tbe city were families in dire want althougb their earning power was greater tban his. It was tbe Scotcbman bimself, wbo, in one of bis* unconscious bursts of wisdom, gave an explanation of tbe apparent anomaly. '\u003cDon't you. see how it is, man? Tbey al know bow to make money, but I'm the only one of tbe lot who knows bow to save it. They never look a day ahead.\" Take the tbought over into- our national life.. Our, income, in'proportion to -popûlaý- tion is princely, altbougb it could be multiplied many times. Yet so tboughtless are we of tbe future tbat we bave already impoverisbed our resources; it would not be extreme to say that in someparticulars we are on the verge of bankruptcy. Lumnber. *Some years a go it would cost $3,000 to build, a bouse. To-day it wiil cost $5,000. One reason is tbat tbe price of lumber bas increased. Ih bas increased because tbe lumber suppiy of the world bas diminisbed. Every year tbe United States is using tbree times as ýmuch timber as it grows, and every year tbere is more timber burned tban is used. And tbis in spite of the fact tbat be- tween fou r and five million dollars are spent in protecting the forest reserves. Here 'in Canada we bave preserves infinitely ricber, and yet we grumble about spending one bundred thousand dollars a year for war- dens, while the losses by fire are beyond calculation. Nor is tbis the only loss. In the very richest sections, tbe cboicest lands are let for a mere song to men of another nation. The hundreds of thousands of profit are enjoyed by tbose who acknowledge another fiag. True there are some of our own people wbo have succeeded in getting on the inside-but why should flot tbe resources of the nation be preserved for the nation? The world every year requires a billion and a quarter wortb of lumber. By conserving our forest lands by cutting trees at the ground instead of six feet from the ground; by clearing ail dead wood instead of leaving it to feed the forest fires; by planting afresh denuded districts, we could ensure anicorne for ail times. We could become fabulousiy wealtby. lIls'vaste of timber, mieaning as it does, aii increase in the cost 'of building, bas serions~ and far-reaching consequences iii a deniocracy, It 15 1no littie thing if men can- fl0tot wn1 their own homes. Patriotism and good feeling decline. Amlan's loyalty wvill Swanie if he bas no finalicial interest ini Bird Life There is a conservation about wbich littie is being said, the conservation of our birds. It is positive cruelty, this slaughter of the feathered tribe. Havé you thought what it means to lose the song of the bobolink and the trunipet of the swan?- Is it of no im- portance that in this whole world no one can find a passenger pigeon? The men of sixty years will tell you that in their boyhood they saw Blocks numbering a million. Wheat Wheat! What a priceless heritage inour broad acres. Sometimes we think of the wealth of our gold mines. AIl the gold taken out of the mines of British Columbia from the beginning of time does liot begin to compare with the value of the xvheat crop in Manitoba for a single year. And Mani- toba is a small province. We now raise in Canada 1-20 of the world's'wheat. We-can raise 4-for a time. There's the. rub-71ç* a time 1 Witb bad cultivation thé fertility f the soil will decline, just as it bas declined in tbe United States.- Theie the.ayer4ge yield once was 35 to 40 bushels; Q iti less tban 13. This -ii spite of thé fact t agricultural colleges are. at wfork eilig4- ing the people. The fact is that agiickùurl colieges reach but a -small percentage 0f. tbe people. What is wanted isclear infoMiatloh disseminated to ail the people. Thîý\"mean9 tbe teaching of the rudiments of agriculiuite in every high scbool an d every consolidated scbool. Education should have some valie for tbe leading industry of aur land-. There is another side to this lumber industry. Most of the pulp-wood reserves are right here. Why should we flot make tbem a source of wéaltb to our nation? WThy sbould we sbip out the manufactured article for a mere pittance, and buy the manu- faètured article for a prince's ransom? We are the only country in the worlcl that bas an excess of pulp wood. We sbould make it a source of profit for al times. It is too precious to be squandered. Just as some of the claims in California whicb were rented to private individuals were taken back by the state wben it realized its foolishness, so the time bas corne for Canada in al matters of this kind to insist that national resources shaîl be used for n\u002bional advantage. ASong of Canada i By Robert Reid. Sigi me a ong of the GreatThmDnion 1 i Soù1.felt words for a pmiaiot'a ear! i Ring out boldly the well-ttwned measure, - à Voicin your notes that the world may EHéeo a ne starveling-beaven forsaken- - -- Shrinking aside where the natibns thron9\u003e Proud sa the proudeet moves able among thei- * Worthy is she of a noble eong! i Sing me the worth of eaueh Canadian,= mi Roamer in wilderness, toiler ini tow'n - 8sareh earth over youl-1 find no l1 etauneher,1 Wâether hie hands 'be white or brown; gOome of a mght ged stock to stat with, Best of the wkwId's bloodin eaoh vea*n, * Lord@ of ourselves, and ulivves to no one, I For us, or fromi us, you'll flnd we re- * MN. i-gme the song, tihen; sing it bravely * il Put your soul in the wbords you sing; Sing me t.he praise of thds glor.ious coun- try- Clear on the eaTr let the deep notes ring. Hiere le ne starveling--heaveu-forsaken- Crouching apart where the nations throng; Proud as the proudest moyenshbe among them- Well is she worthy a noble song! Then there is meat. ýSteak a few yes ago was fifteen cents, now it is from twenty-ý two to tbirty cents, -and this -because ë*t1 are scarce. The farm has encroached on ,t1ýe ranch, and the farmer bas not yet learnedj the necessity of mixed farming. For mix.e1 farming may not be profitable imméndiat4lrt but. unless wheat legumes and manure arý, found together, the farmer might as Weil, expect ultimate, riin. No soil can étand, wbeat raising alone. Water Power Then there is water power. It bas-becir estimated that the water power of Canada 1isq anything from seventeen million ta seventy million horse power. Why should it flot ait' be retained for national advantage? For-, tunately there is little to complain of rlglft bere. As Canadians we stili have the air and., most of the water courses. free from eméý bargo. As a nation we are a t the beglnning, of things. We mnust learn how to save, ho*, to busband our resources. Then shall we bave a prosperity which is flot ephemeral Our growth in population will be paralleled hy a growtb in resources and manufactures. These are the mnaterial conditions of ail other prosperity. 1Moral Quality Above and beyond ail material things is the character of the people. Mqre important than anytbing else is tbis, that we preserve a reverence for ail that is pure and boly; that wve respect womankind and tenderly deal %vith children; that at home, in business and social relations, we hionor and practice the Christian virtues-in short, tbat in ail things we endeavor to exemplify that righteousness wvhich exalttch a nation. Unless we con-ý serve our own moral forces, there is no pur- pose in any other conservation whatsoever. It is not dificult to understand what duty this imposes on the family, the cburch and the school. The nation's prosperity de- pends upon the well-being of these institu- tions. 4 ~Ç. t ,.t~ t t- meat Ieir way but it is find lodg- ý1 insects. test saf e. 1 a room :en. There bing these naphtha. ything, !15 y sure, if ace. The )r is very s done iii open, aiid ýe ini the - t- danger. these in- -$ fo, the loîildings, in floors furniture. texterunin- ttom'oiler e Machin- Open thé By nwaîîs to cvery Wet al Winîdows, n(1 every Id previ- the îîîat- c lothiiig iteii and aving the hMurs it in order. with sul- be uaed. n the oit, crevices. ays. Air prepiirc'l euit iitfl on ji(\u003c. dr-essin,,g n dipped h pepper lear fire, s; range. lîon1iii, Il.",
         "Tho WsternHome lui*l #1..........? ,~aa manaBig sem ep Igeam t ameofa IîwmmI Imw = =112q W* W wlMUel!you a Sbeloek-Manlg 2th Century Piano that lu the. equal Of bet madeand maye you $100 on the ppuce. Right there we go on record s=lnpJI, uagtforwad lana% = with atatenSu eis arc ready to prove. There ShhrIsk-Maluiu 2Oth Csntry Piano * rÀ muBiget Piao value\" - Pom the. luit oeation rlght up to the final tuning and sbipping we safe. taud co«ansd practia. ecouomy at the factory. Every labor-saving Jevice and e\"er item of- modern equipment is employed by us to perfect Our output and Ireduce the prie.. Yet we firily reject auy methad for saving tine or moncy at tii. expeuse of the. quality. Whken ymexeapdne-the -interior cf a -8hedoeký-Nainig 2Oth. Century Piano you find the fanions Otto Hi el DonblePeR tg Action, fiInest quality of wire striga sd best guarauteed feit haiumers front the foremiat maker. Ail these .*sadadfatures of excellence go into evçry high.grade piano made. We take dit ffmoatbs te build one of ou instr=-ets,.--and it gets the greatest care of WkOled wonkmeu every day of thiat time. Do you wonder we get the toue? The Proofs Are Ready For You W.eam prove the. truth of ail our claims and show you how you may own a Sherlock-Manuing 20th Century Piano St a= oig f $100, gttting.one of the vend'. best instruments and by far the finetpan made at the pice. Write Dept. 14 to-day for Catalogue A. l. $ -herlock-Ma.mung Piano Cou (No Street Address Necessary) Thi Wlmolpog Piano Copany, 333 Portage Avpnue cg\"r a copleasotinent flzerok-lNanning.Pianos and Organs Cataogue andpries miledf 0eonapplication. Easy terme of payment arranged. Blackwood's Raspberry Vinegar Something Delicious To be obtained of ail Grocers Manufacturers of Blackwood's Cecbrated Soft Drinks The Blackwoods Limited Winnipeg A Perfect Black bye It's very liard to get a perfect fast Black Dye but we have itin ~ Maypole Soap The dlean, easy, home Dye that washes and (Iyes-at the one operation-Cottons, Wools, Silks or mixtures. 24 colors, 10e cake-Black l5c-at youir dealers or postpaid with bookiet \"How to Dyc.\" Friak L. Denediot \u0026 Co., Montreal, Canada \"War! War! Warf Is a Bountiful Jade\" Written for nhe Wsten Home Monthly by Bonnycastle Dae. PTr-IH GRIM fingers of the great God jof War are stretcbing out and reacbing nearer to this Canada of ours every day. Who would have thougbt to look at the old familiar Emprees, the C. P. IL.liner who for the hast twenty years bam monthly made the trip from Victoria and Vanucouver te the Orient, that she would figure in the finale of the' running down of that Pirate of the Ses- The Emden? The home governinent tookt the Empresses over from the rallroad and armed themn and pwce thum on patrol service in the Indan cean. They are swift, lowlying cruisers, unarmoured, ofi course. You wMf remember when the Austrailin warship mun the Emden ashorej on Cocos Island, a number Pof the men4 escaped. It seems they siezed a nativej schooner and made a miniature pirate outf of ber. Well, our.old friend, The Empres poked her long eim nose mnto the scene1 and captured'the lat of those Ge.-mani Pirates. Then to adld another chapter toE ber long bestory-the Maharajah Gaekwari of Bda one of the greatest of the nativea Princes of India, bought ber to use as ai hospifal ebip for the mother country.a Jugt remmber, the Sikhs we. vannotý use1 -Outer Docks, Victoria, ce.C., with the\"Empre on the Pacific Coast-a labour trouble in- cident-are just as loyal and just as ready and Wiin to fight and die for the good old flag as any of us-ail these native Princes are helping to keep you and 1 se- cure in our far wcst Canadian homes. Did you ever meet a torpedo boat de- stroyer when you were ouf for a nice littie cruise in an inoffensive motor boat? No, well, your humble friend and bis assistant Fritz did-We were down off Bremerton, the Navy Yard of the U.S. on the North- ern Pacifie coast. There is a magnificent dockyard there and the lad and I were busy \"put-p)uttering\" around about first class cruisers and gunboats and prison- ships and Government yachts, ail open- mouthed at the fleet of cruisers that lay at the piers-just arrived from Mare Island, the California Navy Yard. Wce saw themn go to sea. I will tell you about tbis later. \"Say, that boat coming down the Sound (Puget Sound) must have the bit in her mouth! Gee! Sec ber go!\" WVe both stood up in the little launeh and watched the tiny warship come tearing along; I had seen them before but neyer under foreed draught. She was still about. a mile and a hall frorn us and about four hundred yards from the shore. \"Look at those boathouses turning over! Look! Look! She's upsetting everything all along the shore,\" her afterdrag, at thirty-five miles an hotîr, w-as simply sWeepmng the shore clean behing her. \"Get power on, laddie,\" I1 yelled. \"'Pt-puit-puit\" sang oiir little engino, aind died. iitplpi,'this tlime Aie was off. The destrover was about. i wo minutes away and n e w'ere right in ber path., In tWo miniutes we ought t . gvt a bit out of danger. She camie with a1 solid out-thruet of water ahead and a great fan-hike tail- behind her. As she passed a lit fie grey painted Government tirnder, she tbrew it behind and above ber like the cork on a boy'. ewiftly draggej flshing pole. We were speedm.g acrea the Sound, a littie off her course now. \"Ah!\" eaid Fritz, \"She's altering ber course!\" Now her water hidden boiw as pomnted straight for us-now it ewung past us--now she was ahmost broadeide on and about thrçe bundred yards away.- now she was swinging around her cirree until she was sterm on and ber mighty sweNl were rushing down on Us. 'Head ber into them!\" I cried and around we came. The swirl of the on-. commng waters caught us and wQrried us as a dog would a cap in hie moutJx; then we mounted up the crearning curve and balanced ahorrid second ont e to, t hen the wal of water sank under us ad left us tossing and rofing, a mas of fosin and spray from bow to stern. If treated us more eaaily than if did the gunhoates ad second clame cruisers as itf fmi; thein about moet unceremoniously, aud if swept tbe shore dlean of every wharf and boat and l~oathouse ail along tbaf part of the Sotrnd. rem cf Indialliu Centre cf the three steÀinships Oh! I WOUld like to have heard wbat the YAdmirai said to the oficer in eonimand; d anyhow that was the first and last tixne ea destroyer ever camne into Bremerton \u003e- under full head. We were mightily interested in ail things here as the tiines are oniious and ewe wondered. just what Uncle Samn would do if a German cruiser sw-ung into the tGulf of Georgia-just dropping a few sheill into Victoria as it passed along the Straits, and then shelled Vancouver, it bcould hardly fail to bit a number of Amer- ican citîzens, as otar cousins are very much bwith us out there, nor couid it help hitting a f ew Arnerican places of business mills, offices, branches of stores, etc., amiý a few American private yachts and public steamers. Now just what would be do? I don't think the cruiser would get tIbM f ar now. In the early days of the war she xnight have, but the greatest Navy of them.ail is protecting every part of ber world wide territory now, and sweeping the seas of the encmy-ships, colonies, islands, war vessels-everything. If you were a ship, and got a boue broken IWilI show you the naval hospital and the old Doctor-of-the.Seas, the Salvor (good naine and good boat, f00) lying beside the dock. I wish I had space to tell yoîî of the wonderful salvages we have seen this wreeker make-great buge freighters driven ashore a thousand miles from their home port, pounding on the rocks of an exposed roast, fulil of water and great gap- ing wotinds. Northward, ever north- ward, sp)eeds the Saivor and her consort, the Wrn. Jolliffe, and ber most wonderfiî1 assort ment of mumps, and she installs lier hugej lups and cemenîs up the greA ,-,,nd n passfes great bandages, ah'ut the sorely strieken sbip and southwvard She s .4 WbWpqL--reb.. igis Canada The Western Home Monthiry ý,'- -ý-ýdlm 1 -",
         "W5nnipeg,_ Feb., .1915 oreover stormy open baya and along qheltered passages alwaYs ready te head for shore and beack her injured one if the water should gain on the pumps. Three months later the dry dock gatcs will open end this one-time crip le will urge out under her own steani. arn afraid to say just ho'w many shipsans steamers of the ïorthern Pacifie Coast have been lugged liome and repa dby his wonderful plant of the Wues Ini olden days this was a fearsome coast bdore British CJolumbia and the United States ighted and charted it. 1 have known passenger steamers to race for Aaska over unlighted, uncbarted waters erd, luckily, ahnost every time they piled thei r aft On the rocks it was ini one of the roof-beset sheltered passages and a the crew and _passengers were aaved; not al- ways,-as 1 know of more than one boat «Looct with al bands.\" To-day lights gleani everylhere, nearly ail these cruel rocks re ahted, but there is stiil one thing that mnakes me shiver. Many cap- tains keep up ful -apeed during mists and foge when they tbmnk they are in wide1 enough waters.1 1 remember one foggy night. We had juat passed Foui Bay; the tide was run-à ning swiftly but the night was ghostly1 slent. Our littie craft went \"Iput-putter-1 ina\" along as ifshe was the only boat in a[theste waters, but you can wager we1 were keeping our eyes and e ars open as we( The Western Home Alonthlv \"Just think,\" qûUoth Fritz, \"they look ssinail one coDuld almoet pocket them.\" Along tbey came until ahnost abreast of us and soine tbree miles out. I neyer remember seeing a bigger swell than ran that day. *The quartette of warsbips were runmg under reduced speed-they had too. Up! up! up! would go the white bows until the four great white yachts were poiningat high heaven and the sea was boiling dangerously over their sterns. Down! down! down! would plunge thoee sanie four bows until you would think they were whales intent on sounding. It made our Ierves tingle and our .hearts poumd te watch theni. Great creamy tops wou!d leap over their sinking bows and dash back against the turrets of the huge guns and leap outa solid mass of shininç water, like a great transparent pair of wmngs for a warship. I knew they were wet, these great cruisers, as I had spent many days on them and what a U. S. Jackie won't tel ou is not worth telling. But I neyer J W AS eivdit possible that anythmng man bas FER ECTION builded could plunge and cavort as did this fleet and stili get te port. To add to the intensity of the feeling of te turn our heads a bit towards the east te see the spotwher ourare lttie ativ port steambothdmthrftcmn ohr r ldt along thes idSriso ua e see the children enjoy _____ deck Ioad o otatr'rira rnhd~.,. i~~ rade\"y ead andl I abov her wng acre )Urse now. Itering ber n bow wam it 5WUng ulaide on de away- her cirele er mighty 8. cried and )f the on-. WQrried us 1-utJ; then curve and top, then is and left foam and Ureated us boats and àem about swept the boat and he Sound, Were righit in thc steamboat lane. Sud- denly %vc heaird a gurgie as if water was being pushed, ahead, and right out of the fog, going parallel te us, appeared what looked like a huge white painted fence. It was the tail white sides of the \"Em- Press of India\" just arriving fropâ Asiatic pot.So near was she that ber port fights sparkled on the trny bits of brass that decorated our engine, and, wben she did get past, what a nice flirt she gave us N ith ber tail current. Slop! stop! along thec Str-aits we went. 1 heard the cruiser squadron was put- tiigto sem the next day, and I wanted to agood look at these big white. United States warships in a heavy swclt. We nîwte harbour-wel, we hfid to.. You Sée we had a nuniber'one size boat and this was about a number ten size sea. Ail nlight the wind howled in from the Sou'- wcs9t; ail nighit long thc mighty surf' h0oorîed and betlowed on the spit. Early nmorning found us on shore facing the f llY of t he gale, peeping out froin behj,îd a bcaehcomber's shack, builded of storin st retvn tiinbers (a tbing of won- der1) latth and hand paintcd cabin pancls side hv side; a bit of rougli hewn fir and a Ii .gnîifj(e\u003cn ahogany board plftCed cheek II' 1(1W. For a bit of ornament, this \u003cigihoit gatherer had finished the eaves foO)t (eep with gold leafed beading. Ah! w\"ht Poor souls fought for their lives while1 that beading was being wrenched and torii off the gilded saloon of the passenger 'levind howled through the nooks and -ra, Iî' s ttc waited and watched for the' siuadron. At last, about noon, we Sa%% theni appearing along the distant (\u003eivi! 11jt shors-four white objecte that flashud in the sun. shifted-two or three wild plunges in the mighty mua and ahe settled down in 90 fathoms with ail bier crew and passengers. Alas! înany an affright.ed one neyer got out of the tiny cabin. It is wonderful-this ail-protecting Mother Nature. Next morning the sens had subsided, the skies were blue, the tides ran ripplingly along as if they neyer would injure a passenger or a warsbip, ail the sea birds were lifting and spattering aking, the gtad sun was shining and spark- ling everywhere and our little \"put-putter\" was running majestically along these one time wild Straits as smoothly as if she ivas in soine miniature harbour in a city park. Out of 1h ne Own Mouth! 1 will honor and revere your colors w'len thcy deserve iny respect, when tIàey cease to be aun empty or w'icKced, farce. lant the red, blaek, and golen flag on thie heigflîts otf(German thought, niake it the standar-d of free humanity, and! J wtiIt shecd for it iny heart's best blood.- Ileinrie i Peine, to (Jernany. The Great-MWest Life Assurance C'om- pany reports exceed ingly sat is factorv business for 1914. The applications re- ceived d.uring the year totaled $27,4361,- 327, s'bowing a substantial increase over the M\u003e913 total. The business in force at the end of the year was approximately $108.000,000. The Official Report of the 'rear's 'business wil -be igsued shortly àfter the annual meeting of the coînpany on Feb. 2nd. I e ..........u m unu,,,,, sIIIunmI IuMII,, a,, what the )lnand; [ast tixne remertoil 1 in %Il mois and m would inte the af ew long the «uVer, it )f Amer- ry much ? hitting es mills, ia few publie lie do? tthat the war Navy of of her weepiflg -olones, Sbroken and the r (good beside bell yen r'e seefi àighters m their s of an at gap- northl- onsort, nderfi il ilis lier gr.'at 'd '.he l'le rNaval H-ospital for Sfipq on the B.C. Prffc Coast FOR INFANTS, INVALIDS- AND THE AGRD. A food off great nutritive value, which can be made suitable for any degree off digestive power by the, simple process of letting it stand for a longer or shorter period at one stage off its preparation. Benger's Food fonns with milk, a dainty, delicious and highly nutritive cream, entirely free froua rough 'and indigestible particles. -The Lanoet\" dce s m it a» \"Mr. Benger's admirable preparation.\" Readers can obtain a 4Bj-ge bklet, '* Benger's Food and Now t. use t which contains a \"Coc uide in the Rearlng o\u003cfans ad1aciu iformation on the car. oflInvalida, etc., on application togerFo t. 1tter Works, Mfanchestef, EngIard. $.ng.?a Food is aold in lins by Druggîata, etc.. eeoer r. M",
         "Tue m-ýWestern Moe eMon thly Winndpeg, Feb., 1915 Stirring Tines in Rupert's Land By J. D. A. Evans Let eeSulig4ht\" Dispel the GlOOM ,FHE shadow of a blue Monday doce flot fail acroe the path oP'those Who Use Sunlight $oap For tis,»oap. uts Jabor in half. And the nighumare of ciothes being \"ruLI\u003eed to abirede\"' disappears when you learn the. gentie Sun- lgtway. Sunlight Soap le as pure as sunlight itacif. A $5,000 guarantee says you canuot id a single aduit- erant or impurity muti cake of concentratcd Sunlight 5c Soap Sold by ail grocors lu A few days prior te Christmas, the writer desiroué of extendinç the compli- ments of the sson to ManÎtoba'a oldest inhabitant, journeyed te Somnerset, for two miles distant froni that village dwells James Cunningham. As the writer entered bis peaceful abode Buiidst the poplar trees reaplendent in covering of hoar frost, this wonderful man was standing et the stoveside adding billets te the lire. \"How are you to-day I\" vas the lirst remîrk Mr. Cunningham vas aecosted with. Then he turned around, ho, the man in excesa of one hundred and tbree years of age, and eordially bid his visiter be seated. «You've comane to pend the night this time, I hope,\" vere the welcome words of the venerable centenarian. 'Tll try and recollect some thiixgs this evening. Christmas is close at band, 1 thank you for your visit te wiéh me a Merry one.\" Until supper was announced by Mrs. Clouaton, bis daughter, Mr. Cunningham sxnoked a pipe and conversed about the war -and other, subjects of generality. tup case heard before the then Goverlujcr of the Colony. Unanimous opinion de claring the accused innocent, an infur- iated mob broke into the jail; be waa promptly set at liberty and shortly afterward removed to Poplar Point te continue his useful ministration. But rowdyisni and lawlesaness were flot tolerated îiý those years remarked Mr. Cunningham*, who recolleets that one James Stewart a. ringleader in Mr. Corbett's release, was placed in prison froni which hoe emerged a fow days later, the resuit of forcible action on the part of his supporters. Lt i. alone necessary te add as the centenarian says, tbs.t in-, cidents of this nature display the antag- onistie feeli7 ng those years prevalent- against the Company and its rights, the determined attitude of the settlers to enjoy freedom of mercantile operations. \"Can you recali anything concerning the purchase of Rupert's Land?\" was asked Mr. C3unningham who at the time (1859) was as in following years, a figure very prominent in the material aFairs of the Colony. 'This hadl been secured the Company by a Charter which proviOed that al ]and not included in Rupert's' Land was held by theni through a license which reuired renewing every twenty-one years. In 1853, a few years before the time came for this license to cease, the Company's direetors of course made ait application for renewal. This the set- tIers thought would b.e a good oppor- tunity to make opposition whieh vas pre9ented te the Govermanent at* Ottawa, and they, recogniuing how unf air the Company's proposition wao4 , ngly opposedl the requent. AMter i Mr Cmrnnngham afatea.,' 'a iepeqmtative Chief Justice Draper appaýredWTore the Rouie of Commone i ndol re that (Janadian settlenient b. tended. to the Rooky Mountains, Wvxl con- tended Justice Draper constitted the natural western boundary. 4..,\u0026 little later date, the petition.of tii. Çîaiadian Governmtent vas grajîted, fhtb is in 1870, two yeers aiteroufe4ion of ,provinces!$ SOIUND SLEEP \"I have been a cofee drinker, more or lesi, ever since I can remenuber, until a few months ago 1 became more and more nervous and irritable, and flnally I could not sleep at night for I was ber- ribly disturbed by dreama cf ail sorts and a species of distressing nightmare.\" (The effecta on the systcm eof tea and coffee drinking are very sinilar, because they each contain th.e drug caffeine.) ),4'nally, after hearing the exiperience ofnumbers of fricnds who had quit coffee and were drinlcing Postum, and learning of the great benefits they 'had deriv-ed, I concluded coffee must be the cause of irny trouble, se I got some Postum and had it made strietlv accord- ing te directions. \"I was astonisrbed at the flavor and taste. Lt entirely toek the place of coffee, and te, my very great satisfqac- tien, I beg'an te slee~p peacefully and sweetly. My nerves improved, and I wish I could vean every man, vemail and child from the unwholesome drug- drink,--coffee. \"People do net really appreciate or realize what a powerful drug it is and 'hat terrible effeet it bas on the human systemn. If they did, hardly a pound cf coffee weuld lie aold. L would neyer think cf going baek te coffee again. I would almost as seon think of putting MY baud in a fire after 1 bad once been burned. Yours for bealth.y\" POstum cornes in twe forma: 1Regular Postum-niust be weil boiled. 15C. and 25c. packages. Instant Postum-is a soluble powder. A teaspoonful disso.ves quiokly in a cuP of bot water and, with cream and sugar, makes a delicieus beverage in- stnty 30e. and 50c. tins. !the ýo@t per cup of both kinds is about the sasme. \"Thpre's a Reason\"-for Postuin. --sold by CGrorers. ., .,', Mu.n writing advertisers pleasc mention The Western Home Monthly. Winnipeg, Feb., 1915 It is apparent froià âachive. and con- versation witb Manitoba's pioncera, that the Hudson Bay Company have figured in the limeliglit of-mucli pertaining to the early history cf this province and its record of turbulent times. An in. sight into varions of these agitations which have tra.nspired, inay prove of in- tereat te they in the Manitoba of to' day. t i. learned that at the time the executors cf Lord Selkirk decided to dis- pose of their intereet ini Red River pro- perty, the Company imsnediately follow- ing purchase by them, determined upon certain procedure stringent ini char- acteristie, and- as defensive mediumi in protection of their holdings, at once on- deavored te suppress the operations of any person or body wrhose liveliboot w-as obtained through trading with the settiers or Indian population. As a natural sequence te such arrogant action, the peoplo assuqWed an attitude of resentment, in particular they of native extraction wbose vocation was connecte\u0026 with the fur trade in its different aspects. From in excess of nine hundred French halfbreeds, a peti- tien vas dispatched te, the British Government containing the request that the Company in question~ ho instruoted that the petitioners with others might continue commercial dealinge as in pre. vieus times. ]Delay in receiving assent- ment te this desire, caused the traders te become impatient; naturally the agitation waa not lessencd, a crisis im- muinent. This latter originated from a French trader, Sayer; lhe having pur- chased goods te, trade in the Lake Mani- toba district, thus incurring the Com- pany's wrath, wag placed under arreat and cenveyed to Fort Carry for deten- tion. A day was apl)ointed for his trial; it n'as recognised in the Colony thia procedure wvould create belligerent atti- tude by the settlers and etlers. Hence, Louis Riel, hie whose son figured in the Manitoba of later years and waa exe- cuted in 1886 for treason against the Ilome Government, arrived upon the scene with a large contingent of French haîf breeds assembled in St. Boniface; they marc.hed te, the oourthouse. The magistrates appointed were unable to e.onduct the indictmient, the accused lie- ing carried off amidst the excitement of an angry mob -wlose actions endorsed their opinions that the Colony's comn- mierce was an asset open te aIl. Frus- trated by this, the Company determined to retain tlieir mfofopoly aga inst intru- sion, when the Rev. Corbett, in 1859 Anglican minister at Ileadingly , Mr. Cunningharn ý%as here resident at the time, contended in strenuous plirasing fr-ont bis pulPit, the dlaims of the Comi- pany were unjust, detrimental to thue interests of the Coilony. As resultant of the reverend gentleman!s address, bis arreat followed, the indictment, however, contained ne impeachment as alleged againat the Company's assumption. The accusation paced against Mr. Corbetti was instea a charre of mishehavieur toward a private i:n1iVidlual, a frumped",
         ".Wuîlpeg J-re.,, iBis The Western Homo Mon thly cqiîow did t.his judgment affect the lidon Bay Company ?\" asked thie -rter. -nie was what took pluee,\" responded the vonereble oentenarian. «The Coin - pany ini surrendering their rlghts re- Oeived a sumi of three hundred thousand pounds and w»e given permi\u0026sion to see a block of land near ail its Poste, aise one-twentieth part of lande laying south of the north brandi of the Sask- atchewanand westward of Lake Winni- Peg. 3 'Mid you, this would be in your early daye, meet Bishop Provencher?Hle i Understood to have flgured mucli in the Iiitory of hie turne, did lie not ?» The memory of Mr~. Cunninghan isj etraordinary. He aye: 'I did when I wus a young mnan. Ho miglit be called the flrst permianent miesionary of tbe BIoman Catholio Churcli here; for nearly forty years hie lived ini tie Colony. I can romember a clùirch buit by him \u0026cross Red River somnewhiere nearly ;pposite th oth. of Assiniboine. Peo- eh now=adays Dan't reailize what a good mfluenco Bishop Provencher cast over the Colony. 1 knew him well; hie had auoh a kind face and evcrybody loved him. Re wase buried over ini Sf. Boni- face, I think.\" In allusion te early mission work in Manitoba, Mr. Ciinninghain always ,brighitens up. And now we shall 4e given illustea.tiôn of the retentiveî mind- of this man upwards of one hundred ani tlrree years of age. 'Mid I know Rev. William Cochrane? l'es, I didI but thbat le going back Vo the long, long ago, somewhiere about 1825, wasn't it? The writer nodded.. Mr. Cochraune anived in the Colony during that ypar; hoe was the pioneer of Mani- tobeas Anglican Churci;is work per- formed in a practical wilderness, yet, ene this the Rev. John West who ne- turned te England, had built a school- house in Uic viinity of the St. John's Cathedral of to-day. Mr. Cunningham possesses but faint recollection of this revenond gentleman. The settlements w'ere a distance apart, the majority aituate aloaig Red and Assiniboine ]Rivens. This necessitated the Rev. Cochrane instituting mission stations at specifled places. The Upper Churcli was enected; tlîis is the Catiedral of St. John's. At a distance of six miles, was built Middleccuroh; likewise St. Andrew's. Air Cochrane erected this also. That is, 'lot tic present stone churcli Visible fronithti Street Railwvay line te West Seîkirk; that building dates from later peiod, andin l it Bisiop Auderson preaehled, lie -%vio penetnated tic wilds Of Y1ukon, carrying 'thithen tic Word of ~l'lihe first people ever baptised lu RîetsLandl were thre Gunninghams, a fliette to-day centenanian representa- oit\u003cf wluch speaks of witi pride. \"Ntlong- after -wo came from Hud- hie 'ys lie, \"mnother took us to t'l e''Uhurcli where wc ahl were bap- fil spcaking of Rev. Cocbi-ane's work O-S a Tissionary, it le interestiaig te note tlira lie founded a ciurch lu St. Peter's Il.t0ric place of tic Indian peoples anid1 S-i lialfh (n Red River bank a few miles i northward of West Selkirk. Ho likewise establjehied a mission amongst the Crees then located ln a district of Portage la Prairie. Mr. Cuniiinglim ln making, reference to Archbishop Machray, recol- lects distinetly his arrivai lin 1865, and the death a few days afterwards of Mr. Cochrane wio le buried within tic pretty churchyard' at St. Andrews. In these early decados, the Anglican Churcli ln similitude with tiat of tie Roman Communion, found its principal work to lie exterior of the Colony's eettled portions, and ln particular were thc efforts directed toward a betterment lu tie c\u003cnditions of tie Indian inhabitants. The territory covered was of immense dimension, a fact recognisable when it is learned tic area enibraced not alone Rupert'à Land, ln which fifteen clergy labored, but extended to Môoee atr and the Yukon. Ton of these mision- are, remarked Mr. Cunningham, were native borniand fluent in knowledge of various Indian dialect8. It was neoes- sary oftentimes to tramp for deys in order to reaeli ecattered bands of aborigines, whist these heroio clerg ini humble wigwams, assisted their flocks not alone by spiritual and scholastic tuition, but engaged in the huat after food. \"By what means was Presbyterianisin first introduced into the Colony 1\" was asked Mr. Cunninghami, whose reply was that Gitelio eettlers had. long wanted -a minister aile to preacli and converse in, their ovn language. The Anglican ëhurch to minimise the difficulties, 'had niodified their service and the Presby- terians delighted to attend Vie ministra- tions of khe clergy. But ini 1851, appli- cation was made te the Preshyterian authorities Vo eend out a minister; tic Rev. John Black was dispatcn'ed. Upon hie arrivai, somo hre undred pensons gathered togetior; lu 1854, the first ldonan Ohunch was built. «' helped to put up that churcli,\" eaid Mr. Cunninghamn. \"It was'nt a veny large building, but the old settlers will neyer forget tie naine of John Black.\" This fact le requisite of no comment; the witer has upon many 9e years ago, heard Red River peoplelallude to hie saintly life. Methodiats dwelling lu Manitoba to- day, wiii resd with interest that the great body of Chistians following the footeteps of John Wesley, inaugurated the first church of their denomination in tic \"Igreat baie land\" lu 1840, the pioneer efforts of such occurriug at Non- way Hlouse and on Saskatchewan River. The entry of the Metiodiet Church proper into Manitoba, transpired in 1868 wheu Rev. George Young- arrived. \"Tîtere appeared to ho continuous wrangling in the ealy days,'\" ias a statement 'of the centenarian, wývio like- -wise savs that la ninci Inter yeane this wvas visibly apparent. An exernplar, a rebellion occurred ini 1869 at the time of transferral of the Colony froin the Hud- son Bay Company to Canada. This action evoked strenuous opposition amongst certain people by whom it was extended into au upnaising. The Cern- pany operated a fort at Sturgeon Cneek at this time, and made demand of puy. fSpalnd troubes llnen, Ifyredaler a.T hle oret dran i te usen lcln o e 25 0 a SO~eif or ouEL We wil~y YOU. THE rARUN* TpO 0.0op GINADA 54-64 Framw AMa, TO~oeu. Ask your neighbor to take The Western Home Monthly. $1.00, for one year, $Z.OO for three years. When writing advertisers pluie. mention The Western Home Monthly. E'eb., 1915 UN-ION BANK 0F CANADA EstabUahod 181 MER\" OFFCE - WIMN 0.E Pald up Capital............. 1,000,000Z Baoere...................... ..8,0a 00 Total Assotu, over...............86,000100 BON. PEESIDENT -8fr UV. lZicu PEESIDEN-4OHN .GUT, 38Q. R. T. RILEY, Esq. G. B. THOMSON, EQ, iDiIEcToà W. IL ALL'.N, Esq. HON S. BÂRKEIR, Esa., P.C., M.P. M. BULL, Escj. COL. JOHN W. CARSON B. B.CRONYN Sq, B. L. DRE\u003e E.E.ADU MERE , Eq.,KIr.C S. A ,Fq J.S.HOUGH, Esq., K.C. F. E. NSTNEnq. WM SHAW, Esq. G.H. BALPOUR, Geners Manager. F. W. S. CRISPOBj erltendet of London,Mu anou Usai OMMic, Vinus.6 Princes St.,ECB miWuut and Branche H\u0026YMmk§.4 \u0026W* Mrnbasd Agen\"lasWos0the im at Labo\u0026 Manitoba-Baldur, Birtie, Boissevain, Brandon, Carberry Carm=% aroLla water,Crsa City. Cypress River, Dauphn Deloraine, GlonLx\u003ero, Hamt4 m6=r HoflandM,'Kilarney, Manitou, McCe ,VaIt4Minuedoea, Minto, Morden, N w, Newdale, Nina, Rapid City, Rob\".n Rolanri, R ssejhoal Lake,, Somesu.é ourla Strathclalr, The Pas, Virden, Waskada, Wawanena, Wollwood, 1Wndifog. Baakatowan-AbbeAdanac, Alsask, Anoo1aksà th, lmas ony Buchamnn Cabri, Canora, Crlyle Craik, Cupar, Cut nfi ~ DmeEaod Esteurbias, Estevan,.Eye\"brolw, ÏiL7mre, Gravelbourg, Guer Oe qIl LakoR.Ib Hughtén, Humboldt, I\u003edian Read, Jansen, KeMfeld, Kerrobert, Kmdsrsoy, LAadis b4.rn Ir i awso J'a nbe Loyerna, ,LidonLuseand, Maelln l~or. al re M= d, ac ri, Mileh ,Moose JaLW,1 114:p ~ N¶~rb Ne Oéa Outlook, 9xbqW, Penset au, Ppo0t,9\u003e eit, Pin i , Qu o0ie Regina, Robaart, Rocanville, Rooetown, Saskatoo Scott, Sceptre, 8haupavolean Sintaluta. Southey, Strasaurg, Swift CurrentTourner, Theodoro'oPT- plns Vançuard, Vidora, Verigmn, Vloeroy, Wapella. Wawota, Watros gb eyu, Wilkie, Windthorst, Wolseley Yorkton, Zesanda. Àiberta-Aircdrie, Ai, tarons, Bashaw, Beseano, Bellevue, Blachie, lairmore. Bowden Bow, Islad, Brooks, Bruderheim. Calgary CardstonL0Olb\"\u0026d, Ca-,. staira, éereal, Chinook, Claresholin, Cochrane, Consort, boiwl q 1Mvy dIkk.ntân, Empreme, Foreincet, Fort Saskatchewan, Grand Prsirie, GrayELak, Hanna, 11igb 'River, iloreot, Inniafail. Irvine. Jenner, Lacombe, angdon, Lethbridge, Macleod, Medicine Hat, Okotoka, Paburg, Pincher Creek, Seven Peruons, Standard, Strathinore, Swalweil, Three-Hiil, Wainwright, Winnifred. British Columbia-Enderby Glacier, Haselton,ý Nanaimo, New Haselton, Newport' New Westminster, Prince George, IpinceRuer,,SiithersSi.uaie.sTokw,Vnovr Vanderhoof Vernon, Victoria. Tia âank.havlng over 310 Branchés i n adnmdfg0~WuU q Prinoée Eup.tt. offers excellent facilithoe for thé runsin0 57dmupk ofbauking businua. It hancorond.ntz In ail cias of imoeameéi*uh ott nited Biniou, tie ontuent or Europefl ithUrts beis Collections made in ail parts of the Dominion, and returne promptly rbemuip4l~ lowest rates of Exchange. Two Centrai Offices in WienpgMain St. and William Ave., D. M. Nom. , Manager. Portage Ave., cor. Garr t.(doining Pont Office) F. J. Boulton, Mangr Other Branches ini WiEnnegsfollow:-Coirydon Ive: Logan Ave., NrhE4 Sargent Ave., Portage Ave. and Arlingzton St., Sargent Ave. sriArington Mt., 490 PortqW Ave ni Govern\u003er Dpinion de an infur- il; he was rid shortly r Point to tion. But were not îarked Mr. that one rin Mr. in prison days later, ýn the part ,nccessary s, that in.- the antag- prevaient rigits, the gettlers to operations. concerning Ld was t the time years, a amaterial Company 1 that al Land was nse wiich wenty-one before the cease, the made ait i the set- od oppr- rhhe Pw)a a LOttawa, uf air tie eqm.'tative ore the tended cou- ;uxted the little ,Çiwýadian ,at is in ý\u0026Yon of ,more or r, until a and more inaUly I was hon- aIl Sorts ,btmare.\" tea and because bine.) wperience àaad quit .um, and bhey had t be the 'Ot some accord- Lvor andi place of satisfac- lly and 1, and I woman ie drug- jate or bis and human a, Pound Id nover gain. I putting ice been I boiled. powder. in a arn and age in- s about ,rocers. Belgian and British cavalIey wintcring in the trenches. FARMERS I You will get good satisfaction and the best posiyible caslh resits by employing our @ervices to lok aft r and dispose of your canlot ehipailents of Wleat, Oatq, Ifarley and Flax. Liberal advances againât ahippig bills at 7 per cent interest. Thompson, Sons \u0026 Co. 700 W Grain Exchange Wnie .L - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - wpr4ý- m Winnipeg 1^04^40%",
         "Gii a ui tht'sBrtisl eVery -RJI-made by British workers in Yorkshire, the world's woollen centre, where British wool is vwen. No middlemen's profits to pay. Canadian or London styles, smartly and accurately cut. ( Save you 30 to 50 per cent on Canadian prices. , $1 Carniage and duty paid, only .. .. .. Suit Wo wii mound a sit longth which yen May have vii coat yen only fi carnage, and duly free. Splendid cloths. Highest pric- Hfighest Price only $19*50 (Cardage and Duty Pajd\u003e. FREE 120New Patterns lateet fashions and styles. Aise scientific and simple self- measurement form. Measure Yourself as thousands cf Canadi- ans do yearly. Ne risk. -MISFIT MZANS MONEY BACKC. Groves \u0026 Lindley, 424 Lion Buidings, HUDDERSFIELD, ENGLAND. - w I. iment for lande varions settloe ro lii lng on..1tis requeet met 'wlth pro'n refusai; ini the subséquent, uproar, tE Gévernor of the Cbmpany vas kiloe ,\u0026t the.. Urne. i question, a Dominioi *UIplOo e.waà suirvoyin4gthe land! undeu dispute; information was impartod hbu tho action would croate. trouble arnong6l tho hall broode -who had formied aiL oppn ion the. Govornment were diaregardini their claims altogether. A party, Mr Cunningham states, headed by Loeui Riol, interfered with and preventod tbi 5urveyor'm vork. A fow days folloving this action, one William Mcflovgsll vai made Ljieutenant4lovernor, en appoint- 4n 'nt. Riel i company with smre threc :uudred men, ondeavorod to rosent b: preventing MéDougall froa enterii Fort Garry f roin St. Norbert. Thon, an atternpt wis made te raise a. force amonget the English anud Scotch sottiere to force a -way for MeDougali te enter Fort Garry. This endeavor met defeat; it vas eaid at the time that many ef thons mon, elaimante to no allegiance with Riel and hie foilowers, undoubtodly assurned a disguiaed aynipathy with hime At a few weeks làter date, the Fort v-as seized by Riel who ismued a proclamation that the Colony aend.twelve mon as re- prosentativos to sit lu counuil wlth hie supporters. Nothing of- importance, however, transpired; this wa» sequentia] to the fact agreemnent was entirely out of the q4uestion; an\u0026 rathei dîd thig s sembly .indline Riel to assume greatoz determiation than, before. Within two months, MeDougali sent forth that vhich the settiere understood to bo Qucen Victoria's Proclamation which empowered bim vlth the Governorehip, likewise authorising immediato suppres. sion of the rebelliouse-attitude. As the aftermath of thie mandate, smre fifty men met at the boume of Dr. Schultze; herein governmnent stores were lu afe keeping. In protecting those goode, the men iu charge were confronted by a large band of Frenchmen by whom. they were taken tu the Fort. Amongst these was Dr. Schultz; hoe, however, made good an oscape, and after secreting himaelt iu Kildonan for s. short period, contrived to get away to Duluth, froin whence, ho travelled to Ontario. Just at thie time, Donald Smith, the late Lord. Strathcona arrived at Fort Garry; his presenoe vas the means of bringing together a gather.. ing of English and French ropresenta- tives, of whom Mr. Cunningham sys forty were ln attendanoe. The first action of this assembly vas toformulate a Bill of Rights and dispateh delegates to the House cf Ceaunons at Ottawa. Manitoba vas paesing through turbulent timtes; Riel witih bis 111 advised adhor- ente imnprisoned a number of people, four Of viioni were oondemned to death. Amongst tItis quartet was Thomias Scott; hoe suffered, the remaining three receive\u0026 pardon. At the close of these intereeting remn- iniscences cf early years, Mr. Cunning- liam spoke iu a personal strain. Ho, Manitobas oldest inhabitant, ha, upen many occaslions mxade the journey to St. Paul with an cx cart. In the early fifties, hoe travelled to and from Edmon- ton by a similar mode of convoyance. . «'People,\" lhe remarked, 4\"ofteu talked about trains wliieh we were telu Fort Garry rau long distances in England and United States. We often wished a rail-. road would bc built into te northwest, but we neyer expected Vo see it corne.» In response te the writer's query re- lative te te grain growth and process ef rendition into fleur, the centenarian said its grinding vas accomplished with a circular stone turned by hand power; tItis mili cf primitive construction, Te- volved around a groeved stone. Ho i. able te recolleet distinctly wheu a littie boy, te date cf tItis weuld ho abeut 1820, varlous. settiers in Kildenn raised small acreages cf wheat. \"Christmas will socu ho here again, Mr. Cunningmham,\" remarked his visitor. The venerable uman who w-as thon stand- ing up te replenisli the steve, sighed. lu speaking of winters and the con- tention Manitoba's climatic conditions are now lu progress of change, the cen- tenarian remark9pd that -heu a very smnall boy hoe recollects men talking, about a difference ex-en thev had wit- nessed. During the past two decades, such i8 making itse]f noticeable, andý may the hope be extened thit th e scverity cf winter season ill-jjainnot i- distant perlod, b. of greator modifioa. it tion than at thé proeet timo. The ides, Le that the Indiensaire rlUable Weathor B. prognosticatort, IM n6t conducive to the on opinion. ,of Mr. Cunninghanm who places er n.o redelice ln ithe aeged. signa through lm *hich a coming iseasonpa meteorological ,t forftcaomay ho read.L Inhbisîudgment n-. no prophétie vision la obtainable. 0on.. ng oerning prioes for commodltles hi arly r. deys, ho cOntends that figures for goode ds thoni purohasablo in English currency, hé wero nt exossive; the tr\u0026nsportation ig tarif, sol1ve this. Water traffle, ships sa to Hudeon Bay from, Ingland, York t-boats to the Fort. ee A few Minutes later, the -centenailan )Y enquiring the time was informed that 29 ton o'elock was pas8ed; he then prepared M to go upatairs. ce '«Good night and Ood Mens you ail,\" re w s h ep rts e a k e r a b s p a t n r e r k t; But-yet every life muet roach its Sterminus, the writer upon this viit Scould not fail to notice that the vener- [yable man ia rapidly a.pproaching con- a. pletion of bis pilgrimagg. Within the tg past few weeks, a deafuesa l j making ýnan appearance; bis eyesight. la rapidly D- failing; that vOndorf ni memory romains. IS 'Tini roady to go any time üow,» vas ea remark made by hire to, the writer d duing the evening. \"My end ienflot far [away, end during the last few weeks I've begun- te -think t.' Yeu, want t6' go before long.\" 0 \"Not yet,\" answerd bis listener, '«Several, more Chriatnae days for you, eyet.\" à But, ah! this cnnot 'bo, for Mr. Cun- \u003e' nlngham themn uin ie isone hundrod and fourth year of age, la, now of vory diffèent appearance than on' Good Friday lent whon the vviter 'visited him. VeryrPthetio indeed vaS the alght as he wlkedacros the room. denver, ho ie in Perfect readinosa to leave the SCenes of earth, anid when bis long, use- rfui career in exaxnind-James, Cifnnng. Lham, the Hludson. Bay lad ln oarliest tYears, ho Who travelled f rom tihat dis- Ltant zonoei 1817. to Fort Garry; bis active association decades afterwards as the representative of Kildonan constit- uency tin Mauitoba's firet Leglalative 6bodY, and other duties, veriijy vill ho realizéd inasmuch as concerna hlm, the grandeur of those word. penned by tho Peanuet of old: «And now, Lord, what wait 1 for? MY hope li IleThe.\" THREE REASONS Bach With Two Legs aud Ton Fingers An -Eastern woman who is a fond mother write, an amuising article about ber experience feed-ing her boys. -Among other tiringe sue gays- \"Thiree ob'ubbyq rosy-dheeked. boys, Bob, Jack and D'ick, repectively, are three of our reasons for using and recomnaending the food, Grape-Nuts, for these youngsters have been fed on Grape-NuLs sincicn.u fancy, and often between meals wlicn obbfer children wouId have been givca. candy. \"I gave a package of 'Grape-Ntt to a neig\u003chbor wbo-se 3-year-old chiild w a, a weazened littie thing 91filfftile tillte. The littie tot ate bh' rp-Nt n crearn greedily and the mother continue4 the good. work, and it was not long be- fo're 'a trW~Y vonderful change maii: - fested itself iu the child's face and body. The results vere remarkable. even fo)r Graýpe-Nu.ts. \"Botlî husband and I use Grape-Nuts every day and keEp etrong and welI andl b1ave three of the flnest, healthiest boys yeu can. find in a day's mnarch.\" Many mothers instcad, of destroving the children's etemachai with candy'aî:d cake give thle yeu-ngsters a handful of GCraiPe-NuIts whcn. they are begging for something in the -way of sweets. The re'sut is 60on S'hown. in greatly in- ,creased health, strengt-l and mental ac- -tivity. 'XaMe given by Canadian P4cstum C,)., Winýdsor. ont. Look in pkgs. for the famous lit tle bock, \"The Road to WelleviIle.\", -E. r read the above letter? A new one appears from time to time. They are genuine, true sqdA fi cf hu an in",
         "-Wmnim~, Fdý., 11 Useful' Now Inventilon r modifica. The ides, Ie Weather 3ive te the Who places ns through beorologieal Sjudgment Nie. ou- ws i early for goode Currency, isportation Miflie, shipa Lnd, York entenailan rmed that ai prepared you ail,\" reaeh its this 1'isit the vener- kiing com- rithin the la making is rapidly F remana. iwnwas ffhe writer in flot far 8w weeks L[ want t6 listener, for yeu Mr. Cun- hundred r o 'f very I'n Good iited hum. alght as Efowever, leave the. ýofg, uise- Cluning earliest that dis- Lrry,; his wards as constit- ,gslative wiil b. hlm, the d by the The littie cabin thung like an eagle's nest on the purpie creat of the niountain and our driver raised the whip with which he had been momentarily ffiiking at the team, and pointed to, the erudely picturesque log but. \"Now that 'ere cabin you see up there, that's the 'aunted 'ouse o! Ragged Ridge'\" ho said, boastfuliy. \"Bir-r--r!\" emanated from some of the party, shudderingly. \"Do we paso it in crossing over?\"' askçd the sehool teaciier. \"We do, its ri*ght along the trail. Mebbe we'll see oie Tim hisself too, hein' as 'twill soon bo gettin' dark.\" And Joe llterally smacked his lips at the prospect of giving us \"the shivers.\" Ire was a little Englishman froni Leeds. No ides of encountering sueh an enter- taîning objeet as a spirit-haunted house, liad crossed our miîds 'when setting out in the early morning froni Sandy Plain in Aberta on4 the stage journey to Coal- port Landing in British Columbia, nor did the guide-book coutain any referenco ta it. Undoubtedly tiierefore it was either a fabrication of Joe's fertile brain, or a plemanat little eurprise whi he kept in reservo. The cabin was stiil sevéral -milés distant, thou_'haparg to b. much dloser and we gadwt iu th'e wetern sky, fhiile a restiess wiud bega to moan among the jack- pis. Bain waa ooming. \"la fAiere no way by whieh we oould eut acrostihe trail snd avoid it--the cabinIl'iquired the new Coaport school teaciier, who was inaking the journey for the. fret time aud vowed inwardly it siiould b. the lat-tii the railroad camei. \"INo ma'am-unless by airabip, but don't you worry Tim's sperrit io real friendIyl to lydies.\" Two members of the. party, a -young Ruthenian hoe.teader and bis fourteen- year-old bride bad remained silent tiiroughout. It was doubtfül whether they even vaguely undèetood the. ta.lk. For her going.away gowu the. bride was wearing a white drees made of cuttain net, with accoutrements even more uique-iarge brass-toed boots, durable and-tiick, and a wonderful collar formed of knitted Berlin wool and glass beade, froni the tassol ends of wiiich there danigied elongated glass globules, that gave forth a gentie tinkling, musical aound whenever -the, warer moved, ré- miding _on. fotebl t the old-faaîi- [ouedh liààha1 ë,onmis pop. ni«. ver e âm f axon 1usd waa Enables Anyone to Play \u003ePiano or Organ With- out Lessons À DIttoît muaician bas invented a vonderful new aystem which enables any gero n or little ohild to learu to 'play \u0026eino or organ in one evening. Even t*i you know abeolutely not4iing W»jut mnusic or bave neyer toyuched a c bo os orrgan, you cn o8Iflw learn to play n hiur S r two. People who do not know one note from another ase able to play their favorite music with this mnetiiod without any a«\"stance whatever heom unyone. This new aystem which is caled the lNumeral Mtiiod, is sold -iu Canada by the. Numeral ,Method' \u003e\u0026usic Co. -,of Canada, ands they are'desirous of at once making it known in every locaity, they are makinLgthe following apecial ffee trial aud hIf-price iaffer to our readers. .You are not asked to send any money- until you have tried and are satisfied with the new irethod. The Numeral Company is willing to send it te you on one week's free trial, and you will not have ta pay them one cent unless you desire ta keep it. There are no express charges te be paid, as everytb-ing will be sent by mail. Simply write a letter or post card ta the Numeral Method Music Ce. of Canada, 185B Curry Hall, Windsor, Optario, eaying \"P1easie send me the Numeral Method on seven days' free trial\" If you are sat4sfied after trying it, the Method and fifty different pieces of sbeet music will cost you only $5, al- though the regular price of these is $10. You ehould not delay writing, as the Numeral CJompany will not continue this special haf-price offer indefinitely. Later on, the Method ar~d fifty pieceà of mnuaie will be sold at the regular price. The'Best Part of the. Cake Is its icing- Mapleine F1'\"s an exquisite m1apley\" flavor ta cake frostings and fillings. And for flavoring sugar syrup it la ûnsurassed for goodness and econamy. Grocers Se liMapleine cuat M mufatictnaCoepmay Satth.Wm The Way to BUY ý-JEWELY - YOU will save money, get the most satisfaction and have re- liable goods if you make your selection from o the thousands of catalogues we are now distributing. Our yearly business rune into huit- dreds of thoiisand.s of dollars, so we are buying for mueh legs than the small stores-and you get the benefit, especially in Diamonds. a Remember, if goods received are not as desired, you return goods at our ex])Cfse and we refùnd your mofley. A post card brings our Catalogue and particulars about our $2500 Diamond Ring D. E. BLACK \u0026 Co., Jewelers Calgary **The Houseof Quaity\" Alberta When writing advertisers please mention) The Western Home Monthly. g Frest e*%~~ ..Vr Cae L.m#\"bn L~J~3;E:? .16 ym 'nu OrI*aI Oiy Gorndne *NAW please menieqs 't Tho Weetern HOMO MOnthIy The Ghost of Tim O'Leary Written for T~he Wetern Home MSffly by Udtti G. Bayne 8tem aovelo at work in SpoknmInidng dhUi singled emotions upon it, demanding wound a variegated silk scai, front be- the legend or tale, if there were one. neatli whioh her quaint little face This, Joe was ine way loath ta in- peered forth with a sober and mniat un- part, new that lie had us out beyond bride-like air. Her eyes were largie, the foot-hila aud wliolly ut hie mercy. brigbt and alert, thougli she spoke no \"I1t's oie Ti= \u003eOLeary's late residencel» word and seemed neitot hear anyr of the ho began, turning about at an angle of conversation. Withl ler youthful hue- forty-five degrees, the better ta embrace baud she aliared the middle seat with his audience in the rear seats. \"Tim an English woman of Amazonian pro- was tlie biggest man in these 'ere portions who was go9 gta Fort George, regiens onceime o' the big gold ruh. ta iew out a fortun for berseif as Tim lad anl kinds o' luck. Could rustle lady-seci'etary of a lumbering firm. The, more cattle au\" neyer git pinehedl They school teaciier sud newspaper reporter 'ad a score e' wararnts out fer 'im but ocoupied the. front seat beaide Joe and la no one never cud, ketch 'im. 'ho was that the extreme rear two dour Scotemen slipp'ry! Gold miner le was too but nu-. had disposed themaelves amonget the, body ever cud git a lino on where 'e luggage. cached 'is pile. An' then 'e up an' Beforo hl au n bur hiad gene by, the. croaked!\" cbouds that iiad been gatiiering omn- \"ýHe was rich then ?\" we asked. ously in thie west, were over usaid the \"«Rich! Tii cud put it ail over flrst large drops o! rain uplattered dlown. Croesus. Used ta pitch nuggets into Joe iialted long enough te draw the, aide Moon Lake-y' can see the wee lake blindeaid praduce the oileboth ruga, but ot'he rpesin theoulee-jest ta ,wstch we had scsroely resumed our journey be- tihe ripples Oh l~~~~~~e 'ad a free an' easy fr tbcm vdn htaeom a life-never*in ail 'is if e wore a coîlar, upou us. So suddenly bad it looined up nor ad aBhav--aý-'areut Looed n the afternoou sky tbat wheu the firat nor 'a a isbhe-an'-'ains. oCuoedthunderclap feIl on our ears we started hik a winbrohero' obisonCruoeas at a canuon-siiot, while the herses l e !tepsegrseicdad plunged aid reared. The lightning One of ~ o the gasnes vned.dsr played incessantly over us and Jo. ta, pursue the question o h od lashed the teante pesater speed. £'Oh, 'tain't ne use lookin' up there \"Wliere can we take shelter?\" asked fer it. That's what causes 'is sperrit t' the teacher. walk. There's been 'caps o' people \"Times like tuis 1 gen'rally put inta diggin' an' nosin' round--daytimes. Tim'a cabin,\" replied Joe, calmly, They ain't never found so mucli as a \"Stornis came up sudden-like lu the giint o' gold dust! The sperrit knows mýountings.\" where it is an' keeps guard.\" \"Oh, but-the ghost!\" eried the \"Perhaps bad they gone alb nighit, with teacher, clutching Jee's sleeve, preferring a spade and a; dark Iantfern,\"-began an the danger ef which she knew some- occupant o! the front seat. thing te that of whieh she knew nethiug. But mu prolonged shuddering and teeth- WVe were close te the cubi. chatteriig cut in upon the remark. \"That ghest ma'am revels ln thunder There was silence for a moment or an' lightnia'! 'E ain't a bit frightened. two, during whieh \"ltrk gre.v cloud(s were Whv \"me sav as 'ew they've seen 'im ubservcd f .r the first tirnie - Lpidly rizing up there dancia' an' wavin' o! 'la arms t for? F-Angers a fend le about :\"Thiree \u003eb, Jack e o! our ding the ungeters aince in- is wlicn mn givuli utg to a i was a }iQ tintie. 'uts amil )ntiuiicdt long he- B malE:- fti bodv. ýven fo)r .pe-Nut@ well andt tst boys B;troying, rudy an:d id fui o! ring for L. Vie Ltly in- atal ac- tint C,)., is little A new They mai in-",
         "The Weste\"n Home Mon thly Wbunipeg, .Feb., 1915 1K SEOILI Coughs snd colds do not cail fc ý:rtt2 ta of syrnptoms as they knbwt evervone, but their dan aX »t so wel known. Ail the m uplous affections of the tbroat the lu suad. tht brojclialtubesý are, in the einning, -but coujhs and colda. 1Many people' when they conti a Silght cold' do flot psy any atteni ta iÎt- tbinkng perhaps that it wil Zway. in a day or two. The upsho thatbWore they. know it, it bas set on theirlunge. Todo much stres cannoe be laid on fact that on Uic frst siga of a cougi cold Ituiûst be gotten rid of inmediat ai failzreta do thisma cause year suffèring from =ucsLZun trouble. 1Dm WOD'S NORWAY PINE SYRUF, ,wiI curetUe cough or cold sud pr a preventative front ai tbroat and It troubles. such as bronchitis, pneuma sud consumption. Mms B. Z~ Druce, Brighton, \u003cE\u003e wrtes: -\"j arn sending you my teý mony of your Dr. Wbod's Norway P Syrup, telling you what it did fori little girl. The doctor haît given her as she was, as we thought, going inti decline wit the co1gh she hd. 1 told by a lady friend to try \"Dr. Wood' sud when she had taken two bottlesE was on ber feet again, and four boni cured ber.\" Dr. Wood's Norway Pine Syrup is t best cure for cougbs and colds. It L pst up la a yellow wrapper; three pi trets the trade mark; the price, 25ea 60c; rnanufactutred only by The .Milburu Co., Limited, Tooto, Ont bé*afness'and Catari auOoEU8NULLrT TT NY \"ActmNA\" Ninety-five per cent of the cases of de imess brouglit to our attention is the result W rnic catarrh of the throat and nmiddle e Tbrair passages beconie clogged by Catarr] depoatF aoping the action of the vibrat, ~ lintritheseý deposits are remov relief is impossible. The iz «ar cannot bc reached p ro b ing àsp r a yin, hence thei specialists cessful trez % ~nient for mo fornis of deâ nessa na catarrh is c tuons t r a t e every day1 the lActitvm R. D. he DrumçH Hammer treatiment. TI 4f. Axvil; S. StirrsÉ,* S C Si vapor gent iWmacranaiv C. e0aÀg. ated i n t b «'A c t i na passes throuâ the Eustachian tubes into the miiddle ea removîng the catarrhal obstructions ai loosens up the bones (hammer, anvil an stirrup) in thse tuner ear, making thel respond to the vibration of sound. \"Actina ia also very successful in relieving heau noises. We have known people afflicted wit this distressing trouble for years to b relieved in a few weeks by this wonderfi invention. \"Actina\" h.-s also been ver successful in the treatment of la grippc esthma, hay fever, bronchitis, sore throai weak lungs, colds and headache and othe troubles that are directly or indirectly du to catarrh. \"Actina\" can bc used with perfect safet: by every member of the famlly for an, affliction of the ear, throat or head. A FREI TRIAL of the \"Actina\" is given in everj case. Send for our FREE TRIAL offer an( valuable FREE BOOK. Address Actin Appliance Co., Dept. 84C, 811 Walnut St. Kansas City, Mo. 'o a' singin' some of 'le -wild songe while about three' miles further west, in t the thunder craahed an' the lightnin' fresh wet atillness, we elowed down. 1 D :ashed!» yond the asat range of mountains, t The Scotsmen in the back seat, until raya of a, storm-elear aunset were glar 0oW very reticent, began to thaw. One ing ini long horizontal bars of red-gî \u003c'Mfon! .Ar ye no' goin' to pit in tilt' miles below us in the valley lay Cos i.t'a ower?» port, our destination. 'ýThese 'ere lydies-\" began Joe, shrug- The Scotsmen had maintained a di bir a ging his eboulders. ltn org o creet silence, but Joe turned now ai rae We protested, our ltn org on addresaed thent. Igers iflfg to our reecue. h\"I«t's as good a tinte now, as any, y inost \"Mfon!» exclaimpd the otlier Scot honors, to settle the littie miatter of tl Sscornfully, «if tlere's a banslîee seen by bet.\" be- ony ' o' the pairty wc'11 gie ye aIl a ailler They paled viaibly and clutched the dollar! Pit in, pit in, afore we're pockets, convulsively. But before eitîî àact drooned!\" lîad time to speak, if indeed tbey we: tion This magnificent offer, coming front a able te enuaciate at a\u0026U, a new voice' i p\u0026sson of the benther, stnggered us ail, terpoeed. )t s momentarily. Tt was that of the little Ruthenie tled \"Make it five yer houer, an' l'Il put bride and it was the first tinte she ha in,\" eaid Joe, brazenly. spoken since we had left Sandy Plin the The Scots consuited together. in the early morning. Her voice wasi lit or \"Vell split the odds an' Ca' it twa- sweet as a silver bel-and te t] bely, flfty,\" anaounced the one Who had first Scotsmen must have sounded fully o s of spoken. sweet as a belfry fuill of silver belle. And *e drove under the slight \"I' like de monney firs' rate,\" she said abelter of a grotte of jack.pines by the slowly, with a tinge of wistfulnessi ide of Tint O'Learv's cabin. hier eyea, \"but 1 bet me if you loo \"Go right lu ev'ryhody!\" cried Joe, onner de seat you fln' de ghost!\" and ive scuttled ln out of the driving And truly, there we did flîtd lt--or if 'Ove rain, finding otîrselvea in a dampish outw.ard and visible signa in the for] unge cavo-like, earthy-emelling and extremely of two w-ite linen dîîsters which wer 'a dark interior. tucked away, wet and mud-stained i The pines sighed and bent alniost the extremie end of the wagon, urider th ridouble -thile torrents of ram bat ppon Iigst seat. '' tbe mountitin aide, and began to drip Joe gave vent te a low croonixi l'n through the pine rafters upon us, as we chuckie and fargetful of t-he horseý My stood ln a huddled' group about the open tvbipped those faithful beastsanlong thi UP doorway of the but. One of the mren lat lap of our journey, and spoke ný 0i a struck a match but the wind instantly more te us. The Scots were somewha IP» extinguisbed the light, and we were slow in dove-tailing the littie nmatte she obliged to grope about in search of a together, but at length they turned t, tle dry area, witbin. At every lightning each other and slapped one another up flash however, the interior of thbe cabin on the shoulder, simultaneously, to th, the n'as.illuminated, but it gave bnck no- great delight of the bystanclers at th, iS hn except emptines-not a chair or hiotel where we had just drawn up. '- ane bncb, net even an empty nail-keg n'as short wbispered consultation ensued bie nld visible. Tt gren' darker witbout, and to tween them. and finally tlîey leaned for T. inake matters more weird and awe-in- ward and touehed the littIe bride on ti spiring, a peculiar sound like a Ion' armn. crooning chuekie began te be heard, ln \"Shake 'hands. You've saved oui rh !lie intervals of the tbunder-claps, coin- lives!\" they cried together. Af ter w( back of the btut, w-here one small aper- ing fascinatedly into the palm of hei ture, once a window, showved gray hand and as wve passed along, she shyly eaf against thle gloom. Joe hnd remained, exhibited its contents-two shining ;of as a faithful teamaster sbould, with bis silver dollars,,lier wedding gif t fron t tI ar. liorsea, but sheltered as lie n'as beneath sons of Scotland. ,al the wagon-top we could not see hlm. As for Joe, hie escaped with bis life, ory ed Thus a. quarter of an heur passed. which la saying a good deal considering ner Then, suddenly, without se much as a the fact that hie nearly became a ghosl b\u003e' second's warning an ear-piercing- demon- in earnest before the brawny Scotamer or gacal shriek rent tîte a suad uith heurts had finished with hlm. in- standing stili and the breath sinothered o f in our thtroats we beiteld a white- to ve garbed form in long flowing raiment-, \"Do 1 îînderstand that thie homne teatu a t and with mwlldly-rolîing eyea, pasa wixib- wo by defauît 7\" asked tîe visitor in uc- ln ten feet of the door, waving its tflie outer office. \"Ycs; by (de faîîlt of de ýat ghostly arma and uttering its wveird hoine pitcher,\" explained the office boy. ýf- laugh which n'as haîf shriek. We fell d baek upon one anotilier, ouîr gaze fixed e- urbib vnl io hsaprto n d leigyuo ta piinad A scitool teacher complained to f-lic by' net oîtc of ls capable of uttering a picplteohrdyta ieo h a- syllabîe. The -figure, gravish-w-hiteprnpathotedytltoi fhe le against tie semi-darkness, passed sîowly biog boys w»e flirtiîîg eutrageously witlî r- gn tie epassed, its raiit-soaked gar- day. Tlîie teacher, who came lu ontce a e andke te a- inents flapping like sails iu the wind, h picpal Wk severely t te gh but the spirit beneath unafraid of the' class and eîîded by saying that out of r, elmett. onsîderation for the feelings of the cul- id \"Sliut the door!\" tîte teaclier at prit, ho would net naine him in public. m ength managed te gasp. A h ls ftesesinx, however, he a\" do was elsdwt oedfl te \"one to the principals office for th culty and tite two Scotamen Ieaned theiranntri. be brad bak-s g\"come-one-a ' Yes, yeu guessed it. AIl the boys in 'e brad baks aginat t la the class showed up. ilcome-ail\" attitude, forgetful tîtat spiritq -y e: nîay penetrate the tltickest of mari- iti ade barriers. A flash of liglitning er just then sbowed their faces ghiastly \"Fed and Watered\"l Lie w-hite. Tt makes a Scotsnian feel sick ty te lose se niuch money at one fellInl a certain neigliboerhood tlitere rsd l' %woep, but if tîte faces of the rest of an honeat farnter, tw-lo was net easily E us utere of a sintilar hue it -%as from a swerved from the path of rectitude. He *ydifferent cause. The little teacîter had owned a bei-se wlîîch a couple of traders id jîist resolved to faint aw-ay as gracefully wisied te pessesa. Tlîey ealled on ilie a^s possible w-heu. again -we heard the fariner and after some liaggliîîg gave hilm -,fint c roening souîid behind us. Tbe bis priee and drove off 9ihtîepie -glîost înuîst bave glided ai-ouîîd tîte cabin They had scarceI '- gone flîrce miles to the rear. Nowv -as ouîr chance. We wlten thle horse dropped dead la the wvhispered the word te the dooî-keepera road. and altlîough the idea w-as soinewhat Seeing t-le farnier a fe- days later, slow iii peîetrating te tîteir niinids, after they appreachcd Ibu» iw-tli: \"Wjiat ýijid five ilîlaiites' parley tîiey gi-asped it. of a herse n'as tîtat you seold us the 'lie doni- was fliiig open, and, xegaidless other day 7\" of the' driiiiig - at we boîted onie anud \"A good alli aonnfd liOnre, sirs?' aIl for iii'w ago1Rit utîout a -lanîce be- \"Yes, hecn'asIlie droppe(î dow-n deail hind. Pou-w e elainei-ed inaand urged before w-e get t-l-te mle frelin hoieii1-' Joe te whi-p up )thle linises at top speed The farnier listeiied ini olb-îi-ltioîitlicd anîd w-el-e oni t1let rail agrai n in less titan astoiiishinîent, anid t-ienectitd pn two ifiitit es iloile ofi s afterwaî-d coxld iny wvord ef ,honor, ge-iitlien, lie 'net ci- rem2iiLr.l;- i:uî:w_ ab.dlng iiad doneCtiat ay for ime.\" Royal Victori'oa College McGILL UNIVERSITY MONTIREAL For EBesident and Day Students. Students prepared for degrees in Arts, Pure Science and Music. Seholar- ships are awarded annuaily. For al information apply to the Warden. FDr. Verrnilyea's TOIE-KO M F0RT CURES AILING FEET f25(-, extra large pot, 50c, att Shoe and Drug Stores or by mail POOT-KOMFORT MFPG. CO. 391 Tweed Avenue, Winnipeg YOU CAN BE A NURSE 'I3OritiVelyg., n~ otraîn y-u in youcow i»ýj!,k $2 t Uaweek. Rend for fi-ecataio\u003c ag d lstmted k of \"National Nurses. ' -'t th Bc th ric fii )al ls inc 'ci lei] i in. Wil lad in as ffie as ini rok rn te îe Do at he he A e r ve r- cr ;t n YOU CAN 'LEARN NUSIE Now, in Your Home Special Offer to Our Readers r Think of itl The new SIMPLICITY SYSTEM of teaching music, without the aid of a teacher, right in the privacy of your ow home. owgivea w ever maZwmnadcid, oId o yua opport n, o lera o ltheir favorient -Ru rment during apare moments. You do flot have to0 eknow one note front another-this won\u003cjerfu i system teachea you aimply and thoroughly. The lessons are mailed !eppl for only a few cents a week b y h kITRATIONAL INSTITUTE 0F 1MUSI t.De 355 Intitute B12g., Fort Wa Ind. They have lemeona for bot beginners a advanoed p layers. Theee leusone are so SIMPLE and EASY thst they are recommended te on even a littie ehild. who eau read Engliah. Photo- graphea and drawjnga malle everything plain. Hundreds of enthuuiastie pupils everywhere, f romn 7 te 70 years old, have learned by this auce- fui Method te play the Piano. Organ,\u003e Viol in, Mandolin, Guitar, Banjo. Cornet, Sight Singmg. CeUlo. Trombone, etc. Othera are learming every wek but in order te even more thoroughly intro- duc their SIMPLICITY SYSTENM into every Iocality at once they are màaking this Special Ofler through this newspaper. Ever rederWho wl maili a letter or postal cardat oce tbth address given above wiIIclv all f ree and postage paid, a 48 page illustrted Boolet and f ull explanation of this easy method of teaching music quickly and thoroughly. You need flot hesitate te write; this reliablo Institute is anxic\u003eus te send their Booldet to everyone-to malte known their Sucees8ful Sirstem and thelr present Special Offer and, you will he under no obligation to them whatever. Write your addresa and the naine of your favorite instrument plainly. Rfeca Musto TAUGHT FREE IN YOUR GWN HOME By the oldest and nmut Bohilo Subo e Music.la Aumu.-EutabHh lsS. !W c oft 94\" ffle 1% ~qm\u0026uU! Iodrto Introduce our Home Study Munie Course tnjeour locality, we ofler you. absoluteiy iree. 96 lbasons for etiier ano, Ora4 Violin, Guttar, MiandoUin, Banjo or Cornet. Alr yôu hve iearned te play we are positive tbat you wIl recominend the leasons of the Amerjean ichoolofEutai for either beginners or advainced pupils. Our lessons ane suited to your needs. h mattersufot ifyen do not kouoe1 note from another, our lessons are no simple and eazy that any ~Flronwho can rend Englilh can learn tu play. We #end out jesons to you week]y. and with our ires tultion off, . ouf oui xenel for postage and music yoe-ps*'whieh avegs aiiu=2ce.ta day. Thousands of pupil aU over thor= wite-'Wlvsh 1 had known of your wonderful achool before.\" ,%rite to-dayfor qur convlncing free bookiet which exPlais evryéhng ~rite now to the 0 UI 2 Lakeaide BIdg. Chicago, Mlincie n n",
         "W-Innipeg, Fb.D115 The, Western Home MPon fhly Two Pair of Twinses For W. H. M. by Ida M. Hailiburlon eb., 1915 N sic demur.'- so they led lb. very good little Twins clown to the creek, where the mud was icky and black, and the waler wad gen and imy. Hlem. they bei!LuIt a mdtanad they asked Elieh anad Eijah 10 go for a ride. \"But bow dia» e elM?\" sked both Twins ah once oolu= gaI theur dean pmmne\u0026. Why, *e'R carry you.\" Bo each Elephant Twin took a Kaigaro Twin under ber mm aid carried theun ho the raft. But though the rail would bold oie pair of Twins, il vouldi'l hold two, aid mn a moment, Two Pair of Twinses were dumped in the green anddalimy vater aid were clambering out on the black aid sticky mud. The... weil-behaved Kangaroo Twins were uiot haV no sorry as you would sup- pose whem they found their starched pinniesaR mud adtheir hair aflwet and rumpled. \"Nlow,\" they said, \"W. can't l'tany dirtier, aid we =~ play ail we u. -So the Two Paire of Twinsessat ail the afternoon and made mud pies wihh the black and sticky mud mixed with green and slimy water aid put them in the mmn b bake. Then tbey sat down and buried thefr feet aid legs ini the stichiesft mud tbat was left, and so thefr mother's found them. But I'r n ot gomg to tel you the rest. Some ieople lilthe story 'usl alarts here 1Tba1t was an ideal marriage, was il not?\" \"It certainly was. He couldn'l sE ord to buy a car, and sbe waa not able to keep a chauffeur for hers.\"-Baltimore American. Slow Sho Sot Even A Wesl Bide young woman was cora- missioned by lber father the other day to buy some neekties, aaye a writer inithe ChicagoReoord-II.rakLd She thought she knew exactl what lie wanted. 8h. was mse knew wh.t ube wa ted L im bo have, and in an yvenîdie nol need the assistance of thi ec. lb.theclerc Lad a gret demi of advlce b giv%,and he gave itin a fippal, agpes- sive manner wbich was moot obnoilous bo the young woman. Finally Le brought out a Uine of gorgeous Amots. \"There,\" h. said, wfth an impertlently knowing amile, \"I'm surehe'il l ie o0f thoee. AUl 1he youcg men Me ts lb... The gHr glsnced at them bdlfe»yei and then atthe young nýan asif *e saw him for the flrsltime. -\"(À1, beasuo as y'oung as you are.\" ah. smid. illels a fwm mai.\"? 'eaders Y SYSTEM If a teacher, e. now gives 'rite U.atru-. neot have to wonderfu 1 ughly. The few cents. a rITUTE 0F rort Wan inneru aà mo SIMPLE AJamn. evryhere. thia Bucce88,. gaR, \u003eViol in. ght Singing. Srmg e\"er ughly imtro ifito eer ;pecial IWffer Sr or posfta 1 wiII receive y method of Inatitute as ne.to malce îeir prement 3\u003e obligtion m~ and the [Y. IEE N E ' d lues. b or Conet. rlessons are 3ot knov one miay that any ai offer. your lch avelagel rer the world hool before.\" lch expiai [UBIO mlinois w.i el rofTw r insalready T\"in\"theTown of Trees. Theywere Mrs\u0026 Kaigaroo's Twins, and ah. bd brought them up very carefuly. They neyer soiled their clothes; they Dever tore them. They neyer raced or rcmped no their fur waa neyer rumpled or their cars neyer out of order as you someimes meo roIl-lckng, frolicking Kan- garc chuidren get 11her mother, Mrs. Kangaro, washed and combed them each morning and they ust on a benoh in the aunihine or walked in the ~ad~e until lunch. Then th\"y took off thear pinnies and took a nap. After their nap they sang songe or learned verses until tea lime and aiter tea they went to b.d. yes,, indeed, Ibis Pair of Twins were Very, very wel-behaved, they were very demure; and they were cailed Elisha and Elijah. Nov, vhenever any of the mothers in the Town of Trees waited to know any- thing about raising children or vanted a pinyt\u003eattefli, they visited Mms. NKairoo, Whoiked to give advice and Iend pinny patternu and whose T'wins were so very *very weil-behaved, so0 very demure that they were modils for aWthe cher children in th. Town of Trees. Now on. day Mrs. Kangaroo heard thal there ver. nev people corne 10 live in tb. Town. These people, the Elephanta, had a pair et Twins, of rolli\"lig, frolicking Twins. But day aller day passed, and Mrs. Elephait did flot corne t1 her for advice nor for pinny patterns, and Mrs. -Ksigaroo began 10 feel Very ligbted for she wanted 10 tel Mrs. Elephant boy 10 raise Twine. So oie day ah. put new starched pinnies on Eliaha ad Eli*ah, sud aller telling them theyimuot b. very, very veil- bebaved, thUymuaI b. very demure, ah. took oie by eshLaid and starled out 10 cSl on Mrs. ElTpant vith 1h.e frolikig, rollicking TWins. Sh. looked very dimifed-vashe valked alon ith Lan T wnbyoie Laid and- an Elijah Twin %ythe oter and ber eye glassdang- Jig. ey waflked along s0 nice1 that their 1huile taillamade careful r Llike thii~\"w4 1h sad.If tbey Lad been frolickiig, rornc1dnq Twins, 1k tb. Elephant Twins Iher tail lracks would havé looked iik.tis-'--and Mis. Kangaroo would have been asaared of them. Now Mms. El. phait who Lad finish.d ber dinner, and 'had sent ber rollicking, frolicking Twîins out to play, was taking a nap. h. rose when Mrs. Kangaroo knoLdaid bastily pusbed a'- wbole trunkful of soiled Vinnies under the bed for ber naughty Twins Lad been rgllickdig and frolicking witb the laundry bag bel or. tbey weît out. Then ah. opened the door and Mis. Rangaroo introduoed her Twins. Both Twina curlsied aidesat down. They srnoothed down Ibeir etarched p ines, f olded theïr Laids in their laps and began to be ver, very weil behaved, very de- mure as their moîber had told them. Aler waiting a log liii.for Mms. Elephant 10 a*icadvice wbicb ah. did not, Mms. Kangsooased1 see the Twins wbo carne wbei they were cailed, looking very, verysoiled. Mms. Kangaroo put on ber e e aid asked heir names. Mrs. Elep ant saysIIIcal tbem Dot and Dimple; but Ioe short, I cal Ibis one Twinkly Toes, because sh. is so active on ber feet,\" Novwbile ber mother talked, Twinly Toes kept lookiig at her, feet and twirling ber tomi the sand. III cal Ibis oie Twiddle Thumbs because ah. is so baîdy witb ber fingers\" and ail tb. lime Twiddly Thumbo kepIt t*Ïsting lhe corner of a very soiled pinny. «\"Now my dear Dot aid Dimple,\" said Mrs. E1'ehait,-you,,may lake Elwba \"O,\"' said Mrs. Kangaroo, \"My dear Twins neyer play, but they rnay go out for a littie walk, if tbey walk ini bbc shade.\" So the Two Pairs of Twinses started out aid the bwo mothers seltled down for a good talk.. But Twinkly Tocs and Twiddle Thumba rouldn't bear ho walk in the shade; they BimaPly could not be very well bebaved or Is Your Boy Hard on StockhIngs? Of course he is!1 Every healthy, norma boy I\u0026. Buster Brown Stockings stand the wear es they are mnade of long fibre cottouz spéédally twisted and tested for durability, with a speçaUy knitted double leg and three-ply heel and toe. They are fast dyed in Black and Leather Shade Tan, shapelyand excellently finished. DUSj\"E t B ROWN STO GOS Girl, Too- Butter DrowauSistoru Stockluq for the girls la a ulud lIookn stocklng at a moderato pre,\"- twothr\"bnad E h eeud . Me etocMagt, that le abaped te etau veamru \"nwa Ildoad. Color-Dlah. Leather Shada Taa, Pi\"a, Blue and lWle.. \"\"Look for the. label BUSTER BROWN You will save money and abolish darning troubles by buying your boys Buster Brown Stockings. They cost no more than the ordinary7kind. Your dealer carrnes them. raqt .PtrB *90iur trjers u Olauaba fîmittt (hntartu MILL.S AT HAMILTON AND WELLAND, 0 IARIO Aloo niakers of the eelebrated \" Lttle Darlinum d\"it. as\"Haur o at u hid. D1i . TilAlr The-L:USr1PIOWN STOCKIN\u0026 FOR~ SANTA CLAUS ' BUS TER. 16 P.0 N holar- 'or al 1. RSE imIrJY.Tu MI .L -mottn",
         "il: -S The WWsuxpeg$ome IWon1015 For tho Boys and Girls Ta be lothed cor- rectly in of vitalun- ', Iceta your chu.. . , =.-ure wool wear prevente chills and lai-s te oundations of bealth. Clothe vour Bosand Girls wth jage throughout. Combtnations, Voi. Pants, Dravera,7«1 Enittod Suit., Sweat.ers 4Caps etc., etc. A flyilloitrntm drota- lgue and Dr. Jaeger's Realth Culture NMI be ment free on application o% Toronto Xontreal Winnipeg \"Incorpor-atepd in England in 155ý3 with Britijah Capitil for the British Empireý.\" la Io H ta SAVE HALF - The Cost of Vour Dresses Make yaur dresses ai home- using a HaIl-Borçhert Adjustabie Dresa Fora for the fiting on. Save haif the expense of tailor mnade gowns, and sacrifice notbing in appearance. HAL6-SBOCHEtRT Peulection AchustaUe DRIESS FORMVS Learu what you can do with one of theseinexpensive forma. Write for tooklet O\"Dressmaking Madle Easy\"-lr is FREE HaEI-Borch.rt Dresa Form Co. of Canada, Ltd. UN Lombard St. Toronto, Ont. The Market in Jamaica, W ritten for The' Western Home Monthlv hv Jessie B. Dixon bask-ets wbich hold about a bushel; what stances if she bas, she must leave himi in a pictrresqle group t bey make withi their the tionkey vard where ho nihhles ai t he colored col ton rlresses,t lietlull green of the fodder tilt sbe is ready to go borme again. baskets aind the shade trees behind thern. Me are accustomied to seeing the meni The colored womien do ail their carryîng doing the most of the marketing in the in tbese baskets, whether tbey are going North but the woînen do ail in tbis Island; lu miarket to sel their produce or to buy she also works in tbe fields for ber hotise- for fheir own household or the white keeping is verv liglbt a srnall bouse or but people for xvhom they work. about eight by teini feet is bier bomne. If the country wornan bias a donkey, an-dd merely a place of protection froîn tbe rmin, she is considered in very good circum- and at other timies the outdoor life. FOR SORE ~MUSCLES Spraias.Wrenches, Paîntul, Swoiien Vrins and Glands, Bursai Enlarge.. ments, or any Jrn. fa mmatory Condi- tion. Use and Prescribe It i1q a \u003e1gh grade liniment t that \u003c a19 n aîaaa.aîttv ATI. SEPrI(' aand GESI i r E. i ,\" k it l , llininleta \u003citi l OLiLL I tlsi ll U i lil M\"-a tt oti Ii tl Iart to un \u003c1 1î t d a,. - ,greany reidue. AI3~pu ,aîa i FOR THE DAILY HURTS Absorbine, Jr., is acedud daily ili i ad about the home. For t l îl i bruises-for the mnany fit tie buit s tilîit corne througli wot k in the kitclîcn atid about the bouse, the stalal--a*'ftae garage, a nd the ground s. Kee i it ta lian\u003cd. Absorbine, Jr., is sold by le:tdirit drugtgistsî at$1.00 four outîce and $2.mtlvu~c 0oaau'e bottie, or selit dir ect, clarles laid. Sîtd10 y-asfaî i i alhM1trial hi? cuare regtttaaî- lize ira t, i r riti t. W. . Young, P.D.F., 509 Lymnan's Bidg,, Montreai, Canada One Dolar pays for 10-M\\E SIONTHLY foi' Twelve M\\onthîs. Tfie J1 -î-:î ît- aliie :ix îf tll-.~ \" ta !i1 0 to tl fritti :î fi la-a. L I . i Iti ah o g aval(ia1an f l laat'B W 1 MIin l t mdiai es thS rii ge look iing C:îtalîles; lte11 1rinicip1ît 11ii g is lare t %\\ xxlien il h iS i as' orti : t l'e insid-' ha silo\\\\-xvii e itlsis Ille W iita ' lie chitia nd î I solr lirlts triila fassI i f tIlle ill fatlliriatil t11t :11111 pfit iI1ri ottit l t t-h ) lt - lt1 of-atIlt a trî 1 o i î 1hrt ii fa xa ti.. -aia, ai f f!'ut lt i\\ ta,Il îr t - - -a!-li- t i l I Stre-et Saoee, 1Malaket Dayi w irLt vg wijýthbasket ou IL,.- Ia_1 a' o 1c FIS Excels as a Food Produci If ',u l'v fiI nWinter send your ordn t)v stbisliedIlou 1W\" renot ishb1 ddlers. We sel fhsi1 t tlkr car round. Eatalililed for ovr2 years. Our Pr; ce List s free City Fish Market Dept. 8 Winnipeg, Man. SONO POEM S I 1ig ittala t \\ ltiat aOal' ta a st-a la , perietta a tlin- OU I!- a a Ila i îaiadîlun aial e-. rai~ ~ ~ ~sn dolaaOtl -a tliis mair song Poerns or Oit-IOla da \u003cta vrîte I-tjiaactive bookItý f ~. flrka.Goi0tjr~ e rpt 8j, Wush., D. C f;t ~;; ~ 'a 's ,t .4 ,,aa %its ~ '-I. S- s, f t-' t.. \u0026 I. ji ,t1~ t' ça* a a a * a I.. J s Tho Slow, Sluggith, Torpii AoIioN el the Liver is RespoIsible for Many likI. Mfilburn's Laxa-Liver Pilis stimuIate the sluggish liver, dlean the coated tonnue. sweetcn the obnoxious breath, cleaix away ail waste and poisonous matter frorn the systein, and prevrnt as well as cuire ail complaints arising front a liver which has become inactive. Constipation, sick headache, bilious hieadache, jaundice, heartburn, water brash, catarrh of the stomaeh, etc., al corne front a diatordered liver. Mr. Victor B. MeNcilis, Sandstone, Alta, writcs: \"I thought 1 would wril.e and tell you of my experience with Milburn'q Laxa-Liver Pis, as 1 amn greatly pleased with the resuitq 1 re. ceived by using them. I was trnubled withi sick headache for a long time, and jwould get so sleepy right after I ate my dinner thiat I could flot do any wvork. A friend of mine, from Toronto, vlsited me ,laqt summer and he asked me to try M1lburin's Laxa-Liver Pis. He told me thcy had done hlm so much good for his stomach. I used several vials, and 1- found they did me so much good that 1 can recommend them to any -one sufer. ing front liver trouble.\" Milbiirn's Laxa-Liver Pils are 25c a vial. 5 vials for Sl.OO, at aIl dealers, or mailed direct on rcceipt of price by The T. 'Milburn Co., Limited, Toronto. Ont. HAVE YOU A BAD LEG With Wonnds that discliargef ormotherwjse. lerhaps surrounded wath inflammation and swoilen. that when yo press your fnger on the in- LUme part it leaves the impres. sMon? If go. under the skan you b ave poison. which defies ail the remedies you have tried. Perbaps your knees are swollen. the joints being ulceratedîthe same with the. ankles.rouodwhicb the akin may bedis.. t coioured, or Ibèrs may be wounds; the disease. if eliowed to tinue. will deprive ou of tipower to walk. You may he.v attended various bospitala and been tld your care ja bopeless, or advised osbi to amputation. but do nat. for 1 mce a o. don't say perhaps, but1 il GRASSHROP PER 219 ach.SeeTrade Mark of a Grasshopper Ca a Green Label. Prepared by ALBERT. Albert House. 73 Farringdon Street. London. Enalad. loc 511k Remnants ,I or ut îkin, Crav ~Quits, ',uf Cuabot ldsi )r( 111 1ý,Good sî.'c pieves. Bt-ad, qtnality. Large package 1lOc. 3 for 2.5c. Unaolicited Testimonials List of Specialties Free The John Hopkins Sales Co. Dept. A. 721 ABBBUBN ST. WflIIFG V-1, iniý The Western Home Afonthly",
         "v i ~1~~ \"\"s Winnipeg, Feb., 1915 heads; thîs n\u003c'iils tliit th ut'\u003ciaitities areV ema\" thouigh iany %vomîen niax briîîg a littie of several art jeles. 'flie culored people are only liolîlers of sinal parcecs of land wliehlitie l u u(Io ot 11a * vis t'tlt iv:at to the gi'eut st ext ent. I Ilie Nwuliîei tire ail wcaring cotton guwns t b1tluat once been bright and gay but 1t ruiltval souis and e-b., lo 15 IAolioig et Many IIb. ; stimuat .ted tongue, dlean away îr from the as c'ire ail 'which has IM, water h, etc., al Sands toue, Fould write ence with as 1 amn ultq 1 re~. s trnuibled time, and I ate My work. A o0, visited me to try He told i good for vials, and good that )ne suifer. are 25c a ealers* or 'e bY The into. ont. Sellers of Markct Baskets colors. These baskets are the choicest thiuîgs of all t he native indusi rvani we carried :miay a few fiee JciIiefns,. St iii ill alioller j \u003cltt\u003c e S ýuoe broonis, nflt e k k-n nuw inade of corti, but of patin leaves too, of about thLe saine shlaîe as, thle basket, 11(l slî:ped like a big tâss(el. Iliese are not use( t o swep car- Pets for no carpets are used tiiere, but to swCCJ) verandas and\u003c1 (our varîls. In the homes of thle Wlitc eupole*l.lie(t flours prevvail ; thle flour is stained xiih sonie of thelt' Utive îlvexvoods if it is not of bard- xxods, i heupolishled witlî 1!we juive of bitite\u003cr oranges rubbed 111) vii h tle mit er siieli of the c'omme wi h ~ic i.-4 a fibrous Anîk .îd sI ili anther place w'her'e bats V'gi al The Western Home Monthly Preparing to go home can be bouglit, fancy, millinery in a mar- ket, aLso of native manufacture though onlv worn by the coloreti peuple. In flic covered part of thîe market we find fish, meat, agricultural seeds, or we would say fanm seeds, tol)acco in ropes of an inchi in thickîîess and two cents boys a yard, sornetiînes a drygoods stand( with articles likely to be bougl by thle tcountry womnan. The ineat dues flot look a bitt appetizing though quit e good, :as no0 nivalt is off erel off the hoof tweluîv-four liotrs. Fish is much more used uàd superior ini every way. The w.it er.s of t le esO uply soîne very fine spec-iiens, tlhe s.tIt -wvit er herring of course, lobst ers, oysî crs, but 1 the fines;t. is the redl suapper- a fish av- eraging tw~o feet in lengt h xit h a brilliarit s('arlet skin and sniow white flesli. Turt les froin whiclî the genuine green t urt le soup is made., Sonie of thesc gruw to an imi- mense size soîuîetimes weiglîing a hunde an(t fifty puund.; fronn thle shite11of their back our finest qualitv of tortoise Aheli is made. M\\arket is usuail!v over bv flic carly -afternoon and prepairations a're mrade for the long walk homne. If our ni.irket woman desires something to cat she leaves the market and goes out on flic street where she eani find so-nteone near selling a lunch frorn a table in a slia(y spot. Two cents, four, six cent.. will box'.,11ilsite needs of fried fislî or vegetable, an;d bread, very clean and al)l)et izing in appearance as the seller ifts the clean white lotlh that cuvers it. There are nuohlunch counters or even restaurants in this Island. Tiiese miarket places are found in ail the towns aiid Kingstown, the capital, bas t lie sit ta t etl in differen, p arts of the city. Donkey yard for Jamaica marke IT PAYS TO BUY New Pure Seed of the Highest Type To Supply Pure Clean Seed is our Business We have the Stocks -We have the Quality- The Prices are Right The seed shortage question is an acute one, it requires reflection and forethought. Many farmers are rio doubt considerably exerciscd about their secd gra n for te comting season. Recogni ig the eorous dmand for seed w e have set aside thousands of bushels of our choicest sted stocks w lich w e offer to the farmers at farmers' prices. Thiis seed lias berri scientifically grown. carefully inspected atid critically rogued. A close examination of Our Quality ivill reveal dit McKenzie's Qats, Wheat anîd Barley have lîrcl selected to a High Standard, îlot \u003co thieir low price. WRITE FOR OUR SPECIAL SEED GRAIN PUBLICATION SPECIALLY SELECTED SEED OATS-WHEAT--BARLEY Prices quoted are on quantities of 10 bushels or more. Add 25c. for co'ton bsg, each two bushels wheat. Add 20c. for cotton sack each 22 bushels oats. When ordering quote stock No. Stock Price per bus. atl Stock Price per bus. at No. Brandon-Calgary No. Brandon-Calgary WHEAT, Marquis .....140 $1.40 I OAT, Victory............ E86 $ .85 $1.00 OAT, Seger.............. E87 1.10 1.25 O AT, Garton's No. 22. E35 .83 .85 QAT, Banner............ E80 .90 .90 BARLEY. Six Rowed . E91 .98 .98 OAT, Abundance........ E84 .83 .83 1 POTATOES, Early Ohio E92 1.45 1.70 A POSTCARD WILL BRING OUR LAl\"6GE ILLUSTnATED SEED CATALOG No. 25. Beans-Golden proved ..... 48. Beans-McKenzi les......... 122. Beet-M c K en Early ... 124. Beet-Covent Ga 175. Cabbage-McKer crn Favorite 176. Cabbage-M c X Copenhagen I 203. Cabbage-D a ni Ballhead .... 229. Cabbge-Danish 280. Cabbage--D a ni head Red .. 307. Carrot-McKenzi Gem ........ 315. Carrot-St. Valri 339. Cauliflower -M Early Snowcal The Prizewmnning Garden Selection We Recomimend Pkt. Oz. Lb. nIo. Pkt. Oz. Lb. Wax lm- 368. Celery-Brandon Prize. ..$ .10 $1.00 ...... $ .05 $ .30 477. Corn-McKenzie's North- ie's Match- ern Success............. .10 $ .40 ........05 .35 543. Cuc-mbr-M c K e nzie's n zie's Extra ProF fic.................. .10 .25 1.75 ........ 0 $ .25 1.75 549. Cucumber-Fordhook White ;arden....... .05 .10 1.35 Spine................... .O5 .15 1.30 cnzie's North- 682. Letuce-M c K e n z ies ...... 10 .35 Prairie Quecn........... .05 .25 Ke n z i e's E84. Lettmue-Mr.y King........ .OS .20 Market ..--. 10 1.15 (-S. Le tuce-1 \",berg.......... .OS .20 i sh Sommer 717. Leuîiee-P'a-is Whbite Cos. .05 .20 ....... 10 .75 831. Onion-McKenzie,'s Giant ;h Ballhead. .10 .30 Pcrfec-tion Globe........ .10 .30 2.75 i s h Stone- 8à4. Oni n-M c K e n z i es ....... 10 .40 Sclected Red WethersFe!d .05 .25 1.85 ie's Garden 929. Par5ley-Champion M oss, ....... 10 .25 1.75 ci rled.................. .OS .20 1.55 ry.......... .05 .20 1.75 951. Parsnip-Manitoba Prize.. .05 .20 1.35 4 c K e nzie's 1016. Peas-Quite Content....... .05 .50 p........... .25 3.25 Write for our prices on TIMOTHY - BROME- WESTERN RYE - MILLETS - SPRING RYE -SPELTZ -,-APE _FIELD PEAS -FIELD CORN - CLOVERS -- ALFALFA Get our special Planet Jr. Garden Tool Catalog. Write for our large illustrated Cyphers, Incubator and Brooder Catalog A. E. McKENZIE BRANDON, MAN. CO.- LTD. CALGARY, ALTA. Western Canadas Greatest Seed House 10 is W I I I J man washings have subdued their b ilancy, for eleanliness is a characteristic of these people and fashion plays nu part, the bandana still holds ifs oxvn tlîough bats enjoy some favor. In another p)art of tbe market we find a varied collection of baskets useful and ornamental for the basket is the chief carrving receptacle of the Island. They are ail native industry and ma(de from woven palin leaves, the natural shade of the leaf is a creamy yellow and by (lyIeing somne of tlhe leaves a brown and others a tawny yellov a pleasing design is woven in. The native lye woods of the Island supply these A 'EG press your A part il if :o poison. lies Tou mees are erated .the unidwhicb or ther. ease. if Il deprive o walk. vanrous your carle o subirai ot. for 1 it 1 wil. r of ER a certain \u003elcerated SSnake .lit*and opper Ca r. Albert nants Its, ',uf i Il OTES iliblica- 1. f'ig Wv .lin- ii.lud. ajse- emns or SPECIAL CASH DISCOUNT OUR GARDEN SEED PRICES ARE POSTPAI D WE CA\"SAVEVYOUý MONEY ON VOUR SEED ORDER The Larger the Order the More You Save Seo Page 5 of Our Large Catalog",
         "The. Western Home monthly Wiaapeg, F.b., 1lm mes Chronio 4B i rstmuentadi A\"xet-- %W Mdet cmlby DL Cli..' OMUM k»w é bout Dr. (Uas'.Oint- iOâm, OMMsdt-fr marn faug «M. for ..-~'M Md OMM\u0026 4au «\u0026Mlr m. lThe - »wval \u0026\u0026\u0026i Mdao*bdg iàenxd de hW Sut\u003ce\u0026 H - of etthse h~rhmib nres r. e'. intment W uizva ernl for mre, sid «R« 0*htwm a1gpo\"e me aen t. lied. mm\"\u003clte*oMy 4t I i quit. ~~ vaIa.v i ve Ush oRe\"t te Dr. *mi tmen we«»mreom-. tUsae e a£ve.weesOld luLy: .mme.-Wsacem ingon, Rivet John R.d, GiWie Oom\u003ety, NB., wrftee:\"My' -Itth 9m 40* keceemm when die Was uv wee id Thou*h vo dootored 'lorun- 4fl abe #snearly a year ol, se Sot ano 1 w»r Iva advised to use Dr. (ase'. CiUnmt-aud 4iis*etment nompleteiy GETYOUR FARM HOME Ru. tlu CANADIAN PACIFIC A m am ar smof eh. mcus fuSillandla W.a \"Ce»\"dafer mJe ri lmpriShmsud auvMemin, tanhgfrom 11.00 50 O MWfor fwpUl !-as-wmt.idoua Wae. Wu fi hlins y oioptwdty 0o i\u0026oereyu od dho Ir. W. EUSUELL, LamaAgent, »\"8,DsMinamnece f at\" l aonm C.P.\u0026I, Whinpe SIPERFLUOUS HAIR Oio\u0026I a*. I\u0026W ff. Pl. W luin,, IW u mnDw mnguTmou M sEip «à\"met ofitcure e dltelnlbdgrowth Of Supeiluons flair. af- :er2-d hlrean- ofuas hu îo a, =P=.thar ot It Lha neVer returmed.\u0026 o iah tedeetsoy. quit uuetng yur mney pasteu and lquide, or these \u0026\" euS esea FM SOUPON e\u0026er OfeetM Home Kgont 0m mkna .. omletleii .tuone for thbugeahht tuprlu aEeIr. l1'entwllh2catwmp = (tou\u0026 n i n teyour lettes. Good for OlMM\"âL lMTINhW. mn»WMul M\"e ve lady ho VI\" l»ÊqàiMaftureolngunquMrae\" LOSSES SURELI PRVD er Outtu'sBimlePilla. Low- BLÀC Ve fnd oihblsoe- WW.d hi I0.deuspige. lees Pilla 61.00 CSeaasêIgFlI i nter .50 la... M 10 p I; ls.3 p . eINt. «Use sa\" Injctrbu Ctt aebp MdtaniatrmneLt Eqvery package dateci. unusecipu xcsneble for treeh efier date on package. De airt u e ld veeine \u003cours or eny oer\u003e as l aftords leus Protection than fresis. Iat o utter'a. If sinobtainable. order direct. end check or IL 0., we pay chargea andi ship premptly. Vaccine mandInjectors Pea duty f rme. li C UTTER LADGRAToaY. Berkly. Cailfoala. ora .e2o .. .4 lf. o. e = àCis. The- Fairy Godmother WdttM for ne WesterHorne Mouthly by W. R. Gilbt,, Calgary. S h. vas no longer inh e eyfirst iyoutii, but \"h.vwuatMm yungforailthat, and vygracefulasud aweot, sud moot pepl W agusupenone tact: that lier face vas ova1din *pale,* sud 'or l'air vws brown, with eyes te match. And ah. wrote sngpi--tl'e moot deligl'tful littie soga ou .n nagne; andthis Suenabehml'r lv. i te charming littie house in Suusex most of the year round and te surround heseif tl a numaber ok thingsauch l'as l'r artistie soul loved- bita of rare china, piotures, and l'oeesud there eue caugl't the. glearn of beaten silver and pewtor vl'en a ray of sun carne alanting into l'or pretty sittig-roorn as it did on a certain atteînoon in late ëep- tombe-ano \"Indian summer\" atternoon. It mad.el'or look very frile and van hovever, sa sah.lay on hl'o oucl'- and i you l'md looked carefufly you ;ould have notioed l'ov vieul the. oxpression of l'r oyes roaily vas\u0026 .8he bail, as h happe ebot ring a great deal teo bard, foiovin -g on a nasty toue' of \"flue\" smre montha previously, sud the. result bail been a pretty sevore breakdown. Now she vas convalescent the. day. .seened 'te bang rather l'eavily Mi e of the'presence cf a amaU Zsd mueMove niece, vas- stayrn \"i witl' l'or vlile l'or siterthel'a a lpors' rnotl'er, vas abroad USt' l'r l'usand Just now the itte lady, wl'oe nr was Betty ,appeared -toel'e deefly en- grosd i Iýtank of rooking a Te dy bear te aleep. 8h. at cuddled up in a far cornu- of the roorn,-surrounded l'y the imnae of a Noah's ark, anid a battered dolly, crooniaBog in hersoft little voice, sud rocking herseif te sud fro. The ipicture vas a very ploasia no The artaouSM c aàunt yetbeuifIroorn and the .rornnthe. gardon, brmnging the 0et omrignonette, sud toucblng the gm' f i. bles urla, sud flickering nov udten on the lbase vite gown of Carolyn West, as ah. Iloy on the couch, talng tea girl who had cornei te tea. \"Yeu knov,\" the. visitor vas saying, rn1 l'or noft, rnrry voico'l simpïly don't know hov onearteh mgomtoet everytbmin miI've heapo f hingB te de before tl'e-before Thursday! And so rnany people te sec. But I did vant te corne in sud bave a chatowitl' you, Caro,i before Igoaay o -'. npy\"ebn the tirne. gIvawiBh'you'dl'veil nougl' to come te myvoddingl I1 Yoeu1 rely von't h.? Don't youtin Carolyn's eyes grev absent Wus for a moment. \"ýNo,\" she said. \"I'd love te ûL a way- but,y ou know- I mesu, Phyllis, that I t sim 4lycan't stand veddings. 1-\" ahe t broke yoff rathor suddenly; and the girl i put down l'or cup sud saucer.t \"Just vhy,\" she said softly, «if you'fl M forgîve me for asking? There genemllyN is smre reasoim, isn't there? I don't know why, but sornehov, l'y. nover liked to ask you exaetlI'; yet I'y. been fearfully eurious--and-' The hostes miled a rather twisted smie. \"Oh, yes,\" ash. saïd. \"There h a reasan my dear. This: I ought te have p hada wddig myself;and we-I didn't tl'at's ail!\" p \"«Did he-die?\" ssked Phyllis softly. \"Oh, no!l\" Caro's voice vas rather absent, too, as veil as l'or eyes. \"'It was quit. su ordiïiary commonplace little story. He vas su acter\u003e sudmy people tl'ought it vas a cms of infatuation. W. voie botl' absurdly young, y ou see, sud vo could have vaited. But they wouldn't hear of it because thoy voie very old- fashioned, and had a violent prejudice against tho stage. \"Wo bad noither of us suy rnoney, sud vhen the wholo t.bing came out there vas a rnost fearful rov; sud rny fathor told birn to go away, sud nover dare to show bis face again. You see, it's quite the usual sort of story one meets with in fiction.\" Phyllis slipped a syrnpathetic hand inte the other worn's. \"And did ho go?\" se.asked, vith inter- est. Wornen are always interested in a love storyl \"£Yos.\" OÇa.rolvn squeesed the .alim little fingera. «Oh, yes;hliebadtk7 Ho vas forbidden to write to me, and ho would.flot consent to a clandestine corres- pomdernoe. He vent abroad4and 1 nover sav hirn agaili. That'a aldeai. We left London, and-I don't knov- ho got over it, 1 suppose?\" i wish1\"»Jaid the girl, 4tbfat you could di ttI ami\", nid Camo brightly. \"There isrny vork you know; and oh, heapa of things! I suppose becase1kam flot veil now V've got miorbid. Fi'n lonolY at tirnes and--? Phyllusro. \"WellIws\" said she, \"that the Prince ;oul corne just like tbey do in faky tales.\" '¶airytalesIl saiCamo West uighinff in spite of her'amie, \"neyer corne truol' But the doparting vistor laughed and \"re a littie pink, bocause ahe vas tink- mng of sommoe. .Oh yes they do-sornetimest\" ah. maid î vis, as she vont out. There vas a shortpause, and then a littie figure, with a Tedy bear tucked under one arrn, l'r brown eys .ooin out frbrna'nua ôf tngogold sîded-up. \"Pleas,\" asd the rnail voice, with a vory wheedlin note in it, \"vant '00 to tell me firy story.\" \"Wby, rny baboet\"-the eyes of Cazir were vert'likes \u0026tty'\u0026-\"I tho tyou ]lesAeloo Well, ancohie up here by me-that a it. A fairy story? 1 don't think I knov one- net a proper one to-day.\" A coaxing moutl' touobed ber cbeek. And of course, the fairy tale had te lbo told. You sec, yucntrsa mi osn vith gold curls cand brownmoyes, sdna nMouth like a fioyer, if tl'ey are perfectly good-as tis one vas. \"WeHI there vas onc3e a princoass \" \"And a pwrnce!\" interpolâted the lis- .tener firrnly. \"0f course! And they vois going to five in a beautifiil castie-\"' \"Where?\" demanded Betty thought- fully. And Carolyn looked out inte the sunny garden-at a bec buzzing about soine stocks. il tbink it was in-Spain,\" said ahe. And added: \"You see, tl'ey vois building it up, thoy had got noarly balf-way witl' Lt1 and thon it tumblod te the ground with a l'ig, big crash. And the Prince had t% go away u the Princes as left \"B'!utthýe ce,\"' said Betty aniously, \"corned l'ack?\" \"I-I don't know!\" said the story- tolier, with sudden weariness. 'i1-don't tbink so. But we'il finislh the story another day, Auntie is so tired. Run into the gardon, darling, willou? There's a good girl suai U wie I sleep. I'm s'ery tire now.''1 Betty slid dovn to the ground. \"Wiibe ve'wT good,\" she announced. \u003cAI-ayh àoo.' e she laid her softj iti ae against Caro's for a second.I 'Ouldn't it muake you quite quite better, Aiuntie, if a pwince corned Ïor you?\" And \"Auntie\" turned over on the pillow with a queer smile. \"Perhaps,\" she said. \"Now go sud play, rny sweet, and rernember flot to go out of theogarden.\" Butterfiies were flitting about, bees were hurnming drowsily from flower to flower sud Betty, with the Teddy bear tucked undor her arm, decided that a garden was an ideal place. Sho industriously picked a handful of daisies, and then half-way across the grass she stopped. For-w ha t vas that? Betty stood, head on one side, listening intently. Surely it was music? How queer! The sound of a string band came float ing over from some adjoining grounds; the violins were throbbing out a waltz. It vas entrancing! Could the fainies be hidden away in the greenery of that other Veat garden on the opposite side of the hdg raking that vonderful music? She gave a tiny wnriggle of joy, and ber foot moyen to the lult of it. 0f course she didn't know it, but in those grounds there happened to l'e a SUFFERED WITH LAME RACK@ OuNmma* dl t*tu p Fo pain. Whem t*e back becomes lame ad ssRtsechelft lathe surehi9 oftkidney Dod anuKdney Pifis cur the achIng back by curing the aching kidneys b. neat-for it is really the kidney achig and not the back. This is why '«Doan's\" cures are lautina -the medicine cures the actuai cause et the disease, the kldneys. Mr. J. W. Aylett, South Oshawa, ont., writes: \" have much pleasurein recoimendlng Do.n's Kidney Pin\u0026a Last summer 1 suffered with a lame baRk Sometirnes 1 could bhardly straighten up for the pain. I read about Doanls Kidney Pilis and decided to give thein a trial. I1 can trutbfnli say that the second box cured me.1 can recommenil thern» ai as a speedy cmr to ail suifer- ing witl bacache.\" Doan% Kldney Pilla are M0eper b 3 boxes for $1.25, at ail dealiers or maaleu direct on receipt of price by The IT. Milburn Co., Limnited, Toronto, Ont When ordering direct specify ««Doane. For ashort due Sly. Send em your mbiîL. Wc wI colite c=\"um for5$Oc. 0\u0026 .mto aswach For prim in rawO Send sazple. wieOi EUHE 207 bine Bls i Mali MID.WINTER SALE CATALOGUE L eewthhdgalm-vta most for your money you mnd5Us ieSlend s pois card to\u003edsy. W0 pla C d e vsy eh.u'g..s W* givea oene-Clay servime. nUs? TSIMPSON votowroNTO lffM $1.00 pays lf« 'ne Western Home Monthly for Twelve Montha. Tht Best Magazine Value avail- able. Send it to yoqar riend atma distance.",
         "wluflýpeg, FeIb., 1915 Peb., 1lo1s ITH ACK. IFo pain. i lme and tu Of idney the aciat kidneys be. km adâns oaù cause et hava, ont, uleasure ha lney PâUs Slame ba\u0026k raighten np ut Doou'g dIve them a r that the recommend a ail suifer- ,m or maaieu \u003ey The T to, Ont combinu 1, a mwich write 0\u0026 This Man Is Growi Just the Thing In Europe \"Crystolis Orower, lias been call discovery of the centu The judges of the1 positions enthusiastical te this marvelous bai: Already since we rights hundreds ofr written telling of the tained by its use.1 bald for years tell!h, beautiful hair. Many ini 30 days or less. dandruif al their live clean healthy scalp ait ths wonderful treatme We do flot care wh with falling hair, p matted hair, brittle dandru, itching scali of haertrouble, we wi TOLIS\" at aur risk. We give you a bitý an\u003e' \"strings\" or redi yoq a cent if we do \"Crystolis\" will do al what's important we te back our guarantei posited in our local bai lie forfeited if we a contract. Cut outt l'lait it to-day te Ci Street, Binghamnton,1 FREEC The Creslo Laboratc 5-P Street 1 amn a reader ol Mfonthly.Prove to ('rystoi stops fal lair, banishes dandir and restores premi hair to natural colo and address plainly Pin this C..;i The Western Home Monthly garden party p g* s The music was byý a Pink Viennese Orchestra, which, w.th heaps of other attraction, bad been sent down from town, including a company who were going te do a pastoral 'play, for the giver of the party'had a wonder- fully well-lined purse, s0 that by wavng a golden wandt-the purse don't you know?-he could command ail sorts of wonderful things. Betty found a gap ini the hedge, and got through uite easily. On the other aide she stoo waiting-the music had ceased, and she wisbed it.would start again. There was nothing to be seen, diaftral. Perhaps they were bidden be- bind that thick clump of trees, and- \"O-o-o-o-ýh!\" The exclamation escapeil with a little squeal of joy, because, comng round the bend of those trees was-well, most certainly. a f airy person. You reognized him at once by his funny -e=-rdiary people, that, is-xin such clothes nowadays. He came right up to Betty, and they stood and they looked at each, other solemn1y. PT. W.And suddenly she knew him-because WinNvipEG, MAR. ofbis eyes, which were nice and kind and gr ey-and then he wore doublet and bose and ueer, green 1eaed bat with a long red feather, and su cinny pointed shees. Oh, theecouldb11,no mistske!Soshe imra ,n,,edged a littie nearer, trernbling witb ir wr excitement. \"Are-are you tbe-pwince?\" she asked at Lasti1 in an awed tone. \"The prince?\" said the- man curloualy \"Hew do you mean you funny little soul?' hu DiscSvou y Wto*s \"The pwince,\" said the amail maiden, dr In30 Des\" wîth ill-cencealed impatience, \"eout of the Ut 1.30fair-wy tale. I've been telled a fair-wy tale 'bout a pwince and a pwincess, and-' i If W. Fail On Our Her listener caught on te ber rneaning it. Trry St At Ouar and bier rnood, but lie sbook bis bead. \u003eupen Tr-ay., \"No \" be told ber, \"I'm afraid I can't be a prince, kiddy, l'mi only a wayfarer, tilat's ail.\" \"But-fink you must be,\" she said, with conviction. \"' cos yeu're just like my pwince. W-hy couldn't yeu be?\" \"Well, it's like this,\" hie said slowly. \"You see, 1 can't be the prince, litile wernan, because-well, there la ne prin- ces.' \"If you found one, 'ould yeu be-the pwince--weally?\" And the man laughed, thougb there was sernething in it the baby didn't under- stand. \"Really and truly,\". he assured ber, 'if-if it happened to be the real princess; for if you find her-well, you are a prince at once, ne matter what you were before.\" \"Well,'\" said Betty triumpbantly, \"yeu must coe wiv me. an'--an' l'Il show yeu one. Please!\" g Bald-\"Crtolis\" Is And, soehow, for tile life of hlm, h le gfor Such Cases. couldn't have told you why, the manl s,\"l the New English Hair allowed himself te be seized by this ýlied the most wonderful golden-ilaired mite and dragged ever the Brussels and Paris Ex- grass of tile other garden te tbe open lly awarded gold niedlais Frenchl window, where Betty, finger on kr grower. . hp paused. scrd the American 'Don't make any noise,\" aile whispered men and womnen have phenomenal results b trernulously, \"l'ces it's Auntie Caro, and People who have been she's asleep! But she said sile wished tbe 1ow they now glory in pwince wouid corne, and of eus-\" report new hair growth Tl eto Others who have had Te e til te sentence was lest as aile es say the\u003e' have got a tiptoed aoftly over the tbreshold beckon- ter a few applications of ing the \"pwince\" te follow, and because ethe o rebte of the fact that frorn bis stand by thle prematurel\u003e' gray hair, wîndow lie could sec the face on the hair or strsngy hair; pillow witbin the rooin. He did follew 'p an oa ry o n wtha sort of srnothered exclamation, vantyouto ty \"RYS-andstood loeking down at Carolyn West's nding guarantee without stiil forM. Her eyes were closed. One tape, that it won't COSt band (the left) lay lightly beneatillber flot prove to you that il1 we laim for it, and, cilin, toucbing the alender, bare tbroat- Shave plenty of mone\u003e' a favorite attitude of bers wben asleep. ee. $1000 has been de- And thle \"pwince\" smiled suddenly, be- ank as a Special Fund to cause lie saw tilere were ne rings on one ail to compl\u003e' with this'fneofti ad the coupon below a,\u003c igo and. resto Laboratore, - Pwince,\" said the excitcd voee at tbe N.Y. head of thle coucil, \"it is in thle stor-wy; -yeu have te kitil her--quick!\" COUPON There was a breatilless silence. And tories, then-well, thle man steeped low and tBinghamton, N.Y. kissed thle tilird finger of that lef t hand, À The Western Homte an htwkteprcs. )me withlout cost how adtltwk h rnea ing Ilair, grows nev She opened her eyes and looked up, ruf and itching scalp)s rigbt inte the grey eyes of thle man. ature gray and faded \"Philip!\" she said, witb a sort of cry. lor. Write \u003e'our naine I\"î-ob, of course I arn dreaming!\" yand \"N.,o, said thle man called Pilhip;I on t yor leter don't think se. You were lest, but I have found you, and I amn neyer oirng te let yeu go again. D'you know that?\" arm Cmm ad Svitec\u003e\"I'rndue teplay in 'As You Like It' in 20 k!IB~anos. wnt inuteF,\" h0 ent on. 'a.., 7- 1\"But first I've get to tell you a long story, Bargain Pianos jFor Quick Sale We have a nwnberaioefle='M tN.s ments kt over hem oui Cristnmas Sale 'of ovesocked lime. Thone ai\u0026 pinsof standad makes of recognired woth.mreawm eks~htIy used and zonescodhad Emey om emihe beain. Write at ISofpces.Ey tmmn we are offeiu »Mre Specwa Proin i Church Orgaun Semai for par\u0026\"ulr J.J.H.NLEA \u0026 CO., LTD. Winipeg' Greatet Muuic House Tie Roue o1fihe lfelitu \u0026 Co. Piano and the Vicirela j. W. Kelly, J. Redmond W. J. Rom, Sole flwn..rs if you'll let me, or part of it; and after the show-well, dear, I shail corne back and tell you the rest, if 1 may?\" Betty was geing to bed very soon, and Bile came tripping inte the room te say And it wsa really funny, because there sat Auntie, don't yeu know with quite another person-not the prince at ail. She felt vaguely disappointed, because hie had said hie was cornlg back, and Betty had wanted to ask him quite a lot of thùNgL But this man was ever so diffrent. To begin with, hishair was quite short and brushed smartly back, like Daddy's, and hie wore ordinsry lothes-just like other people. Y et it was extraordinary, becadse hie was sitting With an arm round Aunt Caro, who didn't seem to think it at ail funny. He held out the ether arrn to Betty '\u003cHello, Babel\" lhe sad-and the ýeyes and the voice were tilose of the prince, after all-\"don't you know me?\" \"'Yeth!\" said aile joyously. \"You ece, I bad to corne back te look after the princess,\" hie inforrned hier. \"And aee about building the castle again?\" she inquired anieusly. Then she added curiously: \"Why did it fali down before?\" And the man siniled inte the brown \"W llisaid, \"yeu, tefairy 'god- mother, were flot there you see, and real fay tales neyer corne right without a faiygodother. But of course yeu never knew that.\" The Last Toast We've drunk te the King-God blessa him! 'We've toasted eur sweethcarts, too, Our kihskil lads in the trenches And our sailor boys in blue. But tliere's one more toast to be honotety .Se in silence your glasses take, And drink te the men of Britain Who h-ave died for Britain's sake. Froin field, and mine, and city They raced tebile jaws of death, With a jest at the foeman'a camion And oa laugil witAi their latest breatlî. And new tbey're at reat oand sleeping Where they feli on un allen shore, But their graves are bere in Britain In our -hearts for evermore! De Had To Go A rosy-cheeked office bey who i ern- ployed by a great business bouse one day walked quietly, hesitatingly, inte the manager's office. His face was drawn and haggard, says a writer in the Chicago News, and it was evident that the errand which had brought hlm there was of no ordinary importance. \"Say?\" hie interrupted, and the manager look athim aeverely. \"Say wbat?\" growled the office man turning back to bis work. \"Say? Kmi 1 it off this afternoon?\" queried the boy, bis head down, bis hahde. twitcbing nervously. \"Get off!1 Wbat for? 'Nother grand- mother dead?\" grunted the busy mans, loeking up again \"No, 'tain't that,\" admitted the office boy.-N1 \" Weli, what will you do if I let you off?\"I te manager relented. l'Il neyer asic again,\"' brightened the boy. \"An'-an' l'Il work any Saturday afternoon te make up for it, an'-an'-I'il work any nigt-I don't care if you dock rn-an'-an' l'Il work twice as bard if yeu'll just let me off this afternoen?\" \"Well,\" gasped the office man,.«\"it muat be pretty important! What on earth do you want te get off for?\" \"De Giants is goin' ter play de Kellys dis aftcrnoon, an' l'm on de Giants' team, an' w've all getter be dcre dis aftcrnoon an' dey can't do not'in wit'out me,\" answered the young man, importantly. \"Ob,\" grinned tbe manager, \"basebal gaine, eh? Yes, yeu can get off.\" The boy grinned, and rushed eut of the office, bis face covered with smiles. The overworked manager turned back te his figures resolutely, tben looked up wistfully and remarked te bimself,\" wish 1 could get off to sece a bascball'game this aftcrnoon myseif.\" MADE IN CANADA WrIte te the cudahy Packing Ça., Terente, Canada, 1er'aur booklet: \"6Hintsý te Houzewves.\"1 3 29 Porage A re. Real lMai Found 60rm.Hui si 000-00*wa Pedlve uaranq *- aiI Clo ALOQUSE Ip big .05 I it, batebhg 1. -àà mes RLD'S U I D b n . 9.cm Saval id atma IMMUM-U",
         "The Weate~n Home Monthtv ~'~r ~N ~ -- ro' ~*, *~.p ....bet Mrion the Farni To start the chores sbad Of the. Sun, end keé\u0026the work ahead Ben.Bi Fer a -good fil days Vwrk scoodang e. pIans4 edplentyoftm fur diai. SEND FOR NEW CATALOGUE 0F *i5pUUIUN% Sold Direct ta Usera. No Agents TEOS.MINGT 160 Princoas Street, WJNNPEG, Canada* fWant Men L. OiWb. Want Te MMeke 300A Yar, or More ivW. mmcd a $ood. five mas right mow se yonr temtry teohandersai estate - -taidedesforuns No expertemosor empi- tai ecessary. Wstsach von diRosi ag ent ini vour locaitr. Easy work; 2 2 8\u0026 M w \" E R TX E S C M O O L 22,1 Palnace BidRld menc m a The Wester NHome Monthly Winnipe.1Canada Enclosed find $......... for ......... year's subscription to The Western Ho-ne Monthly. Nane ....... ......................... Town................... ... ....... ... Province .............................. How Beet Sugar is Made A Viait to the Factory of the Knight Sugar Co. Ltd. at Raymond Written for W.H.M. by Ma= McD. UL, by wmcàm The manufacture of beet sugar '18 a I ~roesaofcoinsiderable iiiterest. The raw t oeinto the factory at one end and Icornes out at the other end the perfected 8ugarof commerce. Frm the atorage bina the beets are aowed to fail into a flume of running water which floats them into the factory and into the beet wheel b y which they are carried to the washer. Here they are subjected to a thorough washing,- after which they are 'automaticaily ejected into another elevator which carrnes them ta the tbird floor, where they f ail into the suicer. The slicer consista of a dniving Puiley that aperates the shaft carrying a cfrcular frame, which hokis the kmives. Hlere they are eut into long V shaped ~tnPs about five and a haif inches wide yoeegth inch thick and of variaus Jegha. These sfices are called cassettes. 1?ra the slicer the cossettes (or beeta) are transported by gravity through a happer into a chute to a diffusion battery. The vessels for diffusion are maatly up- right iron cylinders wlth fiat or arched bottoms, having a larg opemnn capable of being tightly cls2efor receîvmng-thei Blices. A number of such diffusera con-1 nected together la called a battery. Ini order ta keep the contents at the requiredi temperature, there ia connected with ecd1 diffuser, or cel, a so called heater which reheats the juice before being admitted to the next diffuser in line. The vessels are connected by pipes i such a inanner that the same portion of liquor can be distributed thraughaut the entire battery. The driving power is hydrostatie pressure and is abtained from a tank i the upper part of the augar hause, g*ving rssrf of fram fifteen ta twenty-five paunda perC square inch. Here the sugar la extracted t by a series of bleachigs with hot water, t thc sugar being held in solution i théC cells which alsa contain most of the impurities. Albuminoids Coagulate Bof ore Pressure of Lime The abject af the diffusion procesa la ta tÈ obtain the augar with as few impurities as passible. When sufficiently concen- U tratcd the juice la drawn off in mcasuring tanks, enougli being taken ta extract the ti sugar withaut tao great dilution. ThisS] la accurately measured, and a record kept 0. of the tfrne, number of cella and dcnsity. iE This juice la pumped into a calorisatar d where it isheated. Thilaimportana it la necessary ta coagulate ail the album- is noids before the presence of lime. From t, the heater the juice fiaws ta the carbon- g ators, which arc covcred tanks heated by ci closed steam. Ilere lime in thc form of b, rnilk of lime la adxittcd ta the hcated fr juice. The lime combines with the at greater part of the impurities and forma in an insoluble precipitate. The lime also n combines, witi the sugar forming a cal- in cium sucrate, which if flot deeomposed cc will be lost in filtration. This is donc by a1 injecting gas which la made by burning in the lime uscd in clarification. Thus an te insoluble precipitate af calcium carbonate su la formed. nf Just enough gas la admitted ta break m Up this combination of lime sugar. Care la taken not ta carry the operation toa far, as alter the calcium sucrate la des- troycd the carbonic acid attacks the mr compounds of calcium and in time will fa liberate ail impurities again. The process bc la closely watched and samples are taken th every few seconds. As the aperation cl( approaches campletion samples are taken in in test tubes. The proper point at which fr( ta stop the flow of gas is indicated by the (si formation of a granular precipitate show- pe ing clear liquor between the particles. cc The gas is instantly shut off, a test tube th~ is sent ta a table nearby where a chemist'sno assistant la stationcd and the percentage ati of lime in the juice determined by filtra- ap tion with standard acid. tei juie s ilere i Pesesw Juic is iltred n Prsse After clarification, or carbonation as it tr, is cailed in a beet sugar house, the whole ab contents of the carbonate juice and pre- tw cipitate are drawn off and forced through mn presses are composed of alternating solid vo and hollow openings, to al110w the juire ta! ta pass from one to another. The soid r Hé wilget yo u op an get you. nt-either way you saY-with a steady cai,or ton successive Mr.f minute tape. me. priceinla30 la eh0 Stat..; $3,0ln Cmesad. Ià your deir hua't hlm a mon- ey order t(\"o udYfli a =U. IIi.i, \" wil bhrlnghlm Lo 0 -e frames are covered with two thîcknese of clati manu.factured especially for tsà purpose. When thsse alternatig solid ancf hollow frames are clamped by meana cf a screw, -and the carbonator juice pumped thraugh a valve, it is readiy seen that the cake will accumulate.an the clatih in illing the hollaw frames, and dlear juioe rmn througi the cacks ito the troughs. When the press la full of cake, hot water la farced through the cake, thus washing out any remaiing puce. The preass a opened by releaaing the pressure of the acrew,th apron la remaved and the cake drapedthrug a happer underneath and conveyed outside the building. This refuse can be used as a fertilizer. The physical condition af the predipitate la important.. If the operation hea been carried an properly t he juice wiil filter aidythrougi the filter presses, leaving ahard paraus lime cake, that la essily washed and cleaned from the presses. The juice from these fiter presses la re- ceived in anather set af carbonatons where milkof lime isagain added This time there la nat 50 muci danger of ovencar-. bonating. Gas passes tbrough the juico until there remains na trace of lime in the juice. This la determined by actual test each time. The juice la tien boiled ta, precipitate the double carbonate that may hé in the solution and again forced through another set of filter presses. Suiphur Fume. Clean juice The clear straied juice which la now a light straw calor is pumped ta the sulphitars. The operation here la per- farmed in tanks of preclaely thesae construction as the carbonation tanks, the suiphur fumes being forced. through the peafrated pipes into tic juice inateid ofgas as mn carbonatUeproces. Hmr eulphur fumes are for~ through 'the Wuie by means af an air pump, which 4ecaloruîes the juice and precipitat;es the remamnder of the lime. This juice which as now watcn-white la alawed ta flow through mechanical filters whici eliminate ,hatever mechanical impurities remain in the juice. At this stage the \"uce, wbilc compara- tively pure, la diluted, contaiing only a mail amaunt of sugar. This denmda on-the quality of the beets w;orke\u0026J. It ts desirable ta cancentrate it and this xi Lone i a multiple effect evaporatar. [his consista of four bodies each. of which is arràanged with steam. chambers snd tubes with room for the vap)or, ta disen- :age. The upper part of the vapor chaniber is cannccted with a steami chani- ber in the ncxt body, sa that the vapar Frm the boiling liquor may pass inta tic teain chamber of the next. The juice i fiowing thraugh the effecta becomes more candensed as it passes alanggi -n at a density of about anc liundrcdan5 ,ming out somcwhat highcr. This not )nly cancentrates the sugar but also thc npunities. The product whichislanaw ;chnicaily called thick liquor, la again xbmitted ta the sulphur fumes which ieutralizc it and dcstray the waste naterial. Thick Liquèr is Crystallized The thick liquor is again passed through nccianical filters, which remaves an\u003e? oreign solid7 matter, after which it is oiled in the vacuum strike pan where he sugar la crystallized. This pan lsaa losed cast iran vessel abiAxt eleven feeli idiameter and fourteen feet higi holding aro thirty ta forty-fivc tons of melada ugar molasses) when f ull. In the Iower ýrtion are situated a number of copper uils through which the steam passes ta he condenser and the pump draws off thc )fl-cofdensable vapar. During tic aper- ion a vacuum la maintained in the paratus, the mass bailing at a low emperature, which prevents-4 burning. 'hen the operation is completed thc bole mass, known as melada, la concen- rated until it contains in composition bout seventy-five per cent of sugar and wenty-five per cent of molasses. Tic iada is then remaved into a large iran ink w-ith propeller arms constantly re- olving which is termed a mixer. At- iched to and directly underneati the Lxer are a number of centrifugals. W,,Ï\"Der. A-b.. ]ÇAir. monthi.v",
         "The. Western-Home Mwonthly The following article copied from The journal of Comimerce, Montreal, is f rom the. pen of Lt. William Ewart Gladstone Murray, a Rhiodes acholar of McGill University. Mr. Murray wa a oWord when «the war broke out, and like hundreds of other Collego men, both in Great Britain and thie Overseas Do-, mIdnions, volunteered for service. He ob- tained a commission in the l4th Scottish Light Infaitry where he han an excel- lent opportumity of judging the efficiency of Kitchener's army. Lt. Murray isaa Wsterner, lits father being Paul Mur- ray of Union Bay, Vancouver Island. Ee las a nephew of Dr.Huli Mackay, Winnipeg- 13RITAINS CIIZEN ARMY NOW NIJMBERS 1,500,000 one of the Greatest Achievements of Miltary istory The Citizen Armies of Britain already number onc a- a half millions of men. After harely three mouths of systematic training, these armies have achievcd a remarkablo tate of organization and efficieucy. It is no exaggration to Bay that they constituto one of -the greatest achievements of military history. Very few peoplei the Unitcd Kingdom, lot alone lu -the outpide world, have realized as yct the significauce of theée armica. Iu \"Ke\u003e' characteristie manner, steadily, persistently, sileutly, without a trace of ostentation or publicity, the gigantic task lias gene on frein month to mouth, until now tic Britisi Islands are a ver- itable armed camp. It je oly thoso vii. are privileged te participate in the work of organization and training that have funy idea of what those armiea vil mean to, the Empire For the gain tu, Britain from Uic Citizen Armies vil be measured in many ways other than in the number of laurels they will undouhtedly win .on the fibid of battie. Mon of ail degree, of every station ini lit e, proviously separated by F~eb., 1915 thicknesses aliy for this lating solid d by means nator juice ;ni readily tilate on the rames, sud cocks into e, hot water lus washiug be Press je sure of the ad the cake undemneath ding. This iliuer. The ecipitate ia bas been ses, leavig Itai essily bie presses. ,esses la me- stors where This time of overcat- i the juice of lime in by actual blien boiled onate that pain forced resses. ruice icb la now cd te the re la per- the same ion tanks, d tbrough e insteid 'u. Rer rough the np, which ?itateo the lice which d te flow L eliminate es remain compara- .ng only a re. It ad this is vaperator. l. of vhich ibers snd , te disen- lic vapor am Chamn- the vapor a fite the The juice becornes This not b also the h la now Les W2L'eh le waste zedl 1l through )ves aiiy ich it ls an where pan is a even feet h holding ýf melada tbc Iowcm )f copper passes to vs off the the oper- I in the ,t a 10w burning. eted the ; concen- npositioii uigar and e. The arge iroli intly re- ,er. At- ,ath the S. business of clans and party, are now of at the peril of the nation, were al aymp- Empire ie ooncerned, the -war wilI one determination. Out of the political toms of impending decadence and îilti- not bogin on land until August, a nd social mate disriiptior 1915. Just. as eSon s the first cdhaus which When the hie- million men' of-the' new arniies precedcd the *! erre':::::::\",IIoIwuIm\"Inlen iahiiiijuwwkwwutlInmfmuuu.1hII tory of these are' at -the front, we may anticipatre a war, there lias IIIuIMInn stirring imes ie complote change of naval policy. So emerged a sol-i wribton in proip-. far, the consistent adhcrcnoe to the idly nitel er perspective it policy of blociçade alid containmnent, has peuple, prepar- will be seen accemplished its purpose by demolishing ed tro Pýre n thait the world German commerce and gradually tight- sacrifice, in thej war, despite itse n the iron grip of the uiege of the aeccmplishment 1 i honors, prie-Germanie Allies. But once the British of tbeir duty te j served -the Brit- peopler arc ready to begin thoir land themselves and ish Empire from campaign in carneet, this will be vigor- the Empire. Inle a more ignoble ously seconded by a rclentlessly aggres- recent years = j fate t.han con- sive policy on ses. Winston ýChurchillUe thora have not i quet by the famous \"'Rut.digging\" speech was of beon wanting n i ermanîc Pow- more significance than bas beu gencrally numerous dis- e rs. It awak- realized. It is known that British euh- couraing ogIa ned the soul of marines and torpodo craft have thor- of the future ! a great democ- oughly rccoinnoitrcd the whole German of the Brt I racy by chai- coast, and tliat the former have actually ish Demorrae- li lenging its vcry entered the harbers at Kiel and IVil- ie. Many yeara -\u003eà existence. The helmahavea. Evcrything in ready for of comparative- effeet .was frai- the decisi-'o moment -that moment security, snd i esidoSci. It ia when it in determinod to launch forth conimme r à àeà being mneaeured the. might of the Empire. The IVar cial presperîty, I to-day ini the Office plans contemplate the placing of brought about ~ strength, and as many as five million men in the field ffheir inevitsblo the spirit of in as many years, if auch in necessary. crup of efalse the Citizen So muoli for tie general considerations prepliets au\u0026 Armies of the of the 'purpose and atrwýeg~y of the dangerous couna =S. Empire. Citizen Armîe. Wt théeretaîls and sois. The re- IIt in probable local features, future articles wil demi. crudesceuce of,* that by July of_______ icLite .Navy I-1915, wll over ~ ism,\" the gen- -1g a mnillion men Flannefled FooIsP orsi diaregard 1 of new armiez Tii. fighting on the Continent insvery of national ser-jil will -have taken severo, and viii Probably b. prolongea. vice, the stud- miup their p1lce ,Ithink the tumelias ,arrived. v4en the ied avoidance of --ii the fing-,eouaty cricket segon__huudi. Empire issues, à à line. Just as for It ln not ifttingig t a Ui Rt ti the insidieu n-g soon as these present that able-bodicd'mci sbold pis flueuce of \"Fac-I î have left the day after day and plcasure-seekars Ao ific\" and Uniteid King- on.-Dr. W. G. Graco. \"In l1a r dom, a \"bilar ity, th eteed j un~br vi ho The subrarlne in thie suepessor of tbe. ily -wvidenîng l raised ad pre- destructive ageucies of former 'tIm%. I breaoh betwecn ilparedin asaim- mayhe regrded sth dsMfth labor aud oepi- Ueut. WiMIam Ewart Gad toneMurray 1 ilar wa. frehiitvlciitashu ato tai,~~~~~~~~~~ am.Ucg,,u. , ,...J a te gn- to attack ahips lyring te leeward a\"ds domination of u.,,.mma -mHm muuu.uumuuf.Ww u ine striking t-kin ÎhIer n oe orso b partyam reven power etftthe JohineYla\u0026 When- writing Advertisers please mention The Western Home Monthly .0 W-mnipeg, Feb, 1915",
         "The Western Home Monthly Wlmulpeg\u003e ?eb., 1915 WdB f rcr atalogue nMd P I8t to The Idea1 Fence Co. Ltd., Winnipeg Qualfty Pence 180 a rod and up A\" fun with the Camera Writtenan Ilhistrated for The Western Home Monthly by S. J. WigIcy, Edgerton Ina omeent numiber. of The Western Ifome Monthl1y sorne amusing and dis- torted photographes were shown. flere is another way in w'hich amusement may bu obtained during the winter days. 1Select from your stock of negatives one with an empty foreground, and from, this negative make as clear and distinct a print as it is possible to obtain. This Jflorsephotographed-1 5 f eet fromn camera should be done in 'black, and white, and on a non-glossy surface. This je im- portant, as the picture is to be copied the illustrations the suake -was pliotu- graphed some two feet from the camera, and the horse sittipgdown to rest, solmc \u003e,fdteen feet-away. Wlien you hay'e pro. duced a really comic picture the u4iole is again copied with the aid of the camera, and you will then be able to print inany of these composite photos to nhytify F Composite photo Inter, and reflections frorn a polished 1jyour friends. Tie photograph of the surface will spoil the work. This print 1gopher in a trap wvas taken at close quar- ,hould l\u003ee inounted on a stout piece of ters, and the various figures groupeil cardboard. a round had al heen photographed at Then frouît anongst your prints of nuiuch greater distances. animiais and people selec ,t and cnit out If you bave a street sceule for a -back-- veycaeull witli scissors tiiose you ground photos of your frien\u0026Is taken close tlink wo niake coic pietures. Tlucy to the cainera, -%vlen 'Pasted on to the shütuld he arrauiged on the foreground of street picture will appear as mighty your motinted pictuire ami j)asted i ps giants. tion. You mwill generally id that bv conibining objects taken near the camertTo iw with those et a distance amusing andTw Vis strange efTects will be prodluccd. li Wliat have yvou d- ne to-day? I asked a ropernalwr. \"0, sir, tee Itours of bard wvork, just twisting tow-iny fingers sore, niy Iungs choked with dust. J did utot eonie to the prayer meeting hast niglit! I was too tired; I %vent to sleep whcn 1 wvas trying to say nîy prayers.I sonîctinies think ihf it wcre not for Mary' 000,1 1I would end it al-nothing but woi-k, work, work. 1 arn so tired, and I offly MiLX Y~I4iET ake enough to keep body and sotul to- gether. This is one side. Secetlie 'Iothi -r A ship with eleven Iïundred souks on board is bcing dIriven upon the shore- a land of crags, like giant teeth, stretchu- inig up slieer and sharp. Onue anclior after another is dropped, each checking thle speed of the vessel's drift. The hast anluor w-ns dow-n. XiII it hol? Ves: the ship is snvd CO. telilte * rop erot to tliink of the toil an(, tedsand the nîonotony, but of the vheveu l unt1re1mena nd wonien saved. T]ues5 thiiigs are writtcn in the Lainh'.s l ok f 11fe-thle ring of every hain- mier, tu ll î lek of eevncltbe wlîirH of everv icoin. Tlîey wlho triuhy î;it il n iOn lie Lordi shah Ivhar Hi-s angels 9. '1 1,(.lgtli(-Iiiiiigthe lu, as tficv strengtlivined ju j ou (lu i~.t, ifih songs of peace, and good- J~r Iflarn \u0026 lRit4 3liaunif 'FROM FACTQRY TO HOME- Il WESTERN BRA.NCH STORES Some pecphe makce the great cristake of consideriuug mere lowness off price the guide to VALUE. It isn't-not by a good deal! VALUE may be ineasured best by what -e GET for what w-e PAY. Whîeî you deccide ùo bîuy a Pianto or a Player-Piano, reinember titat we are selLng the iaoî\u0026 Risclî on its inirits, nt a figure comnmensurate with it-s Q[TALITY, giv ing dollar-for-dlollar VALUE. If you pav ess you inuet naturally expect to CET less! Write for bookiets to-day MASON \u0026 RISOII LIMITED Il- -I *1i W-Innipeg, reb, 1915 The Western Home moilthly",
         "Wlnnipeq,.Feb.,1915 The Western Home Monthly- The Breaking of the Monsoon By Percival Whitfiald HE raina were verdue and the 1'night air waa hat to sultoction. Lester paused ini bis approach ta the bungalow, fram wbich a liglit shona eteadily, streaming dawn the path af the litti garan, a triving by deep and fariced -iihalatian ta satisiy the craving af bis blod for a more axygenated atmos- phare. The monsoon wauld break sbortiy, ha hoped farvently, as ha stood panting, look- ing up into the pitchy blackness ai the sky. Thare wam flot a breatb stfrring ta dry the el ini ofeai is brow; natbing ta disturb the intense stilines, for it wa after midnight. Suddenly, witb the un- beliavable suddenness of the blows of Fate, Lester might as well have been with- in the Arctic Circle as standing wbere ha actually was, appreciably close to theaequa- ter, for ail ha realised af atmospharic conditions. There had coma ta him'froni the bungalow a sound-in reslity, soft and ahnost inaudible, but ta him clear and startling as a pistl-hot-tha sound of a kiss. Then Lester heard bis wife's laugh- the rich, musical laugli of intense anjay- ment he- ksiew so wel--snd -Guthria 'bis friand, bis chum af many yaars ai wandar- ings, came out. As ha cama dawn the lightad path Lester mecbanically pressad back inta the deep dsrkness ai a dame af papwas. For a time ha remaintid there biddan and silent; then ha stepped inta the ligbt and followad its pointing finger after Guthria. Guthrie had gotso far inhis undresuijng as ta ramova ana boot. He sat with it in bis bond, abliviaus ta the attentions af a swsrm ai mosquitaes attracted by bis candle. Yes; itmust stop where ithad begun. That much self-ecntrol ha owad ta Leýs- ter. Good heavens! What sacrifice did he not owa ta Lester-bis aid friand in ups and downs, who had cbeared hlm in adversity, nursad him in sickness, and, but just now, fraternised with bim in prosperityl And there wss littla sac- rifice here. Ha would have given mucb that this had nat happened; bt he was not the flrst mon by a long chalk ta lçgsa bis bead, beref t ai common sense by the backward turn ai a iovely neck the crim-1 son of upturnad lips, and a glace, haif thraatening, whoily maddening, fr-om two glorious eyes. A sensuous shiver grippad and sboak bim as ha re-created the vision. It sur- prised and onnoycd busn as a canfrs.ion af weaknass whera ha had thouglit himself strang. Well, there was always safaty in ffigbt. The China-baund mailboat had arrived that aftarnoon, and was sii in the bay? Why sbould be flot board ber at once befora she sailed? Ha was a rich mon now, able ta arrange bis future as- The door opened, and Lester came in. The ex-es of the two men met, and Guthrie k-new that Lester knew. Then he was staring at the door, whirh Lester had careiuily closed behind hini as he went. Lester crossed the road, and cntered bis home. His wife was in the rooîn, preparing the great masses of ber dark hair for the niglit. The whîteness of ber bared arins sbimmered in the light to the play of her young full muscles. Lester found himself, somehow, recail- ing haif-forgotten memories of bis native loch with moonheamns dancing on its rippling waters. H1e aroused himself with an inward groan and entered the room. Mrs. Lester saw hlm, in the glass, and raisecl lier eyebrows at the gloomn cf Fis face. \"Sometbing gone wrang?\" 'Soinetbing gone vary wrong, Mn'Iud.\" She t.urned, startlad into almost swif t mnotion by the traged of bis tone, \"Cuthrie has beenh re?\" * Yes, he ran ncross; but as you were not zit borne, he-'' \"[le implroved the occasion.\"~ She \u003cid not start exactly, but caught \"fave you nothing to say, no explan- lol r-etdy?'' Then she rose. \"What do you inean?\" \"Wýhy have you donc this?' Sha draw hersai! ta lier full heiglit, and tbraw out ber arms witb a grand gesture af denial. \"How can you speak ta me so? What do yýou mean? I bava dona nothing!\" Har innocent violet eyas wera full of tears. Lester had ta force himself ta overwhelm ber witb tact. \"Maud, this is useless. I was in thr garden,' and beard.\" She walked to ber chair to gain timnc. When she was seated she said quietly: \"iWell?\"y Lester's voica sounded calm as ber own as ha prassed bis point \"Wby did you do it, Maud?\" Tbcn, huskily, witb what semand a besitancy ta, know the worst, ha slowly added: \"Do you lova hlm?\" Mms. Laster's delicately sbaped foot in its pretty sboa daliberately traced the pattern in a square ai the arqe floor before sha answered; and whenquatrll sha raised bher ayas and spoke, it was witb an air aif being, intenaaly bored: ' You wish ta, know the truth? I don't know. I enjayad flirting witbhlm ta- nigbt bcaus- Well, bacause 1 be- lievad that it was onky that I was your.wife and it amnused me!' \"I understand,\" said Lester quiatly. \"You wished ta prove your power by avarcommng bis acruples.\" \"Well, perbapsl As ta, loving bixn, or an yn an ase- Well \" Harashoulders sbrugged the idea ta scorn. \u003c'Yat a yaar M~o, when you marriad me\" Lester began witb the mannar of a pro- fessai, about ta dogmatisa upon an inter- estmng scientific question. Mrs. Lester sprang to ber feet, ber cabnness ail at once dasarting ber. \"A yaar ago I said I lovad you, and I tbaugbt I did. You cameaond took me out af a paky littia Norfolk rectary, wbere 1 was lot among five sisters, ail vary like me- whara I neyer had anything ta look at but stupid fieldsaond dreary marshes; wbera I neyer saw anyana but nasty, disagreaable, ungrateful, r- pgeople; and ai course I tbougbt I lv dyau. Unfartunately, you tald me stories ai thte world, ai your sdventures, ai the great fortune y au wera an the point of making-of wbich I bava neyer heard any more-aànd, giri1-like, 1 dreamed drearns; and then yau brought me ta, this dreadful place, where one can't wear dacent clothes because it's so hot, and where the white anta won't let ane even have praper furniture.\" And sha glanced disdamnfully at the pretty Shanghai wicker- work around. Then, with redoubled vigaur: \"I neyer was allowed, or wiubed to read an-\u003c' - wee uSaS peare, but I ibll'eve in onaeaofhlà pisys there is a man who excites'a girl's im- agination, gets ber to marry him, and then amathers ber. You remiind me of There h OnIy son-:.O One GENUINE~ 'I*u*f -and thaï is made by Our trademark has been violated during the past year by manufacturers who unlawfully used this name and imitated our package. Extracts from judgment (Cassels, J.,) in the Exchequer Court of Canada. Mickelson-Shapiro Ca. vs. Mickelsan Drug and Chemical Co. and Antan Mickelson. *** in the face of the assignments ta, the plaintiffs it was a fraud on the part of Mickelson applying for registratian aJ bis tradeniark*** As I painted ou, the trademark upan which the plaintiffs sue was registered an the 25th of May, 1909. It came direct ta tbem throuh Mickelsan. As far back as May, 1909, the wards, Mickelson's Kill-Em-Quick were shown upon the can referred ta in the plaintiff's trademark*** It can be utilized in getting rid af the tradcmark registered by the defendants. 1 arder that thio trade- mark l'e exxninged from the registry. Mîckceloon'a KilI-Em-Quick made by the Mickelson-Shapiro Co., af Witinipeg, has beeîî proven ta be a certain relief from the gopher plague. It neyer fails to kill. It is safe ta use, easy tû prepart, ee introduces no seed of noxinus weeds nto your landi and is most ecanoin- ical to uise. It has been a mzarvelatisly successful gopher killer,- there: Whcli you buy a ber sngtterlal eun is noa Wonder ;t 0-11 n ii mtted. I g -Pioge 1 elaegnue MicoI~n'aKAUE~uQuick made and guarantecd by MICKELSONeSHAPIRO COMPANY, Dep.G., Winnipeg, Canada ~\\ 4 g.', b., 1915 Spiotu. camera, *st, Soufle aya pro. lwl1ole is camera, nit inany nhysitify of the ua quar- Dyraupeil ied at 3, back- mn close ta the mighity asked )f biard is sore, 11\u003c1 jot niglit! Miary work, I onlly mîil to- ce the 1 sotils ho re- ;reteli- inelior eck ing The Il the il anI )f tuie anh's bain- Mhu il-1 Vý;ti t ingerls lie ili \u003c good - THE b-ý-îL PEST",
         "Tige..Wetei»n Home Monthly Wnwipeg, .Feb., 1915 Cltb rlght aow and beoeclt lyob- hot khppouafter [a yow Inebatw maire um that you get the \u003cPrbfri. St.*. Iuacubators afmeEumrUmbd1beaboa.iuteya8repre.entedoeyowaoeey *wiIbe roftmded Wpciatr fzbmabtw =h good order. * ~mdt.aA~ \"utoa Colhgea ame -uang Pramre State luculutÉr; .w.rit tem for theïr revulte. Himdreds of expetsahavirag great smm=ss M j\"iMow to\u0026théhChidoe that Live\" glves ren iuthy e Prairie State in bet- *owOhe~Igh kmd ofiovr-tflshow to build youùr s,%Ireq4,ra-ee kind of feed to proenote quick âr ~gwu% and*v to obtaisi thée pipem of 0\u003csucceas- pmdbyinmWrite for it today. ttJNNo, LANGLOIS \u0026.ÇO. LIMITED BRUCE'S-SEEDS For ige he ianLd Regments of the British , ' Am*Of whse g0lnosS record we are so -Prd BruCeu seeds have establisheda record ECOND O EZ. he naime Bruce icnetion .ihSed sets the standard for quality. For 65 yenrswehv served the Canadjan Fariner, Gard ehern Amateur s0 well, that from a amai begin- în thia business has grown to large pro- portions. doing business fromn coast ta coat, and outside canada. Our success l ing o urthorough know- ledge fte --L..dthe requirements Of this cOuntryL attamned through our long experience, and to the extreme care exer- cised in evey deinrtment; to the excellence ofourstqacks, which areunequalled in quality, and aur high-class growers, who have been in the business for generations; also to our thorough tcsting for germination, ourcareful ..stEm=racg and Ur prompt attention to rdes. n sedamor tan anythingit pays to buy the best; do not buy Seeds you know nothing about, cheap Seeds are dear.i o obtain t hem for nothing. Q)urll2PageCataogueofSeed. Plants,Buîbo, Poult7,Supplies, and Garden Implernents, fullo vinble nformation, is now ready and will bh niailed free to 'ail applcnts. JOHN1 A. IMCE\u0026CO. LII.hatsO. IIapy Noirs to Mimy Frm Homes Violin, Piano, Orchestral, Band or Vocal Selections are yoi\u003ers at will. The Young folks will appreciate the Grafonola tor-,1mpromptu dances-there's nothing botter. TERMS TO SUIT rAL Thé machine here showvn, with 12 double-sided recordls, selis for 040.00. A cashi payient of $6.00 sends it to yuur home, andl you can pay off the balance in monthly instalinwrts of $5.00. Other machines from $20.'00 to $650.00. Write for Catalogue. WINNIPEG PIANO CG. 333 PORTAGE AVE. WINNIPEG Wh=a writiulg advertisers piease mention The Western Home Monthly. JOthenllo Iamn not sorry this ham hap- peüied to-niglit, for I will have no more of ithis life; it is stifling me.\" jShe swune around to lier mirror and feUl to brushing ber hair with a trembiing energy that betrayed her passion. Lester's face ad grown graver and graver as he Iistened. When he answered it wus with evident effort. \u003c'MaudIarory I had noideayvou suff ered Yso aMI Sougit to have spoken; to have explained. 0f course, I knew you were impatient, and I have ypressed everything to hasten the fortune 1 prom- ised you. And, oh, why couldn't you watt? 'For it bas corne, Maud-the for- tune? The mail to-day hma brouglit news we were expectmng to Guthrie and me the deal ta made, our mine sold. That is why Ilam 00late. 1 have been busy with Ransome, my lawýye. Thank Goci, I \u003c'an tell you that every penny of my share1 Lester's. tone slenoed Guthrie; and with-perplextity ibisa heart he went on t ruqb the biseknesa and the wonder, fuistîineus, for the sandy road muffled even the sound of their footsteps. Thus they rounded the lait turn and reached the beach; snd the liglits of the Goverinent laui, moored at the end of the boat jet . aroote their eyes, a blazei thatnih f-ink. As if stimu. lated to dectaton, Guthrie stopped and fronted bis companton. \"Something,I1 must say,\" lie protested patonatelY. 'It was unpremeditated, and 1 cannot tell yeu how I regret it. Thougli don't think I say that with any idea of extenuatton,\" lie added hastily. \"Arn I a saint to judge you?\" asked Lçster. And the very bitternesa oi hms voice feUl on Gutbrie's warmth like a cold douche. 'l guesa both of us have thouglit to.night of the old Don and bis The Lard Bishop of London who bas gone to the front as chaplain ta the Londoni Rifle Brigade of the purchase-money ta settled on you! 1yon wife lit the Dequerida Mine over You are a ricli woman now, and, so far as -in Chue, and the bullet you took in 1 lie any interference from me is concerned, shoulder for my sakze. At lea.st, I know free.\" 1 don't forget. Cone!\" And he led the Lester tiîrned away with stiffened baek way out on to the jet ty. and hcad crect. At the door hie turned, As they advanced they hecaîne grad- and, haif involuntarily, looked back. ually apparent to each other, their forma11 His wife sat with the brush in hier hand, shaping thernselves in thle ever-increasing huîried 'n thouglit, and seemed to have lîght, tili tlîey rcaeched the end! of the forgotten bis very existence. jet ty, and stood fully revealed in the il- As a matter of fact' i11 the face of luminat ion whieh carne from the latinch. this very unexpected news, it was forred Guthrie i)eered anxiously at bis eom- upon lier percep)tion that she had made panion, wondering uneasily wliat pur- a mnistake; and she wvas racking lier pose lie hitd in view in corning to sncb brains to find soîne means of miinimising a place, but Lester's face betrayed not.hing. lier conduct,' sonie method of explaining Ilis eNles were fixed far ont, where the aw-ay lier words, mtt bout hunîbling hier- bay opened beyond Fort Ilill tupon a row self to ask forgiveness. That would be of twinkling stars which represented the bier last resource; and, if it came to that, China inailboat lying down off the quar- îîot for one moment did she doubt it antine station. woulI bc effectuai. Presently lie spoke mnsingly: Ilerpreoccupation she never noticed \"t ranei hol e roston's boat, that Lester was gping. At the gate lie the 'Ta-Ku.' The very boat Maud and met Guthrje. Without speaking, the two 1 came nip in less than a3year ago.\" Then, men t.urncd down the winding road to Iwith bis gaze stili upon the distant lights, the 1each, but presrinly te silence was but with an încisiveness -wich startled broken by Gutlirie. Guthije, lie continued: \"She's more than 'el hope,\" lie bga ylçtvu bave a mile out, a goodisli swim, but you and 1 not-t bat is to a nwani, youu kow, ouglit tu (Io it, and (clance gctting back- t bat. it\\Vas al îiny ftl 'eh?\"' \"I have not jiiped on Il 'v Mife witb ''011, t hmre's no know ing -bat wc nîliglit IhcaNvv boots, if t bat izia vom i mean do,'' s:id Gîithric, with a little per- AIt1011gbVol ea N'oi se, voli(1:111 take fîînetory 1Immgh i, ''ife were fools enouigl mny Nvord f ou it tînît I atil« \\ m ig it ta rv' And1 lie added, with an air of canvas. shues.\" culd, practical commuin sense: \"Think of W-\"peg, Feb., 1915",
         "eb., 1915 ,hrie; and e Went on e wonder. idmuffled turn and hts of t ho It the end T eYos, a 3 if stimu. pped sud Protested neditated, regret t with any hastily. f?\" asked =ress oi rmth liko ,fus have ,n and his The Wester'n Home Mont hiy 21 k winnIpcg, Feb., 1915 the éharW -We are not likly to risk aucli a fate. To' attempt a swirn to-.nig1t would ho suicide.\"y \"éNot i our case,\" aid Lester, turning, end for a second time looking Guthrio in the eyes. -\"t will ber morely putting a »uýzze into the banda of Ppovidence for aolution. 1i ar gip to try and swim round the 'f1C Ail things con- iderod 1 presume you wiH flot let me make le attempt alone.\" Hoe sat down on the- planks of the jetty, sud began to take off bis shoe. «Great snskes' cried Guthrie, feebly \"But the 'Ta-Ku' rnay ho Wt:ngrn oro we roach her. How f ar lire vdu going to tempt Providence, thon?\" \"Sbe won't saili et. You were at the Remidecy to-nightT Royaton was there.\" \"'Yes§,\" Guthrie admitted. \"Jiust sol The launch ia waiting to take him off. Ho won't go aboard tili sun-up, and drop ot with the last of the tide.\" \"Wel,\" bazarded Guthrie in bis ex- tremity, \"but your wife?\" \"Quite so,\" sad Lester, standing up to unbuttoin bis white cotton tune. \"If I get back, you know Maud wiil have kindness; if y ou are the one to roturu I know you wil ho good to lier \", The calm assumption ho recognisodi \" i xaperated Guthrie unutterably. lUnutterably, for he, the product of mani- fold experiencs, was for once quite at a loes for expressionl. Ho found lt an impossible thing to explai that, bis infatuatiôn for the wo- man Lester valued so bighly was merely a momentary madness, and that the luat thing he wisled for in tbeworld was the revorsion of bis wif e. If Lester bad not been Ise friend, things might bave been different; lie might hbave spoken out, but, undor the cfrcum- Stances- Thon tbe thouglit of their lo nsd much-tried friendship brought 1w% it a frecli irritation. Lester ouglt to understand. He ho- lieved. tbat, if their positions were re- versed, ho should understand and make allowanoe for Lester. Suddenly the truth blazed througb ie oism and bis sul shrivelled and hrnkithe force, sel-revealing liglit. His the gujit! That merry, conüdont, kind-hearted ld Lester was this calrnlY desperate man, carlessly determined to playpitch-and-toss with the Fates! laVehyseri ofremoise gripped and stifled hlm for an instant. But his emotion passed'as suddenly as ithad arisen. He.was aman.of quick decision, who saw bis course of action at a glance. H1e realised the futility of further oxpostulation with Lester. lus grow- ingfear became that 'he should take te te water and vaniaih i the darkness; for riskç from sbark or alligator alto- gether neglected, lie lid littie belief that Leter could swim se fatr as the \"Ta-Ku,\" mucli less round lier and return. It seemed te liim a plain duty that lie must accompany hlm, aid him, if necessary, as far as the steamer; then attract the attention of the watch, sud have him taken on board. To bis satisfaction, lie found hlmself approaching thern swiftly, borne on the flow outgomg tide. But lus -content was of brief duration, for lie was quick to perceive that in the very swiftnes of his approach lay a new danger. With what seemed the speed of an express train lie bore down on tlie steam- er, and, as he was rushed past lier com- panion-hidder, vainly graspmng at tlie safety so near, swept along the counter and whirled away un der lier stern, lie ealled, eagerly at first and tlien frantic- ally, for help. Hue miglt have spared himself the effort. The \"Ta-Ku's\" passengers, aroused from their sumbers on poop sud quarter- dock by the din of the thunder, liad eowored in inaction, stunned by tbe blood-curdling dreadfulness of the crash, tilt the first wild blast, tliat beeled tlie steamner nearly to her rails, rent and tor-e and snatcliod the awnmngs fromi above thom, and the rain came clown with startliàg effert. Thon there was Uproar and scurrying on thliir part, and 'Shuuting and hurrying by the Chinese 11, lie polyglot babel, Cuthrie's dis- trauafft cry was littile likely to attract attention, and lie passed unhecded on the r:vxfg tide. 1 __ ) 1to is, ihe verv wvight of the ývind\u003c 11_1 --1-11 -began 1o-gin.possession-e went up i mute appeal te the unknown, undefined BupFeme Being that through Idfe ho had vaguely reeognised. Wrung from bis. weakness, yet the cy with unconscieus, unconquorable pr1ào, was not on bis own bebaif. Saho did not curse bis pra er as unre- quited wlien lie sank an came up again, only to find himself unablo to cepe with the bitter onsiauglit of the next combig, curling sea, sud ho was once more overwholmed. And wben, tetally spent, lie finally went umder, sud, te bis surprise, awoke te, flnd himseof on tho Govermment launcli with the Government Resident sud Roysten bending over hlm, bis first con- scious words were: \"H1ave you got Lester?\" Witli the flrst streak of dayliglit the finish came to, hope, when Roystpn, having boarded bis ship, roeorted f rom the bridge that the \"Ta-Ku' knew nothing of Lester. And, bare-lieadéd, Royston steppod to the engie-room telegrapli sud pusbed forward the lover; ana witli the clang the \"Ta-Ku\" glided away, silent and sombre, mn the first raya of tho new sun. Gutlirio, for lie was too experiencedl flot to know wliat te expect from the shallow waters of the bay under the continuance of the flerce stimulation te, which thoy were subjected. Nor was lie wrong in bis fears, for the seagotupwith a sudden outburst of enory hich was appafling. One great waveafternother drove hlm resisless- ly oceanward. Ho reluctantly gave up' the bope.of being of servioe te Lester, sud set hm self resolutely te, swim ashore. Gamely and stubbornly lie struggled; but slowly, sud with what bitternes to, bo admitted, it was borne in upon hlm that even te save himself was beyond his power. The tide ran ont with ever-increasing force before the hurricane, whist bis strongth failed appreiably. Smash! This storm-driven wave broke1 inte eyes sud mouth, almost suffocating him. Tliud! The next cauglit lis forehead, almost beating hlm into in- sensibility. Haif unconscious, lie began,' wlen1 the tumultuous sea would allow hîmn, to rail aloud against the tboughtless weak-j Iless which had brought him to this. Thon, as bis fate loomed large sud certain inroportion as bis strengtli decreased ho beeperforce silent, and bis seuli --s j,. ýWe cmn save you meney, give prompt delivery, and supply a Pence second te non. oM the nmarket. Every rod ie guaranteed. 'You are the judge, and if yon are not satiaidtue'. Fonce is what we dlaim for it, deiver it te your nearest sta tion and every cent vou bave' paid for wire or freight wifl be promptly refunded. We make this guarantee because we know the material eut of which our Fence in made. Every foot of wire put into tie G.G.G. Fonce in. up to the fui! standard of the gauge specifled, and is galvanized se heavily tliat it will stand eue acid immersion more tiien or- dinary \"«two dlp\" wire used ln the manufacture of other fences. It'la this that gives the G.G.G. Fence ita durability, a quality which -in only reveahed, as the. yar go by. A Pool Fonce Is Dear at Any Prie The Only way te make a-permanent ,réduction in the coat ef any neceaity wltheut r.. ducing the quality ia by standing shoulder te, shoulder with yeur fellow farmers, concentra- ting your purcLases through one central agency, over which yen have compléte contre! tbereby enabling that agency to buy for you st the lowest possible cost. Tbin i the aim ef BaGGG9t Wnite for Carload or Leas Carload Prices on Woven and Barb Wlre, delivered te your nearest station. A postcard with your name and address w 11 bring yen our new ilMus- trated catalogue of Farm Machiery and Supplies, or the 24 page iflustrated Seed Cata- logue now ready for mailing. Wrme for Our New Illustratedl catalogue of Farm Maohinory and Suppliea *1 If You have a Car of Grain to Sbip IlGGGF\u0026 is here to Protect Your Interesa * s - Yt..\u0026~ ;~', How doth the busy littie bee dispose of t ushoney ?-It oelsa it. ne over -in thec I know led thec e glrad- r formas ,reasî ng of tho the il- Lunch. s com- Lt pur- o0 suicl ot.hing. ere the 1 a row Ae the quar- 3boat, id and Then, lights, tartled e than Sand I ilglit noilgI air of ink of - ~40ON O .0.. WoenFWR e Don't Place, Your Order for Mle Feoclng bef ors gullmgf IbIGGG9â",
         "Tise Weatern Home Moathly Winnipeg, Feb., 1915 When Hartshorne Napped ByJ. F. Valentinel ELHart8horne handed hie busiess oudto he ote dek a heput the (UBii 0lews nly a. few moments ao, the other replied. 'I'n have hlm paged.\"p .Hartahorne turned fromn the desk and,2 wallcmg acro thie lobby, sank mnto one of the deeply cushioned leather chairs that lined the. opposité wall. He leaned back, the, pliable apringa gave way to the. grmure uPon them âAd, M doing go, brought a feeling, of rest' to the. %aes- ma, whOse system craved the. sleep of wbich it had been deprived. Hlis eyelids d1owIy drooped, while bis thouglits reverted to bis sick brother, be-i aide whiSe bed lie hd sat for the ps two nights, watching hlm as lie toe about i adelirium of fever, and giving \"at. regular intervals the. medicine the. doc-1 \u003cèm qusr tor had prescribed. Suddenly Hartsborne drew himself to-1 emqur, u à,wab.oas he. getiier with ajerk, l and rising painfuily 1 to he fet--eymuscl and join aaj luo nihe ~ eemed stilf and ackigh. stepped over \"M. Mg mr 'IpmeuiiAe ut m a.to the desk again. I\"Can't you find Mr. Bernheimr?\" hev jof recognition in the. clerk's eyes.. Yen UNyFhuve ýIWed eeyllaga ve? hoard of an hav me Fm = M=t \". -1Say 'weflan gôod me m\" M *Itéutexpena. ta yon., 1* mme Mdmody.wlthout chae. à trial Utietientc DELAliOI MUÂTIC CONQUEBOM.1 am wlUblgt tae thé chance andsaurely the test wIfl tell. Sa menS Me your \"mie and the test treatment w!» b sa eul;$yoanc.. Whel i 1send yjou tuis. 1wil write yoi anar fuly. anid w! show yoenthat my treatinent lu no 'ny or liahlng nheumatlum, but sk,,Id aiIse lane th, sytein of Uneo Acld and give great benefit in kidney troub and heip thie general health. This aeWOcaaffer wl» net ho beld open lndefitely. 1, wilU ho necessry for.you te anake your application epclîy Au soon as tbls dlmcvery becomes bettei known, Irahal cesse sendlng fr0. treatuet and shaU»tben charge a prlct for this dlscovery whlch wl» ho i proportion te Its gro iule. 0\u0026 tfke alýyantfgeof this offer before Itla lutua =t Eeniembérý tue teWOcostu yeu absolutely notblng. If.IL D\"110#, 5U. DeIanMaBIdg. lSyracuse, N. Y. Send ès your corbmgs-we can maire very.2pretty Switcbes, Cornets, Trans- formation, Puif Chignons, under ruEf at moderate cost. Write us to-day for particulars. We can save you nloney. European Ilairdress- ing Pairs .ZM. 102 CaMlon Iuililg Phtone: Main 2669 3234PortageAU\u0026 (Take Ementor) Md id of \"e Why, yus, 1 found him. H. wu~ 'o bere; but we couldn't find you. Wlien 'h di jou go?\" ie\" was sitting over there,\" Hart\u0026- ithome replied wonderingly. l. \"Then you muet lie deaf,\" the otbeî au retorted. \"«We paged the entire bote] et for you.\" IL Then the truth dawned upon the silk salesman-he must have fallen asleep. \":'ut-but can't you get hlm again?\" lie Ptammered. ' ''d have Wo take a long trip W do sthe clerk answered. \"Why?\" There was a trace of con- cerin i Hartshorne's voice. \"Mr. Bernhiiemer left neanly an hour n-0o. He took the St. Louis Limited, and i-3 afready weil started on bis way to Terre Haute.\" Hartshorne did flot reply. For an in- stant lie stared helplessly at the clerk, then bis eyes rested on thbe cdock behind the latter. He saw that it was over an hour and a haif ago since be first ap- peared at the hotel, so be muet have been asleep ail that time. With the realiza- tion, he faced about and strode toward the door. The salesman was plainly agitated over missing this Western dry-goods dealer, who ranked as one of the mendiant princes of Chicago. According to ru- mors floating about in the dny-goods dis- trict, lie was preparing to open a large branch store in Terre Haute, Indiana. These rumors becanie actualities when different salesmen told of the- large or- ders they had sold him at his hotel. Hartshorne's employers had heard the previous evening, of Bernbeimer'a b3,- ing; and upon Hartsborne's arrival at the store that morping, he ws directed to see the man at once, and \"Iseil hlm vni you have to shave pnices a little.'ý And Hartshorne was voey amious ti do no. IEs sales so far thus seaon were far below the average, and must be brought up, or it wou-id mean a reduced saayfor the coming year, as ail wages werebased upon \"Pust Performances.\" H. walked now with a halting step until lie reaclied the corner, where lie stopped to deliberate upon the next course of action. But bis mind refused to solve the question; the only thing left for hlm to do was Wo return to the firm orderlees. So Hartahorne boarded a car and, soon reaching the. building in whicl is con- cern was located, lie eûtered the offices with anytbing but a light beart Wo meet the angry look of the senior partner. «Well, wbere have you been?\" the latter demanded. 4Wby, 1 went up W see Beruheimer,\" Hartsborne falterec[. \"Itno you were suppcsed to go n=er,\"the. other stormed. \"And 1 also, kno you did go there; but why did you leave without an order?\" \"Because I didn't sem hlm,\" the sales- man replied evasively, wondering, mean- while, at the source of the information the other evidently osse \"I know that,' -was the angry -retort, A son of Harry Lauder (the noted humnorist), a lieutenant in the Argyle Highlanders leading a charge a \"H. plioned me a wbule . * that e you had called, but hadlâteft ore he saw you. oweed ? d ~ k ~ N o , he e I d ou g o ? I int go anywhere. I stae ih there in the lobby.\"aydrgt r \"IThat's the funniest thing 1 ever I1 heard \" bis employer scoffed. \"I 'don't-understand you,\"I Harts-. ihome faltered. \"Then V'i make myseif plainer. ()ver an hour ago Bernheimer telephoned bere and said you had been there, but bad gone away without leaving any word. He said he would have given you a nice order, bu t as he was starting in a few minutes for the new store lie was open- ing i Terre Haute, it was too late too 1send another man. \"I offered Wo send some one out to Terre Haute to see him, and leie hme- diately grew indignant. Said it would lie useless, as he would do no business with a bouse that employed salesmen who were so lax. So you see the hole in wvhich you have landed us. Now, what excuse have you ta offer?\" Hartshorne nealized just what his nap had cost him, and in as few words as possible lie explained what had happened. ceI'm very sorry,\" lie concluded. \"I realîze now what it lias cost both you and nie. But isn't there something 1 can do to st raigliten out the thing? MhY couldn't 1 jump out to Terre Haute-\" \u003c'I have a good explanation to offer, Hartshorne insisted. \"MY brother a s0 niucli better this morning that P'i not have to stay Up with huaîî to-niglit. 1 could catch an afternoon train, aud lie out thene to-morrow morning.\" \u003c'From the way lie spoke, T don't think he'd even see you; aud if lie wouldn't, the best excuse in the world wouldn't ýIe wonth a plugged nickel.\" This month's bargains in used and shaP %worn pianos. Al guaranteed. Privilcge of exchaiig- ing for a new one within three years allowing full price paid. Uner$50 Tecahr$ n d 7prsoti Uner $250. $10 cash, $6 nd per month. Haif yearly or yeauly payments can lýe arranged. MENDELSSOHN-7 1.3 Octave upright Piano by the Mendelssohn Co., Toron- to, simple but attractive design, without carving. Has three pedals, tri-chord over-strung scale, etc ................. $185 NORDHEIER...n upright Piano by The Nordheimer Piano Co., Toronto, in mahogany case, plain panels without carvang. Has been thoroughly recon- structed by our- experts, and is in perfect order and as good as new ..$285 BROADWOOD-.7 octave upright Piano, n wanut case, plain' panels without carving, a good tone............... $100 WEBRIR-7 1-3 octave Cabinet Grand p. right Piano, with Boston fall-board, full ength music desk, ivory and ebony keys, etc. As good as new .........145 BELL--7 1-3 octave upriglit Piano in handsonie mahogany case, with full- lenigth panels and music desk, ivory and ebony keys, double repeating action, used oniy fifteen months ...$263 HREINTZMAN \u0026 CO-7 1-3 octave up- right Piano by Heintzman \u0026 Co., Toronto, with plain polished panels, double repeating action, ivory and ebony keys, etc., in perfect order, smal size only ...............................$260 UNIVERSAL PLAYER-PIANO and 12 roils of music, 88 note, 7 1-3 octave Cabinet Grand upright Piano, in had- somely figured rnahogany case of new desgn, without carving. Has ful- length music desk, ivory and ebony keys, etc., and three years to pay, regular $950 ........................ $8 The Winnipeg Piano Co. 333 Portage Ave., Winnipeg Th FI Se ,Wonder' MÂNTLE, LAMP 10 cndie pwe BUrn oaly an gallon oail in 70 hours.Hig polish ed Brs on. Complets $3.0 .Bumer, complete wîth chixnney and two mantle. Round wick, will fit vu old lam .O1y WALLACE- M\u0026CORMACK \u0026\"o. viol,, Outit, frminas 20 tom o 1a00. d oies R THE LABEL On your paper will tell when your subseniption expires. When writing advertaers pleame mention e Western Home Montlly. W\"DS, - Feb., 1915 The ]W«tern HOMO ý mont4ly",
         "ShOP %vorn 1 exchaîij- s allowing ,er month. h. Scan L.e right oron- thout chîord ....$185 0 by to, in thout econ- s in ...$285 iano, thout ý, .8100 1full bony .... 11245 ) in irory tmng 1.$263 up- Co., ieis, 'ony size ,..260 1 12 tave Lfld- niew ony )ay, ...$485 CO. er LE [P 'Buoline. ctricity. power one oil in BHighl Bras )xrpIeto The Western Home Mwonthly Wânnlpeg, Feb., .1915 \"But 1 can try-\" The employer'. fae showed his ex- .eme dîngust as lie broke in botdy: \"At the firr's expense? I guess flot!\" \"'Ut me go out there, and if I don't ta rder l'il Pay My own expenses\" e\"ad If I do, they're on thle fr. This suggestion appealed to the other, but he did nlot reply instantly, ànd Harts- horne saw that ho was weighing the thing caefully. It isn't worth the trial,\"l hiae mploy- er finally replied. \"Yeu' didn't ?have Bernheimer on tbe other end of the wire. if you had, you'd realize how useless the trip would be. And you can't afford to .pend your own money on sucb a hope. less quet.\" 'I certainly can,\" Hartshorne main- tained. 'I not only can, but I want to do so.\"p \"lWeHl, if you foot that way, go abead. Blut remember, it's your funeral if you don't land him. The expenses wiIl corne out of your own pocket.\", 'I know that,\" Hartshorne answered. \"But I'm not thinking of that-\" 1«1'11 remind you of it when you re- turn,\" the otberinterrupted., \"I'm only thinking of thc fact that PU'ilo him a bale of goods,\" the sales- man continued. 'I wish you luck,\" and, turning on bis beel, the \"boss\" strode in the direction- of bis private office. 1 -For half an- hour, Hartshorne worked at good speed getting together bis sam- pies and packing them into the two trunks he would take witbhlm. This completed, he directed one of the office- boys tW cail an expressman and see that they were sent immodiately te the rail- road station. Hartahorne then hurried homo, where he found that bis brother had improved greatly since morning. Briefly explaining that he was forced te take a few dayS' triptW the West, ho hastily packed his suit-case and burnied off to the railroad terminal. As he stepped to thc station plattorm in Terre Haute the next morning, ho wondered in just what part of thoe ity the new store was loeated. But ho de- cided that ever 'body would certainly know of it and Ze eagerly awaiting its opening. Hartsborne had g1ready been in Terre Haute a few times, and, recalling the namne of the hotel at whicbho wanted to stop, hie walked toward one of the omni- buses, and was about tW stop ia when a newsboy burried tWward bim. Hartshorne halted long enougb to buy apaper, and scanned the pages, expect- ing to sec a largo advertisement of the now store. But no announcement of the sort met bis eyes, and bis brow winkled in surprise at this fact. 'I must have bougbt the wrong pa- per,\" ho said under bis breath, and a emile of roassurance ehased away the puz- zled expression. \"I recail now that there are two dailies in this place.\" At this juncture the omnibus backed to the curb, and Ilartshorne stopped out to enter the hotel. As ho stepped Woward the elevator after registoring, bis glanco rested on the news stand at tho other sido of the lobby. Ho walked over to it and purchased another paper-the rival to the one hc lad bought at the station The first thing he did after reaching bis room was to spread the paper open before him in a search for Bernhcimer's announcement. But to bis surprise there was none in this papor, either. it was a well known fact among the trade that Bornheimer's success in Chi- cago was due to bis strong belief in ad- vertising, and peoplo somet imes marvelea at. the newspaper space ho used. Know- ing t bis, Hartsborne was greatly takon zihaek at 'flot finding at least a page in CtLeh paper devoted to the annotrncoment of the coming opening. But be quickly dismissed the matter frorn bis mind, reasoning that it was un- (loIltedly due to some new and sensa- ti'\u003enal advertising which Bcrnheimerwws Planning. Throwing the paper aside, he l\u003cCf((lto the hotel office and went direetly to the desk. Is MIr. Bernheimer stopping bore?\" lio, :iskd of the clerk, feeling certain that if' thrlieerchant wmq in town, this would 1- the hiotel at wluch lie would put Up. Nýo one here by that namc now,\" was i 11 iely, which caused Ilartshorne to (OlClIde that the man had friends in Deenng filage Implements \"Well^, you can surely tell me wbere bis. e place of business is located,\" Hartshorne went on. \"Place of business?\" tbe other repeat- edblankly. \"Yos,\" the salesman said, a slight trace of impatience in bis Wone. \"Bern- heimer, of Chicago, is opening a new store bore in Terre Haute. Don't you know where it is?\" \"That's news to me,\" the clerk e plied. 'II must bave mise something.\" \":Thon, you kniow nothing about it?\" \"Not a thing.\" \"But who would know, about it?' flartshorne persisted. 'II must find Bernhcimer. I've corne ali the way from New York to sec him.\", 'II don't know where to tell you ý.0 go. But- Tho clerk turned to the casher wbo lad stepped from bis window and now stood beside the other, a quiet listener. \"Do you know anytbing about Bern- heimer,1 of Chicago, opening a store here?\", ho asked. The cashier shook bis head. \"I've heard nothing of it,\" ho replied. \"cI may be Ietting the cat out of the bag,\" Hartshorne said. \"But perhaps you car tell me if there are any unoccu- pied buildings in town that could be used as a department store.\" The clerk smiled good-naturedly as ho gave lýis answer \"Thàt's far beyond.me.~- But you-could quickly find that out by going across the street.\" He pointed toward the opposite side, where Hartshorne saw a. large real-estate \"TVhey're the largest in the city, and can tell you just wbat you want to know.\" Hartshorne started to cross tho corri- dor, but stopped abruptly and returned Wo tho desk. '\u003cEvidently Bernheimer isn't ready to tell Terre Haute what he's about to do1 s0 please say nothing about i t just yet,'; ho requested. \"If the news gets out, and ho could trace it to me, you cari readily sec where I'd get off. And, particularly ps I'm out bore to sou him a big bill o! \"We'll1 say notbing,\" was the response* in chorus from the two men, and Harts- borne burried in the direction.of the real- estato office He entered it confidently, feeling certain that bore ho could get the infor- mation that would bring him in contact with the merchant ho sought. An office boy's inquiry as to whom ho wisbied to sec brought forth Hartsborne's card as well as, 'II wisb to sec one -of the mombers of the firro.\" The youth disappeared tbrougb the doorwayý that led to tbe privato offices, and quickly returned to conduct the stranger inside. III called to ask regarding a depart- mont-store whieh some, one bas rented bore in Terre Haute,\" Hartsborne began. III was referred to you as being the largest real-estate agents in the city, and was assured that if vou did not bappen to handle the transaction yourselves, you could cortainly tell me something about \"A department store?\" the othor ne- poated. \"I don't quite gathor your meaning.y '\u003cThen I will make myseîf perfectly cîcar,\" flartshorne went on. \"You sure- ly bave heard of Bernhcimer, the dry- goods merchant of Chicago?\" \"Yes, ifl(leC(.' I\"WelI, ho is going to open a brancb store bore in Terre Haute. Did you know that?\" 'II certainly did not,\" the surpnised .agent responded. \"H1e was ia New York up to yestor- day, buying stock; and, as those I met who sold bim told me, ho bought for im- inediate shipment. So ho must bave the store ready to open before long.\" \"WVhy, this is newvs to me,\" the other declared. 'II can't understand it. I know of no such transaction-I have the rentîng of buildings that would ho suit- able for such a business-and, if there had been a deal of this sort, the chances are ninety-nine to a bdindred that we would know of it.\" It was now Ilartshorne's turn to ho amazed. 'Thait's rnost singular!\" le oxi laim\u003c (I. Then ho added: \"Bu,t even so, it mi-lt lhave been arrangcd qtiietly,, and the agent is keeping it to hîrnself. But cari you lihink of any vacant store that might ho suited to such a business?\" The. Doctor' s Most Valuable Assistant The value af the assistance rendered ta Physicians by Wilson'a lItwalida' Port, i cases af Meningitis, Asthma, Anaemjia, Neizras- thenia, Diarrhoea,. Indigestion and Foyers is inestimabl e. It is pleasant ta \u003cthe taste, and while being an effective tankc, it is perfectly haries anmd cari be taken by children as welI as aduits. s REFUSE SUSSTITUTES None genumne À4.a . dnw I acSjiO .' ,bot\"h *m VOUI L ROI BIG BOTTLE DOCTOR N When writing advertisers please mention The Western Homne Monthly. U71*EN dked with a Deeri ng disk harrowi _V.thE goud is Sa prepared that it stores âway and holds the moisturo from snow and early rains, liberating it ta the roots of your growing crops at the time when the y neet: it most. Dee*indisk harrows are bout to do tblswork te it shouldb. done. The frme la strong enough te stand, up under the !train cf penetrating and _'vee and cbrt proof as disk bettina can e \u003eI. The fuit lin. includes .every tstyla'e ýof 4U - àù smoothing harrow and the bust Une of drill. and cul- tivators built. Se. the Deering looelagent for fui information about tii, fine, orý%ed taovafor omta. lu4Tel Disk Haçrw,\" a book whlch Usiretuwa8 eplains the proper preperations of ýa », d be.dt'ad gives examples of the valu. of , * , S~p gO - \" valuable information-ia yours Lot iiat oM\";a I cover postage and paoking. Write fS L ,mPlèe r and Round \u0026 Jus Quais. \u003cirP~O.S",
         "The* Wstern Hnome monU»Ly Winnipeg, Feb., 1015 'LASSIFIED PAGE FOR THE PEOPLE'S WANTS If Youl vat te buy or sefl anything in the Ue of Poultry, Farm Property, Farm MachineMy or if you want Help or Employment, remember that the Class ified advertisement coîumns of The Western Home Monthly are always ready to help. you accomplish your object. Coat 3c. word, minimum 50c. Cash with order. NELP WANTED WANTED-Reliable parties to do Machine Knitting for us at home. $7 ta $10 per week easily earned. Wool, etc., furuishied free. Distance no hindrance. For full Particulars address: The Canadian Wholesale Dîstributing Co., Orillia, Ont. T.1'. FOR SALE BILLIARD TABLES-For farm homes, portzL.le and stationary. The gane of kings. $50.00 up. easy termas. J. D. Clark, Billiard Co., Winnipeg. T.Ë*. FISH-Fresh frozen f'-om L ake Manitoba. Piekerel $4.00Y4, Jacktisl $2.75, Herring $3.ÙOOy per 100 lbs. (sacks\u003e. Cash wvith order. H. Winton, Delta, Man. 2 BEAUTIFUL SILK REMNANTS, grand assortment, ini rich colors and prc:ty designs, large packet for ]oc.; sewing embroidery silk, large packet assorted colors, ig value, 10.; stfree; sesd stamps. United Sales Co., ration B, Winnipeg, Man. BABY'S LONG CLOTHRES SETS-50 dainty articles $5.50 carniage paid return mail. Lovely robes, day and night gowns, flannels, etc., finest materials. Everytbing necessary for instant use. »Lists free. Mrs. Franks, 175 Alfred St., Nottinghams, England. 3 MOTION PICTIJRE PUYVS WRITE MOVING PICTURE PLAYS- $50 cach. AIl or spare tinue. No correspond- ence course. Details free. Atlas Publishin* Co., 351, Cincinnati, Ohio. .. SCHOOLS AND COLLEGES CQRROPPONDENCE LESSONS in .ele- n,.extary subjects by college trained, certificated teacher. Care of Box 684, Moose Jaw, Sask. 3 EjLLIO'TBUSINESS COLLEGE, Toron- to, gives superior training for choice business positions; gractuates eminently successfui; open aIl year; commence naw. Write for new prospectus. 2 BUSINESS CHANCES FRgE FOR 'Six MONTHS-My special offer to introduce nsy magazine \"lnvesting for Profit.\" It is worth $10 a copy to aniyoi.e wvho bas been getting poorer while the ricli, rîcher. It demonstrates the Real earning power of rnoney, and shows howv anyane, no niatter how pour, ean acquire riches, lui- vestîng for Profit is the only progressive finaricial journal publislied. lit shows how $100 grows to $2.200. Wiite iioxv and l'Il send it 'ix niontlîs fiee. Il. L. Barber, 471, 28 W. Jackson Blvd., Chicago. 10 FRUIT AND FARM LANDS WANTED to lbear fronm 0w-er of good farîn 'for sale. Send cash priltc axI desci ipîjin. D. F. Bush, Minneapolis, Miiiii. 4 WANTED-To lîcar of good farîn or un- insproved lanid for -ale. SendI tescriîptionaxîd potce. Nontlissesterxî IBusinecss Agcîicy, Minne- apulîs, Minis. 2 PARMS WANTED-We bave direct buyers. D xft pay commuissions. WVi ite dt-sn-iig PI olert3-, namoing ]owest pritc. XVe I dlp buyc-rs locate desirable propex ty free. Ainer- eari Investusent - Association, 26 Palace Bldg, ,Minneapolis, Minn. 6 POULTRY FOR SALE 43 VARIETIES, potiltry, pigeons, dueks, geese, water fowl, incubators, feed and sup- p lies. Catalogue free. Missouri Squab Co, ept. D.Q., Kirkwood, Mo.4 RIGH CLASS ROSE COMB RHODE ISLAND REDS-Cockerels $200 and $2.50. John Duf, Mekiwin, Mari. 2 WINNERS AT EGG LAYING CONTEST- Vjrite to-day for zating list beautifully illus- trated with photos from life. It is free. L. R. Guild, Box 16, Rockwood, Ont. 5 PAKENHAM'S SILVER CAMPINES were wniners at Canada's largest show at G.uelph. Now booking orders for eggs. Write for mating list. W. E. Pakenliam, Norwood, Ontario. 5 WHITE ORPINGTON SPECIALIST- Importer and exporter. TInternatijonal winners at Buffalo. I breed witnners and start be- giriners. Pens of 3 pullets and cockerel. C. Schelter, Fonth ili, Ont. 4 PURE-BRED BARRED ROCKS-My Rock hens made an average of 149 eggs each during 1914. Fine dark well Barred cockerels fromi this choice laying strain only $250. Satisfac- tion guaranteed. William La Chapelle, Mc- Taggart, Sask. BABY CHICKS, dncklings andI hatching eggs, poultry and fruit froin paying combina- tion. Strawberry plants 100, 70c.; 1,000, $5; currants, 10c.; gooseberries, 15c.; raspberries, 5c.; rhubarb, ]0c.; perennial flowers, roses, dahlias, pansies. etc. Carniage prepaid. Cata- logue forwarded' on application. Chas. Provan, Langley Fort, near Vancouver. 1-16 FRE-We wil give free to an y person intere!sued in stock or poultry, one of our 80- page illustrated books on how to feed poultry, liow to build hen houses; tells tIhe common diseases of poultry and stock, with remedies for saine; tells how to cure roup in four days; tells ail about our Royal Purple Stock aid Poultry foods and remedies. Write W. A. Jenkins Mfg., Co., London, Canada. 2 PATIENTS AND LEGAL FETHERSTONHAUGH \u0026 Co., Patent Solicitors. The old establislied firm. Head oihce Royal Bank Building, Toronto, and- 53 Queen St., Ottawa, and other principal cities.1 T.F. STAMPS FOR SALE STAMPS-Package free to collectors for 2 cents postage: also offer lsundred different foreign starnps, catalogue, hinges;' five cents. We huy stamps. Marks Stamp Ca., Toronto. T. F. MISCELLANEOUS DR.* JANET E. FERGUSON, 290 Portage Ave., Winnipeg. Free consultation regardixig -ontr ailusent. Correspondence ixviled. Nervous diseases, Goitre, Rlieumnatism, Infant- ile l'aralysis successfully treated. I. F. SONG POEMS WANTED for publication. Exîicnience unnxecessai y. St îd us your vers or uselodies to- day or wî ii:e for instructive tîoklet-it's firee. '%la rks- Goldsmith Coi., Dept. 67, Washington, D.C. T. F. ]BROADENAXE HAIR FOOD Groivs hair like nsagic. Will not dye but nouix n-I ns thlee, oo glanids t o n t ural actio n. Directions for use on jar. Mail order price $1.00, posupaid. Broadiaicxe Co., 29 Stoinsrt l'on-k, Wiiliieg. (Mris. AI. Ferguson.) Estalblished 9 years. TF. Westerti Canada's Leading Iaxidermist Expert Mlounhilng of Game Heads and irds IIihest ]Pries for aIlIkinds of Rasv F-' Hid-s anti ini ge i-t ane n-ds. W lI 'u WNolf and Bear SkuUs Taxidçrmist Supplies E. W. Darbey, 2 3 7 Main Si. Winnipeg Official Taxid-riiii,t to -%Initoba Govrnsint Wlsen writîng advertisers pIease mention The WesternIMorneMoul- That's the editor of the Star,\" indicatin one of three mon seatcd, in earnest cor versation. \"H1e migbt be able to giv you some information. He certainly ca if any one can.\" \"No, I've got a botter plan,\" hoe dc clared, realizing that every one hoe ques tioned in the matter meant one more per son aware of what Bcrnheiîncr undoubt edly wantcd kept a strict secret. \"I'n going ta cail up Cicagfo.\" In his anxiety ta solve what had. nov t aken on ail t hie evidences of a mystery the delay that followed the giving of thq telephone cail secmied most unnecessary But at length the connection was iestab lished and hoe ontered the booth. \"cHallo, is this Mr. Bernheimer?\" hi asked. \"cIt is,\"came back over the wire. \"Wh( is this?\", \"Hartshorne. Don't you rememben me? I called ta sce you lit your hotel ir New York yesterday.\" \"W'hat's that you're saying?\" \"I say that 1 missed you yesterday rnornin 1 was there in the lobby ail thE \"Who la this, anyway?\" the man at the other end interrupted impatiently. \"Hartshorne. 1 thought you were coming direct f0 Terre IHalte, so 1 came here, too. llow soon will you arrive here?\" \"In Terre Haute?\" \"Neyer that I know of. But what-\" \"But what about the store you're open- ing here?\" \"I'm opening no store in Terre Haute, came over the wire, and as it struck Hartshorne's ear ho paled perceptibly. The rest of the conversation was ab- ruptly ended by the man in Chicago curt- ly informing Hartsborne t bat hoe had no itica of what hoe was talking about, and before the salesman could question further hoe realized the other had hung up, and that the connection was euit off. Tho case had now taken on a more complicated aspect than lever, but as ho counted out the money ta pay the operator Hartshorne realized that if Bernheimer wished the matter kept secret, as ho un- doubtedly did, hoe would hardly give out any information over the telephono, not being certain as to who was on the other end of the wire. \"Learn anything?\" the clerk asked as Hartshorne neared him. \"Yes. That I've got to go to Chicago immediately. How soon does the next train leave?\" \"Right now,\" the other informed him. \"The bus is about to start for if.\" A glance towards the street showed the driver climbing to bis seat, and, xtith a \"Send my trunks to my roorn,\" called over bis shoulder, the salesman dasbed out and sprang into the vehicle. Ttwas late that afternoon when the train ptullcd into Chicago, and Harts- borne started at a quick, nervous par(e in tho direction of Bernheimier's big store. Arriving there, he experienced some diffi- culty in getting f0 the proprîctor, wbo at irst sent out word that lie was too busy to sec any one. But the salesmnan exlbine(l the case fo the nierchant 's secret ary, tild ut last be ,as tisbered into I lie iprtn ran's prescnee, andi be brieflv, stated the object of bis cail. \"I w-aïs in New Yr! Bernbeimer explqgiedl in astonishinent. \"W'by, nman, yoti're crazN-!\" \"Now, !et mie explain,\" IHartshornc burst out, and speakin 'g r-ll li Ie i'î'1:tvd, the incident s that ballt aken place in NSew Yor-k thle previoi:s dax-. \"Soule one ils evident 1x passing hiînseif off for mie,''thbe ot ber saiid. ''Ai ifi isn't lle firSt tfinie, eit lier. 1Ilhaven't been in N'ew York for a niont b, and biave no in- cent ion of opening a st ore iii'ITerre 1lilt e. But the t bing that interests nie is rit (.ljîer bhis fellow. l'Il gîve a t boiislind doillrs for bis.,apf)relension'' \"IIe', probabiy in Terrîe Il:uîte now-,' The int erview -wals eut sli) ilt arp -id 1 llrsborne Ieft lt(,e oflbc, r:dzj 1iat Lis tfi bil iad hînî'd ouIa îî !rr:tll. And the sîo ii t iprt o11f ()1 was tlauý tble %wo i(llî:îve iil) ack ni wlie, hiz; f:i1 liurcto is ý,ellplie i. It %, zis nearx- iiiiclî!It \\\\ lieul Ill. aîIî, Trriu- llauîte fagain, :aîîd ic lvilircct lv to bis room, but îlot t o elî, ) . ]'Ij( ý\u003c'lOe care biad suivi an ait* (f ri-ivtll:lt it wel.glid heavily upon 111111. IlicVes re- fused to close. 24' st~ :. I,4 ~'. '-i i. i f~ 1'.~.' \"f - -hi ,;~ ~ kg le rose early the next maorning,, and - wliile trying ta force hixnself ta eat ait oe idea occurred ta Mim. He finished break- ,n fast hurriedly, and hurried ta the railroad stat;ion. «'I want ta find ouf about some goods 3that wero sbîpped here by freîght froîn r-New York,,\" ho told the ticket-agent, and -as that individual directed hlm ta the * Jreighit depot ho hastened toward if. \"Ilave you received a number of cases * of goods bore for a ni'ýn named Bern- 1heimier?\" ho asked excitedly of a clerk Yesir\" was the prompt reply. \"Are they still bore?' \"Only those wve received yesterday?\" e \"And t bore were others?\" Hartshorne quest ioncd. 1) \"Yes, sir. WVo sbippcd nearly a car- load of stuif day bofore ye.-terdav.\" r\"W~here ta?\" was tIse salesnsan's 1 breathiess inquir. \"Jasonville.\"ýry \"W'here is thaf?\" *\"About forty miles sotîth of bore. a The clerk paused as ho cought a glinîpso of a man approaching down the tracks, Land hoe added: \"Here cornes Mr. Bern- heimor now.\" Hartsborno's eyes narrowed as ho st u- died the nman, and thon ho sfepped aside as t ho other ordered the go(ls wbieh bad jusf arrivcd reshipped as the previous ones had been. As ho turned to go Harfshorne st epped beforo hum \"Mr. Bernbeimer, my namo's Harts- homne,\" ho said, and as ho spoke ho noted the look of astonishment on the other's face. \"I dan't want any of your goods,\" Bernheimer snappe£i. \"I wan't even talk to you. 1 fold as miuch fa the head of your firm.\"y \"You say you don'f want any of our goods,\" Hartshorne repeated, and there was a significance in bis fane that did not escape tbe otber. His look of agitation proved that, but ho quickly regained luis seif-camposure as ho snal)led: \"That's w-bat 1 said. 1 wouldn't have thern in my store.\" \"And you'vo a very gaod reason, Mr. Bernbeimer. I wouddn't sel yau al any price, except for spot cash. And 1 t bink sanie people have been stung. You're a swindler.\" \"hIld on, hold on!\" the other cried angrily. lic was standing close tel Hartshorne, and the words xxcre hardly out of bis motuth wbon lie tbrew bimiself upon tIse salesmnan, and in a fit of rage bore huii tot the ground, wbhere ho secuî'ed a grip upon the otlier's tîsmoat. At tîsis junettire a policeman appeared. andI altbaugh Bernbeimer struggled ta get aw-ay, the mon beld hlm uniil the afficer came up andI, at Ilartshamne's roquost, arreste(i bim for assauit. The salesnîan accalnl)anied them ta the police station, and aff or Bcrnbeimer was safely ladged in jail ho called up bis oîsployers on t ho long distance telephano and explaincd ta them ail that had taken place. At first the \"boss\" intcri-upted once or tv-icc, and bis w-ords w-erc curt. But as JEartshorne kept on with bis story flic otlser's voico suddenly changed. fiCBy Jove, Hartsborne,\" ho exclaimed fnally. \"This is the time if paid ta go fat l kep. If voit had soltl him, voit -ouldn'f hoin la'erre Haute naw, and tIse rascal mighf bave gat away with those goods beyoiid recovery. And, look bore, Ilartsborne, voit st:ty tîsere and press tIse assanîIt charge, so tliat lie tlocsn't slip ouf of our fingers, w-hue l'Il trv ta find ont wvlat firins bave soli this fake Boni- helîner You stay tîtere ais- \"But it's costly,\" llarfsborne an- sw-ercd back. \"Not ta x'ou. The firm pays ail -our expensý-es, even if you have failed ta nsake a .sale.', As Ilartshorne hung up the receivor lFe said to flic oporatar: \"Now gef me MVr. Bernîseiiner, of the Bemnbeimer Companv, Cilczgo.\" \"Thiis thsousand dollars from the Cili- eca',,o Berisheimer niakes this a prett- prîofitable trip,'' ho îuscd, a-n(I a snîîle if s:îtisfact itiuipaýsdoîloer bis face as lec a l, 1I: \"'liev say oui heicwide--aw-alc sîli-titI, bttfîscs i(xe the exceli- à FEE ear RolfrilGoldPlt Gatos Mfg Co. Dpt 54LChicalgO",
         "Winnipeg, Feb., 1915 I I Comiplete 9-Piece DÜ«ING 1100ESET at Big Savag $45,00f Tis beautiful set is made of harclwood, finisbed surface oak golden or early Eng- ish finish. Buffet is 46 inches wde and bas three small drawers, one large drawer and double cphoard, leaded glass doors. China closet is 30 inches wide, 58 inches high. Table bas 45-inch top, and extends to 6 feet. Diner set consists of five small and one armn chair, upholstered in imita- tion leather. strongly constructed, brace armns on smali chairs......$5o Special .............$50 Quarter Cut OAK BUFFETgJ ud CHINA CABIET tol7a7 Tihe case is moade of genuine quartered oak, hi ghiy polislied, bas bent glass ends with tliree si4elves for china or fancy articles. The center bas large glass cuphoard and two drawers neatly carved and fitted with locks and wood knobs. Thse case is 40 inches long, and is finished with heas-y claw feet. Has Bev'el Plate Mirror, 8 by 30 incites in neatiy carved frame 'with two smali bracket shelves. Hundreds more like this in our big catalge No. 1011 ................u. $171.15 ROAD WAGON $45.00 Wheeis i in. rini. 40 ini. front, 44 in. rea r. Sarv in patent. 'Seat Morroccoli;ic trinimings. Swe ll side stick seat, spring c~ho.gear double reacli rear king boit, fifth wheei. 15-16 long distance axIe. Body 24 in. tide wjth patent leather dash. Color carniine or deep black with green N.. 77. Our speciai lotv price $50 FREE WHIP with everv Vehicle or- dered f rom titis advertjsenment. The Farmors' Supply Co, Ltd. 173-9 Bannatyne Ave. Winnipeg, Man. Dept. W. I MnitbahIair6oods Co. W oesale and Retail Hair 6oods We carry the largest stock of hair goods in Canada, and our prices are the most reasonable. our illustrated Cata- inade up at 5oe. per Weai-e sp)e ialý.-ts in irakzing wi-s -1nt( totîp)ee.s. If vou like ta kîîow soitething about toupees ivrite us for- patieulas-s. Satisfaction guaranteed. Dejil. A. 344 Portage Ave. FR EE t. i nd Mt wteh. » t atOc.h.0d.r your 'oId«. .rwriting advertis'rs pleasc mention es c Home Monthi,. Write for lagise A. ('oîtbingsi mlince. The Western Home Monthly kg,. and1 eat ait break- -ailroad ,goods t front rit, and to the L. f cases Bern- Lelerk nger Signais Warn You of Approaching Paralysis [y and Surely Exhaustion Goes on Until Collapse of the Nervea is the Natural Resuit. il Young Womîan d Rer Problein By Pearl Richmond Hamilton [D She Was Always There We must understand people net te flnd ont wliat we caui get out of, them, but So l wl%,tat we can put into their lives. A good education teaches us how te, live. MJrs. Mayo, tihe pioncer mother of tise two doctors -vho, nade Rochester fanous, said: \"If one just says, 'I'm Youin going to be useful tili 1 drop,' it helps a table ai lot, my dear.\" there isi It ils a fine work of loyalty for two have ng lads te make the home of their boy- digestio, bood famous the worid. over. The Mayo ed, and brot bers lived ini a log and plaster house weaknes in Rochester but the niother's influence guiarity made of it a palace for her growing bodily or sons. Mrs. Mayo ls eighty-nine years feel tire oid-a living example of that genuine rnd mini maother who bathes lever at the fountain that yoil of youth. Throngh poverty, adversity, teoda i fre, famine, plague, Indian warfarc, and 'o seven )-cars of physical biindness she eie. was bier busband's unwavering com- are- thej panion. Uer husband, a doçtor, died of nervoi tw*o years ago at the age of ninety- tien and î!ree. Shie says lie was the greatest- ger sign the niost useful man-she ever kncev. In warn yoi lier own words while refcrring to him Is the ne slie gives us a glimpse into the inner Dr. Ch if e of truc home makers. She iays: sulccessft \"I often tbink that the secret of mi' that han hîtsbland's usefulness was that lie neyer lookcd backward. Looking backward is nat a good thing for onc's soul. It is wonderful te bc able not to do that. Thle Doctor thought nothing about the Y past, very littie about tihe present, but l!ways abouît the future. At sixty hce Bec spent a îvhoic ycar in Bellevue Hospital Every ci and the Coliege of Physicians and Sur- geons, working as bard as the youngest tudent tlscrc?' In the vcry carly days iith [The Doctor came te the States a young the shel Englisiî erigrant te carvc a carcer ont into rea of tise New World. Five ycars later he these m( with ail rnarricd. Then thcy moved te Minnesota 'rhey'1i where the two fanions sons wcre born. themsely Wicn the Sioux Indians rose against he setilicis,- .Nlrs. Mavo's courage con- vi ne-s us of tihe kind of character *ossessed by niothers of great mn. ler husltand was away hciping the set- lers. Shc says: \"XVill was a baby in rnis. Whîil it was necessary for mae to go to the barn or the wcll, I'd put nu a pair of overalis and tnck my hair iuider one of The Doctor's old hats and____ Parry a guii on one arm. Refugees be- wîa te, straggaie by. I would mun te the rate and ask. 'Wbho dressed yonr %ounds?' and whcn tlsèy said the Little 1)octor, I knew nîv lîusband stîli lived. At one titie I had seven families in my ittie lbouse anti three more ini the barn.. )y datîghter and 1 had to work day and ight te feed tisci. One day I bakcd a %viole barrel of fleur to fced the home- lss whe quartered on US.\" Hook Nose %as thse naine of the Indian eliief who ld the massacre and after he ivas anged the govcrnment gave his body to The Docter. It was froîn that skeieton bat tihe Maya boys got tiîeir first in- ;trucetion in anatomy. It hung in the father's office for thirty years. Mrs. Mayo says: \"One neyer knows ow mueh one- ean stand until one is ut te the test.\" Just when she [honght she conid bear no more she lost cmr sighit for seven years. She con- tracted sore cyes wvhiie helping The Doctor with bis patients. It was tiscu lije said: ,If onc doesn't give up tîmier silamitv, but just says, 'I'm going ta )e lsescul tili I drop,' 'it heips a lot my ]car.\" Tiieir iîîcome ivas snîall but tht v îzw ta it that their chiidren -eeeiv cd \"od ellucation. They Iw'!cveJ that [lucation meaîns service. At eigbtv-e,*ýhi The 1,etor went to rapin to stndy hospitals there. At lt-înelie ivent ta e c.It w aý * le Mslîo foun\u003cied St. M\\ar *'Ns Hospital a' \u003cioclester wiveh is rt'cogn ize\u003ct now iiiiong the first iii surgiea sienr 'l l Wo \\Iavo lsrotistrs N-1o0 -a rr 'v on tit\u003c tii-k so succesfillv tisre are the son.,s )f a, inotiser sîlio w'as gr-eat in inotso mwcî and a fat iîcs wio beliicvd iîn s- il1 cliild r - 'lThe -?i avo c(i ni c, wor' i allins anl\"nlsîscîîî. ta1lson\u003e11the J te of Tihe Lit tiec Docttîr's wildc rnuss iiije-teait. It's itiarble iotunsda matks o ie slpot thiat btis ollive, ouvipietl foi ok u en, wvoinen and c]i1ilieis froin al' rlt s oithtie A îsserîcai cuuitilsent tu bu W caueti maig otits.Wltec the t o m tabeerointhely and busintesu. hec coats for maony anddtais i he poltryasn is mad awnychces igsenj thDornd iake a nce ba.k ount bforte es tch Airsteas. Doenrs f gis aeking Ciemou oneoauh oeo with our outfits. Send to-day for ~ big FREE catalogue, it gives fui! details. Address:- The Dreit BOU. Co. M2 Elm Si, Wnipeu -% Metropolis Securities, Ltd. Dividend for 1913 ....... 10 per cent. Dividend for 1914 ....... 121 per cent. The balance of the capital ($12,000) in this sound and ýv-el-managrd comp-any is now offered for sale at $1 10 per share. Our rerio(Ii-ai payment plan permits the investor to purcha-ýe one or more shares l)y easy instalrnerits. For further particulars, apply -J. 8. MRIN, 612 Mclntyoe Dlock, Wiomiplog tmeutof.Raw Fun-athau HALLAM'S TRAPPERSPý SUPPLY CATALOGk I'~HALSAMrated nd!- PUR QUO-TS ATINS FURt $5.\" OmTTIONa hen writing advertiscrs p!ease mention The Western Home Monthly. rsay be restiess, nervous, irri- nd aleepiess, but you think nothing to be aiarmed at. You Loappetite, nis Impair- ae il 1there la sa and Irre- 1of other rgans. You cdln body L, and find ulack the to atcnd to- ytasL. that these ,. âymptoms as prestra- 1the dan- ias which :S ALLAN'. u that some form of paralysis x± step of devclopment. haae's Nerve Food la the most il restoratIve for the nerves ever bleen offered to the pub- here. lIilse ýracks Bern- Le st u- aside ýh lad eVious ,epped [farts- noted 41hcr's )od.s,\" n taik f your df our there Id flot bation ql bis have Mr. .any think s re a cried orne, f his i thle [il ta upon arc,(. o get ificer ýuest, the vas h is banc aken 7e or it as the an- Id Plat- selling de ,t tOC hlicaiso lic. This bas been proven In manY thousands of cases similar to the one* described ln this letter. Mrs. Thos. Ailan, R.F.D., 3, Sombro4 Ont., writes:-\"Five years ago 1 suf- fered a complete breakdown, and fre- quently had palpitation of the heart. Since that ilness 1 have had diz.y spelîs, had ne power over my limube (locomotor ataxia\u003e and couid flot walk straight. At night I would have severe nervous spelis, wlth heart pal- pitation, and would shake as thongh I had the P-7e. I feit Improvement after using thse fIrst box of Dr. Chase's Nerve Food, and after contlnuing the treatment can now walk, eat and aieep well, have no nervous spels and de not require heart medIcine. I have toid several of my neighbors of the splendid resuits obtained from the use of Dr. Chau'e's Nerve Fond.» Dr. Ch-\"'e's Nerve Food, 50 cents a box, 6 for $2.50, ail dealera, or Bd- manson, Bates \u0026 Co., aimtited, To- ronto.",
         "128 The VAagpnÈIamiaIhj~rn4a l, - - ----- -ov~'wN~PvNIEE.EEjWiflfipeg, Feb., 1915 humashd \u003eY two men 'wboae parents J:iveci ngthis qetion Wa. r o nt perwol ofotdb ag te rae ofhi t . s ervie mf uety. lve wt Gogplitai: Aw As a 'natter of fact - Prince Charmis he Couraelof thati oher muat havA ne man8 lot la 'made for her by the love slle prefers to, surprise.1 The girl with tl bee de elped in ber g:hbo d. A se- accePt\u0026. ;~It'is truno 0f-the ideals she aim; hoelà eager to offer bis wealth - s s M pr fe sio al m a n h o b s a y a o t . a i . o e b h r sema na n y g f s to b er. H o d o ca fo t ca re 1 tl g m o l e i o i e a d t i F a o .' i 1 , . a u l v i bthe s op f r a light bow to the girl w l o day: \"Tii. outatanding momory teperanâce reforin. Mary Lyon asini s fanxousy waits for him. Let n t1! h eve ---a m y mthrlatat oei loy with -the -ideil edneation 'for vo- urge my.. * 1 readers te aim at Boni( w !sIsy eresland ya at brane .to men. Florence Nightingale was in love thing if t iyould get themost out ý vabu. otson an dughers' ithb Cleslinois and order and beslth. life. The. girl who depends on th basMY YOUmg Women* readers Deborahi vas in~ love with ber country. attentions of muen for ber recreatio vongler hy 1 bave written this sketch Grace Darlla_ vasiii lovie with courage finsncially and personally opens a wa, £ mf,.otte of two great me-eas and daring beipfulneu. Jane Adidams te trying temptations. -mmt girls long for fine careers. Thiiuk is in love wth humanity. Queen Mary Silice girls have gone outside of thei ffl- * thte. rotiiering of splendid men i5 in love vitii ail practical plae fhmst ornaycagsh amu pue vmenla omn'siiihes Wok hatmak volenusful andl been made in their iives. They seek mor oéllmg? 4nýdodme it net require cai-e- vIomankly. The. love that each of these eommercializerj recreations. Insteauo .fui preparation? Olive Sebreiner Bays: peat wOfliou accepted fasbioned ber lite, a helpful evening at borne, they go i 'MWO' bodies are eur weman's vorks **etbe moving picture show, or the dance 'an hart-I woul adsu dÀr ini Ariend of the West Their mincis are constantly distracted o eThe girl vitii a definite sim in it i difficuit te center the mind then oi Coouim a Vocation does flot drift into the whiripooi of \"nY On.. thing. 1 Me, atreaciierous dangers. She is usually safe. AiU girls need vholesome recireation, be m \"a girl eomea te mg. witii this It is the girl with no fixed ambition- but care is needed ini the choice. It is reauttu «Will yen tell me how 1 cau werking and trifling time away, looking noble set of love for ber sex that w( clkÏ-ao uY voçatioei?\" I answer by aslk- vaguely into space for Prine Charmling see in the offers front our women in thi TEE .BEST VEGEABL te CANADAPS 0] Fort D0~Cnada muet bc The world neci during 1915. 'Y seeda immediate in-OMMenormous. C\u003epmlacubatiars sd Brooders. CyPrus Po«UR7_ Food\u0026. CyjWusC\"ckPond. Zenol.um DisWnectant. WRI1 WM. RIENNIIE CO., LIMWITED M5 UCM Dst., Ventreal. Que. 11n5 RamerSt, VaCeul e sowin de al Vhile1 ely ing Cypm 1 \"EF- FO BRANC aver, B.C. LND TE IEST FLwERg. rUNITY-E very foot of fertile soil in i and cultjvated to. its limit this season. the producta of the soil we can . grow Our supplies are large, we adviee ordering case'of ehortage, as the demand will be [ew Seed Book-FREE-w,.te to-day. Dftlopint Fond. Cyprus Growing Masii. Scmftcbing Fond. Pig1eon Food. Laying Maeh. Short Cut Alfalfa. Prawt' Poultry Foodis, etc. 'R PRICES 394 Portage Ave., Winn ,ipeg, Man. 'HIES: Head 016m and Warehouae-..AdeWdad dJarvls Sts., Toronto *aaantoed fer 15 VoarS FR[ p*éwnofnudméryK\"tcenWar u mIe utFREE Au 2. Pl\" 3. Wel 4. Doe St.e MO0 HOOSIER USER 3-qt. 1 have .oid 0000 Neosier Cabines tleWeqtern canadien Dpe women during the Jast t.brOe peara.And the Hoogier Stoe in nowà for Ils htgh sstandadofbusnsits Polloy lua atiufatlo or mon\"y refuzdod. Aluminum \"Esy te SeOI. ThIe DIS Value Mine Piet* Set A\"p euseau q »~~aU ton isÏol t Ibise very aruebcin 8pepular deumd- prsPum AI um. Prieudsanmd Every article bas the trou clsd il-pear neighbeas vIEb.iad le buy becauge .mmu«tlrraguarantee. And alleor of the mg Value. the sum ef 07.46 prepaid. Order y...set to-d an d start pour club e tn. Remomber Sy. lako ne riait. aMWeak* overythlni bockget Our oxponse If l47.45 'ft.Yeu ae net sa tls.,.d. iion'I h ave MUldton netsPH i 1 am te have Oo RE NA . . . .. . . . .. . . . . ndoeed .. . .. .. .. .. . ..ud.. . ADDRPH The Na,. tbm! assures you Honest Treatment IVANTAGE40orALUMINUm: M-Polaonou.. 4. Cooks Quickiy. aur Clesusd. S.Lltn. en I Corrode. V u a l . [ e lof m Dot Se.rch. 8. Win net Cipor bf Min. Plocos onIy 57.45 propali Lubor 1f 1O-luch Fry Paun- j S-qt lma Coffee Pot; 1 a-~î ieevn *iT-nltevre Br uiKetti.- 'Tiia a epn pnt PlarrIng 1 4-qt. Muât Pan. IILEP H. ORRy PRES. TUE \"dHOOSlER\" STORE 287 Donald St., Winnipeg, Man. TnCEirteI r. i ndAlexander, W ieP SPECIAL PRICES NOW OFFEIRED FOR Price List WOULD ADVISE YOU TO SHIP US WOFFO, AT AD HIDS N-w Ruady YOUR FURS AT ONCE Q Highest Market] W Price for ANADAEvery ýr. West te tako;.têe unenqk\u003eyed girls it0 ig their homes, -aid more girls are begiiî. lie ning te realize that -tiese offera :1 \", of opportunities for tbem. Last week te girl caine te me from the country. She, ,ho had been thero nino months anti nw ne flattering offer couid induce ber to r.- ie-. main in thie citv. Wiien lier two weeks'l of vacation endeci, she ivas cager t. go lie back.\u003e on Mrs. WbeatleY, tii. splendid Winnipeg ay frienci of the lvage-earning girl, bas ,%-oi a wreatb of bonor in lber efforts to bringi ir the women of the West in touch with ve unemployed garIp of the. city. Letters re are pouring li te ber, from girls tbrough. Of ont the WTest~ asauring ber tbat they toare happy ini their new enviroument. ýe. Tbrougb bier persuasive power she has mnol\u003cied tbe career of many girls and a deep sense of gratitude is felt by scores of women-. and girls for bier genuine siaterly interest. For several monti:. sl bahha been secretary of tbe Wornin' a employment department at tbe Indus- 'e trial Bureau and during tbat time she e lias inspired in the minda of hundreds of girls definite aima. Mrs. Wbeatley is a woman of unusual experience and naturai gifts. She bas spent much time abroad, ia well cdu- catec-can speak' several languages.- andi beat of ail bas a voman's be-art. Rer husband is one of our fine soldiers, andi during bis absence ah.e bas be-en do- ing thik fine patriotie work for Canada'. women and girls. Tii. Biden Treasure The. refleetion of the snul is the chief seal upon tbe countenance. The spirit- uial blooci of great iiearts fires the per- sonahity with power. Sometimes w. meet men snd vomen wbo are influen- t i l ot from *hat tbey do but froni wbat tbey do not do. Clotiiedinh the garmentg ef sincerity, neurisiieciwith gooci tbougbts, ar.d strorinluthe muscu- lar exercise of hone-at labor, tbey are genuine friends. TIhe unquenebable liglît andi the one unconque-rable force ia the human seul. Jennie 1B- was envied. because ef ber popularity aînong men and wome-n. Sh. ivas cie-an snd abe saw oniy cleanli- neas in others. She vas cheerful and people smiled vith ber. Sbe dici not live in tbe deptbs of self-pity and blame the worici for bier environ ment. No! Jennie believed iniitbe goodness of men andi women. Sh.' lookeci for biciden ricbes in other people. Froni every soul there shines bright or dim the gold among the wreckage. Most people are inter- ested in huniec treasures in the bottoin of the ocean or ixn the satin wood box- but many are flot interestedc in the aearcb for tbe biciden treasure in otiier Jives. If one finda in another the hidden treasure whieh is weaith of the- soul- she makes that person rich indeeci and sie- la a sharer of the treasure. Sonie-- one bas said: ,If you viii raise for e-veryone at least a fragment of bis deep-incrusted, sanci-bespattere i gold, wiIyou flot people- the.earth about voit -%vth the grateful ones yon have eni- riched from their own treasures 1\" Jane Addams, the- queen of social service savs: \"We are learning that a standard of social ethica is not attaiiied by traveling a se-queate-red byway, but byv mixing in the tiîronged and conunon road where ail must turn out for One another, and at least isee the size Of One Friendship W'liat is the- be-st a friend can b. To a iîx-seul, te y-ou or nie? Not iouîy siielter, confort, ret In îîîot refrealiment, une-xpre-ssed. \\ý'-t oiv a beloved guide To tlîreaid iife's iabyrinitli at our side, Or Nvth love's toreli k-ad mi before. Though these be mut-b, thiere yî-t is more. The- best fniend is an atmospie-re W-arnn vitli ail inispiratéionis dea r, Wlherein we breatlhe the- large, fît-e breatii, Of life that bath nio taint of death. Our fiind i isaitnroineious part Of ever v truîe htat of our heart; A. stî'î.i-th, a gr wlience ve (erive Cod's kitliat keeps the. world aiive. Lucy Larcoin. store. Wpg. m zuwaumd6d6 1",
         "Pcb., 191s la rebegii. offers IIIeajt ast week a, ountry. She, tha anti ne B ber to re- r two weeka'P pager to go id Winnipeg pirl, has %von irts te bring, touch with ty. Lette, iris through- r that they inviron ment. ver she bas girls and a ýIt b3- scores lier genuine !ral months he Woniel'is tbe Indtus- It time 1ig hundreds of of uniusual .She bas well edu- languages- ian's heait. [ne soldiers, as been do- or Canada's te is the chief The spirit- es the per- letimes we ire influen- Sbut from lied. in the ished witli the muscu- they are lhable light )rce is the hecause of rid women. ily cleanhi- cerful and id net lii-. blame the To! Jennie men and 1 riches in ;Cul there Md among are inter- lie botton ood box- d in the in otiier hec hidden lhe seul- rîdeed and e. Sonme- raise for it, of his -ed gofl, tbout voin lave ell- ces 1\" of social ig that a Sattaiined way, but eCOilfon fer euee ze of olie r sile. re. yvt 5s re -ge, fe ,vatl. '. irt rt; e (lerne Id alive. Lrcoui. Winnipeg, Feb., 1915 The Woman's Quiet Hour By E. Cora Hind Manitoba women will bave an -excel- lent reason for rememberingm January, 1915, fer semething beside the war. Tt bas marked the entrance Women of the woinen into mem- G;rain Growera hership ia the Manitoba Grain Growers' Associa. tion on precisely the saine ternis as men. There were thirty-six women delegates to Brandon convention, and wlîile the programme for -the general meeting con- tained a resolution te adSmit the woînen on payrnent of haif fees tbese delegates decided that if they were to be admitted et ail they would show their belief in perfect equaltyand wouldelainithe right te pay fuît fees. They therefore gather- cd togetiier and framed and passed a resolution to that affect, namely, that while they appreeiated the kind thougb± of -their brothers in wisliing te admit tbemn for haif fees tbey firmly declined this concession, believing that equal rigJ4ýs and privileges shiould carry with them equal duties and financial responsi- bilities. To rny way of thinkiiîg this is the only stand te take, and while the men had intended the half fee as a cour- tesy there could bie ne manner of dourbt thc convention as a whole highly appre- iated the action taken. The resolution amending the constitu- tien te admit women on the saine termis as men was carried by a. standing vote and amid much enthusiasm. AsPresi- dent Henders very happily phrased it, \"their wooing had been successful\" and for the future the Grain Growers' Asso- eiation of Manitoba will stand for that rare form of righteousness equal opportu- nity for ail. Tt bas been the privilege of the writer te ait in many conventions of botlî men and women together, but neyer te have seen a liner The body of women than the 36 Delegates women who represented the women Grain Growers of Manitoba at this convention. \"~Capable\"' was the word which seemed *best te de- scribe tlîem. Tt was evident that the mien felt this also, and that they had materially strengthened their organiza. tien by admitting the women. Tt was not surprisikîg te learn that some of these women, being lcf t widows with young families, had successfully farmcd s their owvn ]and and raised their families. Leoking round upon these 'delegates whcn they merc gathered by themaelves te deal with the matter olf full fees, one was instinctively reminded of the good woman of Proverbs, who \"looked well te the ways of ber household\" who con- sidered a field and bought it, and whose husband was known in the gates. Hlow rnany of my readers are reading Arthur Stringer's new novel in the Phila- * deiphia Saturday Post? It is called \"A Prairie Wife,\" and is a In Lightcr very diverting eéxample of Vein how co.mpletely a man may give himself away When hie tries te put himseif in the place of a Womnan. Tt je in the form of a series of letters îrom one woman to another, and should be labeled \"Iwhat a woman would net write.\" A good deal of in- no0cent fuîn xay be gos. by the genuine \"prairie W~ife\" from a perusal of these VeîY reinarkable episties. Thîis wintcr 1I'have been dipping into old timuie favorites, and last week re- iiewed my acquaintance with \"That Lass ef Lowries\" by Frances l-odgson Burt nett. When 1 was a achool girl, miy grandfather, who cou]d speak the Lan- cashire dialect fluently, read that book aleudj to lis. The charm of that flrst reading ail carne back witlî the book. Jt iS one of tlie first, as it le one of the~ 1)etlîtingrs Mrs. Burnett ever wrote, antiý once again 1 had rnany a laugli over hIe catustie wît of Iowd Sarnny Cradoek and bis wifee There are not rnany of the new novels whichi will ýbear reading 20 vears henceé I imagine. Another old favorite that bas come in for attention iýs the Amtocrat of the Breakfast Table. \"Ti11. (lhanbered Nautilus\" is surcly a ftting motte for the' Empire in tiiese times of stress. \"'Build thou more stately mansions, 0 My seul, As the swift scasons rell; Leave thy low vaulted past! Let each new temple, nobler than the last, Shut thee frem heaven with a dome more vast, Till thon at length are free, Leavlng thine eutgrown sheli by life's unreeting sea.\" But 1 must stop, as 1 arn' very anxons te have included a list of the names and addresses of the womcn delegates at the Brandon convention. Nearly aUlof them qare readers of this page, and they par- ticulibnly desired te be able te write to one aniother. List of delegates attending Brandon convention, with namnes of Tih.eLUt branch to -whieh they belong and post-offlce addreases: Ma. ILML Zimmerman, Salem, Port- age l\u0026 Prairie; Mrs L. A. Tbempson, Salem, Portage la Prairie; Mrs. W. J. W'itter,- Lornedale, Cordova; Mns. Thos. Weston, Elva, Elva; Miss Alice Shorliff, Elm Bank, Shi.pperley; Mrs. Jas. .Kidd, Sinclair, Sinclair; Mrs. Jas. J. Scarif, Mount View, -Dauphin ; Mrs. A. ]EL Chester, Boissevain, Boissevain; lira. A. L. Fisher, Gilbert Plains, Gilbert Plains; lira. Wma. Horsley, Elva, Elva; Miss Margaret Skelton, Elva, Elva; Mrs. A. W. Price, Gilbert Plains, Gilbert Plains; Mr@. Frank Simpson, Shoal Lake, Shoal Lake; Misa Margaret Simpson, Shoal Luire, 6hoal Lake; Misa B. Richardson, Beaver, Beaver; lira. D. S. McLeod, Goodianda, Goodlands; Mis. Colin IL Burneil, Oakville, Oakvllle; lira. Wm. HIi, Woodnorth, Woodnorth; lira. Jos. Bennett, Pipse Crcek, Pîne Creek Station; Mrs. Ncil MeLean, King'a School, Shoal Lake; Miss MeT%viah, Oakburn, Shoal LIrke; Misa Clara Delmage, Carneron, Minnedosa; Miss Della Delmage, Caaner- on, Minedosa.; Miss May H. H.L Bell, Auguaville, Augusvillc; Miss May Hoth- amn, Waskada, Waskada; Misa Annie P. Thomson, Waskada, Waskada; Mrs. D, N. Morrison, Gardale, Càrdale; lira. 4. D. Fisher, Ninga, Ninga; Mis. R. W. E d- monde, Springfleld, Oakr Bankr; Mrs. J. Smith, Pope, Oakner; Mis. J. Lean, Mo- line, Moline; Mis. Dan Roberts, Spring- brook, Austin; lMr\u0026. IR.]H.Mooney, U~ oodnorth, Woodnorth; Mrs. A. B. Jamieson, Lornedale, Cordova; lira. RL C. Bandera, Cuiroas; Misa Ethel John- stdn, Oakr Lake; Mra. A. W. Allan, Kell- wood; Mis. W. H. English, Ilarding. An Opinion The habit of uaing ardent spirite by men in office bas ocecaioned more injury te the publie and more trouble to, me than ail other sources. And vere 1 te commence my administration spin, the- fiaet question I would aak respecting a candidate for office would bc. Doms h. use ardent spirite ?-Thomaa Jeffersqu. Here is r Prepay Catalogue for Spring and SuniimM Showngyu thé.It ad prettiest fashions in every une. of Outer'Garments-on àal of to your nearest station~. wh ih eatfy raees,, and siinply beape with good values. And Here is our General Merchidis.e C4iu In whÉich is listed eoylm of goods, neceséary t-6 the Western home. Aways ready for refeoençe -AIwas reia ble-,Pcàs. ways rigt-And our £.lar=_ tee protects you to dthe fullest extent. . .. .. .These Catalogu«e hould b. in your hands by February 1 If flt so, foiward- us, the following Coupon: To Tbe T. EATON CO. Linited, Winnipeg, Canada. Not having received a copy of your 1915 Spring and Summer Catalogu% G E NERALplease forward same to Name ... M ERCHAN Di ~~A ddrem ......... WMNNIP~gsîCANADA the. Western Homo Mdont hIy",
         "The Weat.e,'n Home Monthly Wlrniipeg, Feb., 1915 What'the World is. Saying AThg to loepln Moa Caulsus c ma buld up Ckadwa b\u003e' buying goode muàd. in Canada by Cinadiana-Nelsou (B. C0.) News. Thé. Black Bread Of Humifliation By and b\u003e' the Kaiser will have to eat the blacker bremaI of humiiaition.-Toronto News. TheRire Idea .f Egua Rlgit8 TIi. Kaiser believes in the equal right of ail racs -Wbecome German-Calgary Heraid. Quit. so Businems à better and people are more cheerful i Blerlin, Ontario, than in Berlin, (iermany.-Brant.. ford Expositor. The. Point Of Vlew Thi erManl conception of war le that it ie a glorions thing, go long as it Tages around the homes Get Enpetationa Unr.aizd The. Prussians are prob abl\u003e' sorry that they in- 'Vested mone\u003e' in the South African reyulution and the Tù*kish hOlY-wur-Letiibridge Herald\u0026 Heroes The highieslt tYPe of martial heroism ie not the daslîing adventurer of roman'ce, but the mud-stained mian ini the trenciies over yonder.-Calgary Albertan. Appropriat. The. lion Ci'Oss bas been bestowed on a German Berebajit skipper who broke the parole hie gave to Mie BriUsi.Quit. ftting-Hamiton Herald. The -Luson of the war IIlunfor Europe ia that the true remcdy for vf a heti. enlargement- of demoratie government aid tii. eliinlnation of arbitrar\u003e' nutocracies.-Edî n- WE.' M P' -up the. Bluff to the. Last Moment -1f.Oeùniany ever colilapses'from economie disorder, as seen» likel\u003e', se will go down suddenly. The War Lord -will sece that the. bluff ie kept up to the luat seond-New York Tribune. Get Britain's Voluntary Effort W. ma\u003e' reasonâbly doubt whether even for home defence an\u003e' other country eould -bave iurpa8sed the purel\u003e' voluntar\u003e' effort we are now mnking in order to engage iu a war which je being carried on abroad. -Westminster Gazette The. Germanlc Logic The Kaiser referred in Auguat to -General French's contemptible little army, yet Englnnd, nccording to German\u003e', forced the war.' No wonder tbe Germa n mmnd is as omething understood onl\u003e' b\u003e itself.- Chimgo Tribune. Ancient Barbarism, flot New Science. The Germans have been ce lied «'masters of the new science and the oid barbarisit.\" American publie opinion seeme to have found in the attack upoît the Englisb coast towns ratbeFnîore of the old barbarisin. than the new science.-Pbiladelphia Record. Tiie Violence of Desperation A notable feature of the situation in Europe le thie extreme violence of the German press towards a\u0026H the adverearies of their country, and especiallv Ue ]British. Their rage ie vitriolie. Their language Es that of th ose wbo find disaster etaring them it gh, face-Louisville (Kentucky) Courer-Journal. A Real Democracy The editors of te Canadian newspapers are hear- ing from AAmerican newspapers to the effect that thje Monroe doctrine is our doctrine instituted for our own protectiont agaiîîst threatening monarchy for which weý have nto use. We do not look upon the British nmonarelîv za aîtvtîîing but a real democraeN. ý-Brook1yn Fagle. The Right Watchword If you cannot serve voilr eountry oni the battie- field you ean at least serve it at hoine b\u003e' eing courf- ageous. You denouzîce cowardice in a soldier, themi do not funk in business. Courae-let titis be the watchword for 1915.-Moose Jaw Times. In Diplomatie Language Court von Berustorif, the General ambassador et Washington, has been politely but conclusively in- formed by Secretary Bryan that in regard to bis assertions about purchaees b\u003e' Britain from American firme of dum-dum cartridges he is a. liar.--Ottawa Evening Journal The. Germai Way Germany bas a peculiar law under wbich a Ger- mnan mn\u003e' take the oath of allegiance to another country and stili retain his German citizenship. Of course the fact that sueh a man is a linr, a perjurer and a sneak ie a mere bagatelle to the nation that regards treaties as mere ecraps of paper.-Vancouver Province. The. Gooda for Canadians Ut the goode as weIl as the labels plead, for patronage and tbe \"made-in-Canada\" crusade will be a splendid success. The buyer who must count ever\u003e' cent will be influenced by the need of getting full value, and in that regard Canadian produoers cau keep pace with \u0026il rivale.-Toronto Star. Unprecedented The shell-ridden body of a whale bas been caet up on the Dutch coast. Not long ago one floated ashore, its bead havlng been blown off apparently b\u003e' a maine. The. war it seems is taking its toli of life from the ranke of the neutrals under water as well as on the. aurface.-Port Arthur Chronicle. One of the Things Germany Ras Learned \"The British flrst-line are splendid soldiers\" is the tribute paid by General liceringen, the German Commander-in-chief of the armies of the 'west. That shows what an impression General French's \"con- temptible little army\" of August lias made during four monthe of incessant fighting.-Seattle Post-In- telligencer. Belgium For us the great, clear issue of this wnr is Bel- gium. If we sc anything right at ail ini ail this niatter, Belgium je a martyr to civilization, sister to ail wbo love liberty or law; nssailed, polluted, trampled in the mire, heel-marked in ber breast, tat- tered, bomeless. but sister to every nation whose (4od is greater than Utility.-New York Times. Hofland's War Loan AlthougbHRolland is at pence with the world it bas been compelled to raise a war loan of 275,000,000 guildere. The Gazette de Hollande reintarks that thie stum wilI suffice if demobilization le imade possible by the war's ending before April 1 next. It is to be feared that the littie kingdom will have to raise stili more money before long. The nîost hopeful obser- vers sc no sign of hostîlities ceaeing as earl\u003e' as the couming spring.-Canadian Finance. The Women's Share of the War Tt ie te women who bear the brunt of war. The mian %%,ho fights may die in the trenebes or ]ose a leg and get a p)ension, but the woînan left at homte muet take lier wvay as beet she cau witbout the aid of male support, be she inother, wife or sister. If -wars could be financed tlîat the sufferers wlîo figbt to lîve in desolated honmes should be put on tlhe pay roils as ivell as the men at the front, future wars wouild be fewv and far between. The cost would be staggering. -Victoria Colonist. In the Fore-Front Officers are beng kiiled at an extraordinarv rate on the battlefield of Europe. Out of the Blritishi forces eerving on the contingent every seventh man kiIied Itas been an officer ranging in rank froîn lieu- tenant to general. This is ver\u003e' inpressive. Tt indicates that com- tuanders are fillIing the posts of greatest peril lunttis war. The\u003e' are not eending privates to d\u003ckath; the\u003e' are leading them there.-Philadelphia Telegrapît. What the War Must Secure for Civilization Essen cau be blown to bit, and probably will he, but that would be ttere poetry, and while it woffltl be nice, it would not hinder the great Gerniaitmurii- (ler-mili from growing again. What peop~le will mwat if the Allies win is assurance for the future, for a geiteration or two, that the slepp o? honesepleli~i four continents will not be disturbed bv' the rattlet amîd clang of the Krupp forges in tîte night. g(ttjjpr ready to biow the jid off the îvorld.-Ilarper's W'eekly. Fragrance from Clogne The. German papers are still publishing long ar- ticles contninfing the most paltry kind of abii-e \u003c f the Englisb. Here are some views expres4ed by the Cologne Gazette:, \"The German press ehould bec made to underetand tbat the golden houre are too preriolie to be wasted in dwelling on the bypocrie\u003e' and thme lies of the Englieh . . . With a snarling (log there le no use in arguing; the only repl\u003e' possible is a vigorous kick.\" .Straîtge to sa\u003e', the editor pro. ceede to aesert: 'IWe muet occasionaîlly depart froma tite straigbt rond and meet the liar witit the lie. That je the onl\u003e' way to silence Ilim.\"-Obtaýa }Free Press. A Tribute to Canada Since Canada is an Englisb-speaking country, bred to British traditions, trained to Britisht ideals, impregnated with British democracy, of, course it wva. \"unprepared,\" as \"unprepared\" as the n6tiyr- country bas ever been, as \"unprepared\" as ite neigh- bor to the eoutb, a country of similar origin and characteristie, proverbinllY is. And yet, five nionthe, after the caîl came, five mon _.s since it was tlurotvn mpon its own resources, it ie confident ini its pre. parednese. The Dominion of Canada may bc taken to-day as a world object lesson in the results of a system that is employed in the making of citizens rather than in the training of warriors.-sprintfld Republican.. A Straight Answer Grand Admirai von Tirpitz wants to know whstt the United States wili say if Germany declares sub- mtarine Ivar ou ail enemv merchant ships, torpedoing every British or allied vesel which nears an\u003e' harbor in Great Britain. Well, tbe people of the United States of America, including a good man\u003e' of German blood, would probabl\u003e' sa\u003e' that Gernian\u003e' was war- ring on non-conbatnnts, w'as killing mten ivithout veapons it their bande, and therefore wvas no longer fit to be nuinbercd among the civilized nations of earth. Their verdict probably would be tluat Ger- ntan\u003e' had become a pmariah. governnment, an outlaw among the peoples of tbe earth, a public menace.- Detroit Free Press. Some Light Penetrates to the. Berlin Tageblatt The Berlin Tageblatt, a newqpappr of the first rank, asks thme Germiat professors not to be so vain- gloriomus. Professor Ernest Hlackel, the fainons evo- hutioniet, bas been talking glibly of- the conquest of London and the annexation b\u003e' German\u003e' of the greater part of the Britislî Empire, together with large portions of France and Russian Poland. Other mnen of learîting though evidentl\u003e' of infirm judgment see the German fiag flying over Canada and Australia and Britain reduced to the level of Holland. The 'Fagebiatt thinks tîuis sort of botubast doee harm to Cerinan intereste and would like to bave it moder- atcd. It adds, amonget other thinge, that histor\u003e' -%%il] decline to speak, iii praise of the German diplo- itiats, wbo left the nation ivithout allies except Amis- tria and Turkey; and is evidentlv mot at ail sure that the Kaiser je going to win. AIl are not bliîîd in Germany.-Montreal Gazette. The. Battie of Flanders We know now that ln point of casualties the battle of Fiandere bias been the greatest battie in Ilistorv. Our correspondent conîputes the total losses on bothi sides at 300,000 mcei. 0f titese tîhe Gernians Iost, at a moderate estimate, îtîany tintes confirnied f ronm variomîs sources, at least 200,000 men. 'l'ite aI- lied losses are put down at 100,000 îîîen, antd haîf of tliese Mucre British, the reason being tîtat it feul to the-lot of the Bfritish ariuY and the Jndian forces to nwithstand the inoet furioite attacks of the eneun\u003e', esl)cciall ini tîte earlier phases of the fighting. Oiur troope are estiîttated to bave lost in the battle 50.000 mien, out of wlîich number 5,500 casualties oceuirred in the In(lian regiments conimanded by Sir James Willcocks.-Loîîdoîi Tintes. The Task of the Allied Armies The question O? 'whv, if the Allies are doing se weIlý1, tîtey ]lave not thuts far inaîtaged to drive the (lerniaus froitî France and Belgiuni. is answered ini a frauuk spirit b\u003e' the militar\u003e' expert of the Londont Tinies. Ie says in effeet that; neither Englamtd t'or J'rane mas ready for war. Lord Kitchener lias \"dIis- ltlaYed prodigius aetivity' but lie le no niagicianl.\" amid it m-ill 1w ' ebruarv before ]tis îtewî army is readl\u003e to taîke( the field. France lias ttot as :et put amtytiiui Ihl- lier wliole streiîmtli into the camipaign; but is 111akinîr al baste to equip fresh levies anid b\u003e' Feb- itiam1Y il vl I]laive a iii1 llt newiten ini action. Mcmi- li 1tme \u003ch ýrmman plan m of cattîpa igu, naniely, a qickiý offenîsiv e fol Iowed 1) 'v a speedYv ietorv. lias siguîally fa il. Germîtan liamkets and maumfaturcms atrelie- g I l j n- to ask whîere thec tuoney Ito carry on the wa r ita cOnie froin and îîhat tlîe etd is likel\u003e' to be - J)uiluth lUcrald. Winnipeg, Feb., 1915 The Westeign Home Monthly",
         "WuiM~, Feb., 11 The Wes tern Home Mont hly The Canadian Bank of .Commerce ANAMT I LPiPlr'rpÉ-' j.L~LL.v £ ALlIA /// ng long ar- )f abume of s4ed by tule îild ho mnade ,00 pre(i\u003c\u003eus sy and thme flarhing (log îly possible oditor pro- lepart fr-ona tii the lie. btawa Free 9 country, tisli ideals, couirse it Ibe în61rlWr i.its neigh. eng n alid ive methei l'as tlirown iits pro- be taken ýsIlts of a of eitizenls Spnitngfleld Thc annual meeting of the shareholders value of $1. The last annual statement of The Canadiaxi Banlk of Commerce was of this Company, bearing even date held in Toronto on l2th instant. After w ith our own, shows a surplus of 83,240,- the report of the Direetors had been read 411.78. the president asked the General Manager The Bank's notes in circulation stood to address the shareholders. Ho spoke in at $14,942,557 at the close of our year, this part as folows: account showing important fluctuations Address during the period under review, from a Generl Mauger'sminimum in JuIy of $11,934,000 to a When we had the pleasure of ad- maximum in October of $16,679,038. dressing you on the oceasion of our annual Our deposits decreased $11,304,905, ac- meeting for 1913, we had every reason to counted for by a general reduction in- look forward with appaetly well-founded current account\u003e balances, which is flot expectations that tho year just ended unnatural under the crcunistances; the would prove not les favorable than the ordinary deposits bearing interest show preedig oe.There was a movement a decrease of enly $197,211, a remarkable durngthefiatmonthe of the year s0o, xhibit when we consider the probable wordiei t scope as to lead many requireinents of smaîl depositors under to infor that the drift of financial affaira existing conditions and the ýextraordinary towards a moderato prosperity had bc opportunitie which have off ered for comle unmistakablo. The uneasinesa re- investing in first-class securities at re- garding the settlement of the Bakan munerative rates. Bills Payable Ac- question had almost disappeared, and count, representing our participation in with the gradual adjustment of other international exehange transactions, political and international diffiýulties thero amounted to $3,924,151, being a reduction wau an apparent readiness to return to of $5,591,636 from the figures of our normal conditions. This enabled a large last report. We wish te, place on record volume of securities to be marketed, that in accordance with an understanding which did much to relieve a very acute acted upon by all the Canadian banks situation. As the season advanced the in London as to the moratorium in prospect of satisfactory crops and of respet of bills of exchange, we adopted fairly good-returns from every legitimate the poliey agreed upon by the clearing enterprise should have assure a finanicial banks, and re-accepted, with a few and mndustrîal revival. Thon came the trifiing exceptions, aIl our bills which outbreak of the Europoean war, an event inatured in Auguat, although during th so tremendous in its import that at first whole period we were carryingbank we failed to realize the extent of the balances more than sufficient to meet dislocation cf business that it would thesle commitments. At the. expiration entail, and the consequent hardship and of the thirty days we resumed paying ahl loss to every conceivable interest the our buis without exception. We did not world over; yet we have stood the shock take advantage of the moratorium in with remarkable fortitude and courage. any other respect, and did se, in respect Considering all these untoward cîr- cf our bilîs.merely to join in a united front cumstances the report and statements te the public., new presented to you brin g us the satis- Caîl and Short Loans were 827,677,- faction that wo have not laore in vain. 386 and other Current Loans and Dis- in consequence cf the extrsordinary counts $142,588,076, as compared with depreciation in the prices of ail securities, $57490ad$5,7,8 norls strictvlinad; and arflvg in onstreport, the total being $17Ô,265,463,a very src ns n aigi h u decrease cf 310 076,337 for the year. beon conservative and prudent with the Govemment anci othr securities were disposition cf our returns from this 1\"1127 eraeo 2765L source, we were enabled to, make al our T21,191,247,a e cas cf 82766,571 adjustmnents witheut itreigwt bilities cf the public was 43.20. In thus current profits. Our usual care has been teghng.orpsinw avte exercised in providing for bad and doubt- satrsfnteing ouroigt havcedte ful debts, and with the eun oe usually granted te any cf our customers proitieus times we should derivo very was curtailed during this very trying im 0 rant recoveries. year. The net profits for the.- year were The members cf the staff now number $2,668,233.29, a decrease of $324,717 3,536, a slight decrease fremn the figures cf froni îast yeara'nd amounted te 9.36 last year, but with the decline of business, p r cent on the Caital and Rest comn- sufficient te equip evey departmnent bina. We wero enabled te pay divi- efficiently. We include in this number dends amounting te $1,800,000, theso those on our Henour Roll who have tem.- being at the usual rate of 10 per cent per porarily left cur service at the cali cf duty. annum, with extra bonus divideads of 2 We have given beave cf absence te these per cent. The regular appropriation for officers on.ternis which should be very the Pension Fund required 380,000 and satisfactory te theni, and it will be Our subsriptions te Patriotic Fund amounted pleasure and duty as far as possible te, to $55,000. We are carrying forward in reinstate them when they return. Rot- Profit and Loss Account a balance cf ween 325 and 350 of our men have volun- '\u003e1,117,763.27, as against $384,529.98 a teered for military service of varicus kinds year age./ at ho.ie and abroad, beIsides very many You will notice that ne appropriation others who are preparing for any emer- has been made in Bank Promnises Account, gency during the centinuance of the war. which shows an increase over last year of This contribution of men and money and, $405,5 10. This increase is mainly ac- what is more important, the loyal. spirit counted for by the final payments on manifcsted throughout our service, are soine of otîr larger buildings and by the creditable alike te our staff and te, the suinis cxpended ini purchasing sites for a Bank. nuiner of the smaller offices. As we In reviewing the past year, we cannot. indieated in the report presented te you but be impressed with the fact that Canada in January, 1910, we have in the past bas had a rcmarkable escape froni un- endeavored te keep the figures of this teward disaster in financial matters, and aecotint within 50 per cent cf the value we should realize that werse might have of the properties which it covers. During been our fate. With a courage begotten the past year we obtained froni reliable of experience, we shail face the future with otside experts an appraisal of all the full confidence that much good will reinises belonging te or controlled by the eventually come eut of the present Jink, instcad of relying, as formerly, upon situation. the hest information available tbrough President's Address our varicus managers; and the result of this indicates that the figures given The President then said: i n our balance sheet are well below the The war has se changed aIl business limit, of 50 per cent just referred te. conditions that it may seem unnccessary This is a source of much gratification te te describe those previouslv existing, and is, einphasizing, as it dees, the conserva- yt't without doing se it is difficult to esti- iX est imates cf our managers. In mate our present position. We had this \u003c\u003c\u003efnlvtioii we may add that the passed a period cf trade expansion threugh- tilk owils and controls the stock cf oeut the world which in our case hiad been TIil' Do\u003cuuinion Realty Company, Limited, sharply exemnplified by our forcign trade 1- ehCempany our amnaller buildings 1 ret urns for the, year ending in Mlarch, 1913, urvcted and owned. This stock isý when the cxcess cf our imports over ti1'riud on our boekU at thc nominal 1cxports feu just short of 300 millionl dmil vi UMJLW dollars, and in addition te this we had to jirovide' interest » and dividende on se- curities -soM abroad cf from 100 te 125 millions.. To meet this we can trace the sale, of securities, during the year 1913.te the extent cf at least 250 millions. In the sharp -contraction tbroughout the world which followed, -the question confronting us was how well we could bear the lees cf pr te l securities and the abrinkage of tae caused by the stoppage cf the building operations based upon our sales of securities. 1 The more important cf our public and private improvements were nearing çompletion, and the fact thîat we muet in any event pause te demonstrate byin- creased. production, the wisdom cf buiding them, was clear te many, but the enforced contraction, though it naturaily went toc far in the other direction, was necessary- te bring us te a haIt. The world had gene through the severer phases cf this con- traction, and had entered upon the year 1914 with distinct hopes fer improvement in many countries, notably in Canada. The great banka cf Europe were able. te increase their reserves, money was grcwing: easier, the market for securities was im- proving, and indeed, by February many issues, ;'hich had been hebd back for soime time were sucemafulLyr\u0026 aed In the United States the new taiflegîsiation. and the new Bank Act were events of the highest importance, and if the effectas -! thesewere still soimewhat uncertain, at least a great deal cf painful dôubt had been removed. Later on the prospect cf a great crep left the question cf improved rates for railrcad freights the main pointa te ho settled in crder te put the United States again on the highroad te prosperity. In Canada, while trade was still blesaenS in activity, and money stiIl hard te obtain andthe prospect for our cropa leas hopeful than that of the Unted States, vo feit that in order te make cur future secure, we had only te leasen our paoe and te turn our minda more te immediate production than te permnent improvements. 'Ele.- where, in Frnei the Balkans, and in the Latin Amerîca repubica, there vue still much financial trouble te cvercome, but conditions in Londcn continued stead- ily te improve, and with that ipoe ment the power te seli our seu=te seemed te be rapidly returning. It vas, therefore, te a somewhat chastened but distinctly hopeful\u003ebusiness conimunity in Canada that the rumçrs cf war at the end cf July came with portent. cf evil .in every direction. .It is net my part to-day to, upeak cf what war means te us in its effeet on our lives, on cur hopes for our beloved Empire, or on the happiness cf our familles--I may speak cf it only in its les important effect, that on cur material proea1\u003eerity. As we know, the firet effect ou finance and trade was the closing cf almost ail the stock and merchandise exehangea in the werld, the cessation cf the enormouis trade, not only between the countries nov engaged in the war but te a very large degree between neutral cuntries and those at war which were blockaded by the fooets cf the allies, and the breaking down: for the, moment cf all dealings in foreigu exchange, letters cf credit and in the vast number cf credit arrangements exiating botween banks in different countries throughout the worbd. This paralysis affecting for the momine a large part cf the international trde ifte wcrld estimated at about forty sebil fdollars annually and« aIse diîturbing countlesa millions of domestic trade in ah bleading counitries, was nearly universelin, its effeet merely be- cause London, the gr.eat pôwer house of the world, had to pause for a few days in order te consider how the nov conditions were te be faced. I need net teil you what wus aceomplished in the way ocf remedial measures by the wiedom cf ho British Govern ment and the leading bankers, merchants and mon of affaira generally, but the few words which make te sufficient defence cf the Chancellor of the Exchoquer are pregnant with a mean- ing which cannot escape the historian of British affaire fer centuries te come. Ho said: \"There is ne doubt that we have 1 will not say, departod fromt any principies whîch have been accepted in this country, but that we have undertaken responsibil- ities which ne Government bas ever been called upon te undertake in the past.\" In tho report cf our Lendon manager which appears in our Review cf Business C'ondtitions, a most admirable summary is mnade on the varieus events in London bearîng on the finance and trade cf the (Continued on page 31.) - p Feb., 1915 SbI0 Wu il Red For -Se,.. Wwks Thon Dodd's Kidney Pus Cufted Montreal Lady toila how, aiter FeW Teara' Ifless, She Found a COM»Mt Cure for all Her Troubles. Moîrtreal, QUe. \u003cSBpe\"I)m' Madame J. Baptiste Rerube,ý reidig # 1393 Logan Avenue, Via ity, aserts M after four years' suffering froua ld disease she has been oompletèly e4oI tic health by Dodd'e Kidney Pille. «'I had a pain iun iy left ulde sreuud tèe heart,\" Madame Berube sy l e statement. '141auffered oonstantly with heqadaohe an'd baekache, and for sevai weeks I was dua bed wiVh kluney dises anid feebleness. The'doctor could not he-lp nie, se 1 deeided to, try Doddes kid. ney Pilla. \"'Alter the liret box I wu ome bet\u0026ae. I oontinued to« use I\u003eodd'a Kidnsy Pilla tilt now the palpitation han left me,mad' [ am a well voman, able tAodo May wXLk Dodd'à Kidaey Pilla oured me a I re- commend them, 40 \u002611pereons ivEudWfe as 1did.\" Notie 1how maty »Mren an i4s nto tell their .ufferiug aiters they dMn fnit- relief In Dodd's Klduey1Pila, The, m. son ia that nine-tenths of woleama 1 spring from,.diseaset or dIkr\u0026îrdM4. neye. Every womam vkrose k1dny show signa of veaknes houd M u Dodit'. Kidney Pilla. 110W whst ýlares sîîb- torpedoing .ny harbor hoe United :)f German was war- ri iithout no longer iations cf tlîat Ger. tu outlaw menace.- »ebatt \u003e the first \u003ese vain- nous ove conquest ty o! the Ier with d. Other judgment Australia nd. The harm te t moder- t history an dipie- ept Aîîs- ail Sure neot blind Mtes the Jattie in al losses Germans onfirned 'l'ite aI- I half of t feul te orees to oeînly, ag. Oiîr le 50,000 oeeîîrred r Jamies loing so rive the red ini a Lon don aud \"lor s reaidy nyvtliig but is )y I(('1\u003e Meai- a quîck, iigul * %r are Ie- lue w;ir ,0 be- OME AlSUý100 7\" 'l g advertisers plcam e ntioq ITherl O.t m oe onthiy.",
         "The Weate,'n Home Mont hi v Wuinninêg ~ i iii e - - - -----r . - - ~.j . The Philosopher à XATTER aPIECTINO LOTE 0p LmF For the purpose of arriving at accurate conclusions .u regard te the effeets of aleoholie beverages on the Iength of hulnan life, forty-three life assurance coin- P8*408s'in Canada and the, United States have fflilJuted their records on two million insured lives for tweBtY-live Years, for study by a committee con- sisting of actuaries and medical men. The statistical conio\"ns arrived at by the committee may b.e luiefly étated. Among men wbo had stated, in apply.. iAg' fr insurance, that they hail taken alcohol te eaoon ooesionally in the past, but whose habits Were oonidered satisfactory when they were insured, the. death rate was 45 per cent higher than among the insured lives in general, or, to state it another way,, their lives were four years shorter than the average. The committee's report alse states that among the men who had used. alcoholie beverages \"aiy, but not \"te exceas\" the 4eath rate was nearly 50,per cent higher than among total abstainers. It would appear f rom t,ýis that Russia will gain enormouuly if the prohibition of vodka is made per- nl\",ent. The ]os of haif a million soldiers ini the war would tQuesbe made up in ten years. CLUB TO 19ATURRIS SXCRECTS A earload of fossile of inestimable sientifie value have -been -ta4en from the. BelIy River forma- tion in Alberta te' the .American Museumn at New York., Since the gigantie monsters whose imprinted forme are thus preserved in enduring atone roamed the- earth, 'continents have settled to ocean depths anid rose again te mountain ridgee. The American Museum is an admirable institution, but why should ne t.these fossile and the éther wonderful material for the increase of buman knowledge which happens te b. situate in Canada be placed in a Canadian national institution? The sublime thirst'for knowledge.which uliloeks the secrets of the piast knows no uines of national distinction, of course, but a healthy national pride should prompt us te be the firat to make use Ofourown opportunities. *MR RNINOFOIT ARGUMENTS TO BARTH ,r. Deraurg, formerly Colonial Secretary in the Emperor Wihhliam's Cabinet (there are net any German colonies now) and at present officiai apologist and,mendacious explainer in the United States for tliqÏ.Iaiser has found every effort hee bas made in the States a boomerang. Hie latent device has been te extract cunningly from Morley's Life of Gladstone certain sentences inii Gladstone's speeches, which, lifted out, from their context and fitted in to a, sctting of Dernburgian argument, Dr. Dernburg prctends to regard as in nome way eupporting some of his con- tentions. But Harper's Weekly, the New York Times and other leading journals of the United States have gene to the trouble of hunting up the passages in Gladstone's speeches, and proving that they are grossly nlisrel)rcscnted hy Dernburg, for iyhosc en- jightenment Harper's Weekly cites the following passage from Gladstone: «'The greatest triumph of our timne, a triumnph in a region loftier than that of electricity or steam, will be the enthronement of this idea of Public Right as thie governing iden cf European policy; as the comnmon and precious heritage of ail lands, but siperior to the passing opinion of any. The foremost anmong the nations will be that one which, by uts conduct. shail gradually engender in the tninds of others a fixed helief thaï it is just.\" Ifarper's Weekly furthier cites what Gladstone said in 1870,,whien Great Britain -%as ready to go to %var if either Germany or France invaded ]elgiuîu: «'If we had gone te war, we should have gene to war for freedom. We should have gone to war for public right. We should have gene to war to save lîuinan lialipiness froni being invaded by a tyrannous and Iawless power.\" But Dernburg, needlese te say, did not need te bave pointed out te hlmi these and etîmer passages frein the speecli-.s of Gladstone and othier British states- mien, which United States jeurusîs are nom, quotiug for hie benefit. Hc kîiews the truth, cf course, being a vcry learncd German, but as the truth will not serve hie purpose, lie resorte te falseluoed. But lie exhiibits a stupidlty wluîch seems se claracteristie cf the lenrîîed Gernians wvho follow tlîat plan. For exalilile, lie rceutly visited Princeton University, ûf' %lfich Presidciit Wilsoni was fornierly the lîead, niid there addressed thîe students. lHe said earlv lu tlîntat îdress, that Aimtria was deterînined te go te -%var, anid Ceriiian v otîld net possibly have stepped lier. ITowartîs thîe close cf thec address, fergetting l-a h ie1atid i at tho e btiiiiing, lie said that if Great Itritaîîinimi noi 11 ied Geriia w, udmistakabl.% tlîat she %euilil joiiiniiite war, (ieriiiîiy would have accu te it tliat tiiere N \u003ciiid be ne -war. A Princeton studen t asked Drî. Je-iiîI-.' hiew luuti these state- mneuts could bu tiîîc, andî thie leariieti Germit fiounidered helplessîy ini tr *vin-g to extilcate hiniself frôm -the predicanieut lus iiiC0iîmistoiit falhhoeds liait landed inu in. AT CLOS£ GRIPS In the war of 1870 the rapidity of the Germain triumph over France Was due in large measure te, the magnificent roades ad the bighly developed state of the territory in which the war was fought. The roadsanad the abundance of food supplies te sustain armies on the march facilitated the clock-like developmeut of General von Moltke's plaris. Iu the present war the Germans counted upen a repetition,- of the war cf 1870. They etarted te advance with the same lock-like precision, confident that tbey could carry out their plans for a thunderboît descent upc» Parie. The .roade were superior, if anything, te those of 1l, sud the motor artillery wsi every way superior te the artillery - 1870, and there were numerous rich aud weil-stocked cities and towna, te say uothing of the villages and innumer- able farina, where the onrushiug troope could find austenance. But the Belgian resistance saved the situation for the Allies and the cause of freedom; and the fightiug in Flanders bas revealed clearly that a higbly developed territory je a hindrance rather than a help te an invasion by highly organ- ized arînies. A country crowded with large cities, whicb are tied together by populous villages, criss- crossed with canais, with railway embankmcnte, with irrigation ditches, cut up by quarries and ceai pits, cbeckered with hedges and with walls about private grounds, thicly strewn with lumau habita-' tionsWhich-aftet thé s6id Burýopean fasîdea mak\u0026s of almost every peasaut's cottage a miniature fortress-such is the ground over which millions of men are fighting. The result is that the long battle front sways and bendsansd curves and turns back upon itsecf. A great deal of the fighting is from street te street, from bouse te bouse. It je barricade warfare on a huge scale. TE 111551.OF TEE TIlLE TO COME Few developinents in cnnuection with the war bave aroused greater attention on the part of many tbougbtful people than the great power and the unexpected effiiency of Ruesia. The enormous ares and large population of that Empire and the fact that ge huge a proportion of its people are still in a primitive stage are regarded by net a few even well-informed students of passing events' as giviug ground for tbougbt as te the use which the centrolling influences iu Russa may choose eventually te make of the grcatly increased Russian prestige and influence in the world. Tt is reaeeuring to learn from comptent English observers in Russastlîat thme change ivbich the past ten years bas mnade iii the Russian efficer, the Russian soldier anti the Russian people generally le such as te give goed reason 'fer confident expectation of a great further improvemeut in the whole Russian body pelitie. The officers are from the great Russian \"middle clase,\" cf wlîich the world outeide Russia knowvs ittle or netliing, antI ivhich je said te be rcally progressive, witli an ad- vanciug enliglitenment wlîich would greatly surprise strangers te Rusela, if they were te visit that country. The soldiers are described by Mr. Hamîilton Fyfe as cheery, rough, ceurageous, obedient and siinple-rminded. The simplicity of the mass cf the people in Russa places the future of tlîe coutry very largely in the bande of the \"îniddle class.\" The course and resuIts of tlhe war inust îeetls give Grent Britain and Franîce a potent influence in thie sliaping ef Russian national evolution, sud thîe fate of Ger- inaiîy will not fail te serve as a salutary narîîing againet dangers of autocrscy as a system cf govern- ment. A *PMM * RO*E The peCUliar diffi-ultv of the D)otil:hobor probliem stands eut elearly ini tue report of the recerit public interview betn-een the Iîead mnen of thie Dcîîkhuobor colInmunitY il, Brîtish Celumnbia and Attoriiey-Geiîcral Bowser and Provinîcial Lanîds Ccînmissioîîcr Ross, cf the Governrnent ef that Province. Plainly the At- torîîey-General n-as neiiplussed by the contention -vth which the Doukheber leaders mnet lus reiterdted statenient that the Doukhobors should se foi tliein- selves the nccessity of their cemplying %vitlî the provisions of thie law regsrding vital statisties aînd thue sending of thîeir clîildren te scluool. No inatter in what ferm this w-as set before tîmein, thîcir conîstanut reply xvas thînt Jesus Christ did net sec the ucssity cf vital statisties. but euh- san- thie levessit y cf simplicity and cf love toN-ni-ds allichei'lîlr. aind i'ecogized that mnking life cciiiplex led te îîîî-lî ci-il w-Iiih ceuld otlcrn-ise bu avojîlec. Fiirthiîr. fliî- - deinaiided that the Provincial ('hipif cf Police. whli wias preseîît at the inter'view. as cumfilillaat ou beliaîf of the Ia-cf the lanîd whvt e i )îkî~î %vill net obey. shiould state lionw long the )iîh iis hiad beeîî ii British Celuimbia. the îiiiiho f îe~m iii the 1Doî1khuoboi' eomiiiiit.:înd the- iiîii o f ])eîkhuobors thiat hiau becîî nrrestciî. He repleil tiit tlîey hiad beccin i thie Pi'ovîncî' five yeiirs. thînt tii-m- nere about.5.0) of tlucîi,'atidtlîtatîot 011(. oiftli uuîîiiiber lad cver bec-n aîrested ou a criîi ial clumrgo. No wonder Mr. flweer coflfeteed hîmmeif perplcxed by the preblem of howv to handle these people. They are seemingly happy and contented. They ai-e neither vicious ur lazy. They are very industriotis. They bave brought thousands of acres under cultiva- tin. But they de nt conforin te ur stanidardî of civilization. -When remonstrated witlî for not obey- ing our laws, they reply that our aws are net the aws f Christ. It is true, indeed, that ur laws ar, in large measure, made te protect ourselves agaiîst conditions and develpment which are the resuit of civilizatin. The trouble with the Doukhobor coin- munity is that they hold of supreme importanîce things whieh we place ne sueh value upoîî. and regard as ivorthless thinge which ve hold te be of necessary importance. This is an impossible state of affaire in the b\u0026tly politie. Noînelow or other, the Douk. hiobrs will have to be brouglit round to seeing the necessity of coîforinîîg te tlie requirements of the law, which are for, the safety and welfare of ail. THE ABORIGINAL CANADIANS From the Superintendent of Indian Affaire at Ottawa the Philosopher lias received tlie annual re- port of that departmcnt, which is a blue book oF' exceptienal interest. The Indians of Canada. like their white brothers, are bettering their position cvery year, more attention being paid te agriculture, and the yông men of 'the agencies' turning tlî1ciir hands te industrial pursuits, wvhile hunting and fislîing, of course, form the chief occupation of the Indians in the more sparsely settled regions of the Dominion. The war has affected some of the Indians very considerably as a result of the lay it lias affected the fur trade, the European market being, 80 largely eut off. To make up for this. the depart. nient hias instructed its agents te see that the Indians dé o nt ant for the neessaries of life. and they are being advised to hiunt for food. annunition, wine nnd certain food staples being issued to thein free. The health of the red men is being wvell looked after, sinallpox occurring aînong themn only rarely now, and when it dees show itself on a reservation being quickly stamped eut, while the figrht against tuber- culosis is being waged with notable effect, the Indians being taught the dangers of insanitary surrouindings and the benefits of plenty of fresh air in thieir dwelling places. The total Indian population of Canada is now 107.1221, not including the Eskimos, whose number is 3,447. 0f ail the provinces. Oîîtar:o lias thie niost Iîîdians, viz., 26,41(). Manîitoba has 10,.290, Saskatchewan, 9,799, and Alberta. 8.281. Great pregress is being made ln educational work amiong the Iîidiaîîs. Onme of the niost notable western niews items during tlîe past mlonth -%was tlhe rep)ort' of the nmovernent among thec Blackfeet living on the rtservation near Cleichiemi, ini Alberta, for the cestab- lislinient of a newsl)aler of their own. The Blackfeet and other advanced Iliitian tribes liay.e contributed generously te thîe patriotic fun\u003cl. and a number of thte yoting meii]lave voluîiteered for active servicE at the front. A NEW EUTGENIC SC-t-EME flespite the failutre of the attempts made in thie States of Wasihington anîd Wisconsin at eugenie legislation, tlîe euigeîiists in the United States are ]lot (iscouraged. One cf theni. a NewV York pliysician. lias corne forwvard %vithi a new idea. In Washiingtoîî lie law (lesigiled te rentier diffijeuît the inarriagýe Of hy i a ly uifit prersoîîs %vas l)roniiItly rel)enled ini respense to the' geiieral opplositioni t( it wvhicli becanie niaîîîfest iviiemi tlic attenîîît was madî\u003ce toe eîforce tlhe Ian-. The saîie dissatisfaetioîî lias beeît aroiised by the attempt toenciforce ftic WîsoisOî,iî Inwa,. w1liih lias flot yet been repenled, but whlîse repeal iS re- garded niow as a foregone coillsioli. The New York llivsician -with tue ien- avidea ii tlis ccii mection tliinks thiat lie lias ]lut upon a tleviee wliicli iwill obviate thîe objections to tlie provisionîs cf thue W Vaslîîgtoi' aund Wisconsin Ian-s reqiiig a plivsical exaînîiation cf eicdicanidiate fori' natriîiiv 'anîd a liysician's cert ifia--tet( liat sîîch canidîate is free fioni aîîy disease n h celi iiiglît be traîîsîiitteîl. His 811-,etien is tiliacdiof te~olIb oiîciî paî't es slionld b(îeîîrd before alproaciiitig tlie altar, teliîand to flic(,tiIer a iîewlv issuiet life iii- suralîe poliey, Ofuc , c ourse. iWoil iii\u003caiitliat thlie lrseil on01 lsc ife tlîe 1)011ev was issiicd baal pwzse\u003cil tue cru iii i i*.vNexain ilnat joli vthe insuiraîce ccii iî . caîuîingplîvsic* n. l'rsoîîs w1losc .5ei5e t cllecyi-lit bc offliii\u003clý, tilîe rqî niienit oetjisi iCi'iis' Celtific-ateýs tlat thîev wvere fiee frent a iisii)itta)le d isvase. as a l l *I -eqîî isiti te 110 riiioî'.nilIlieotlie )1 ee - ae a liv ob1ccti101 %vlîîîî tie ohje( t cf tlie exiiljati-uî is the inatter-of- far' hisfles liletof gecttl I le iniiîraîîc. 'lie N on' r0k îvinins sdÎlieile %ilî. a t Ieast. bave thie (iitlIi)istjî. cîorosation of a Il ali m I iîîr- Ni iii telife isIllrali'uei4.si. ?lî\u003cvîo îîts'1e tueIl ist.it îvi1l îhîîîuîîî\u003cîîî[itself fie îil a iiîîber ofthji(sts. 1But a iLý.0%via-~ old ~ll vee te halve it tr-ied euit in soîne othe'r coiitrv tlîaîî lic i'Ii* t lo'y li~ c Iii. k ~\u003c¾. The westaimn 1fome- monthly ,W*Inwm. Feb.. 141-r.",
         "leb., 19gis The Western Home mlonthly, order from a judge before foreclosing, and giving the judge power in cases of great hardship te extend the time of payment. It is not intended te interfere with the collection of interest, rent or other debte of like character. In Aberta a new Act has been passed in connection with the proceedinge for the forecloeure of mortgages and sixilar securities, but this is not in the nature of moratorium or other legisiation caused by the war. In this connection it may bè well to eay that the speaker has recently geen the re- turne\u003e of fou rrgelendrs by mortgage, thc total principalof ewhoee boans amounts to $60,000,000. On these boans interest bas been paid in the east with only a very trifling percentage of arrears, while in the 'West about 92 t,94 per cent of all interest. bias been.paid, cither at the moment when perplexed )pIe. They They ai-e ndust riotis. tcr cultiva- ta1l(ar of flot obev-' ,re flot the r laws are, 'es agaiiist Sresuit of lobor coin- mportance and regard neccssary of affaire the Douk. Beeing the rite Of the of aIL Iffairs at u'Inual re- B book of' nada. like 7 position grriculture, îing tlîeir itiuîg and on of the ns of the ie In(lians ty it has ket being ie del)art- ie Indiaîis I tliev are on, twine hein free. ced after, now, and joln being ist tuber- ie Indiane roundincye ini their lation of Eskimos, i. Oîita«rio toba bas a. 8.281. Ial work La western le report, g( on the lie cstab- Blackfeet ntributed .iîber of e servicE due or withi three monthe tbereafter. Anyone who can remember the conditions in the now rich Province of Ontario twenty-five y cars ago wîll think this a very good howing indeed. In Saskatchewan there are now com- missioners whose duty it is te look after the finances of the various municipalities i the province. It je interesting ta lcarn that one company, ow-ning about-fifteen millon dollars in Canadien municipal bonds lied at the end of the year only thre town and' three achool section bnds, aggregating $4,500 of principal, in de- fault, and this tempoay eault had taken place sice August and lias no real significance We have in ecd year remsrked upon the condition of our foreign trade, partly bedause in the disperity between importa and exporte the danger line of our expan- sion je most eauily found. We have ta m»l securities te, settie this différence sud we bave to pay the interest on thèse Securities. Frnk*ly, with thc balance egainst tusat M=rh 1913, of $298,711,000, slready refere top, we had çone fer enough. m contraction inibuildin prtossdti general economy Uwhic h ledaltreedy bdephýa helped te bring thie debit balance dovwn so that by, Mardi, 1914, it lied fe1e. té 8171,620,0W0. *Thec improvément: hiw- ever, was caused by a reductbod n oly 341,325,00 in importe whilethoee wua an increase in exporte of $85 -65,000. In. theoe figures Uic export and imnport of coin and bullion are included. Heretoicre ià has not- seemed worti while to adjuat the. official figures by lea.ving tie ieàms m14 but during the half-yesr ene ~8i~ebr 1914, the' shipinents of ta Canad were a0 large este render an aejutt Wînnipeg, Feb., 11 1110 Canadan Bamk of Commerce 1(OontxfluOd from page 29.) world. In our own country, while the inue were emnaller, they wer of the most profound importance to us, and we ca jiever be too thankful for the high intelli- noes nd the quicknesse of action of our . n.te of Finance. Our gold supply is not imipotant i amount as compared mîth that of the greater nations, but its reevtion le vitail important to us. convinoe people that-the haring of Iod was unnecssr, and in any event to mae it nearly imposible, was part of the tIlhee agit wain Egad One of the Mot effective means of accomplisbing this was, as far as possible to make sure thst the inevitable result of war ini cur- tailing business would not bc intensified ya rack of currency with which to carry on our daily affaire. The arrangements propoeed by the,, Minister of Finanoe, approved by hie Government and p ut into. operation, ail within twenty-four houre, were as follows: \u003c1) For the firet time in the history of Caiiada banke were empowered to nay their debts in their own notes, W en these notes reached the clearing house, however, they were redeemed in Govern- ment legal tendere or in gold. The notes were not, as manypopespo, made a legal tender as betwen nidividuals, and the main object of this arrangement was to prevent people from eecuring actual gold coin in order to hoard, it,a procese which would have been ruinous to the nation as a whole, although comforting to the individual who secçured the gold. (2) The banke would have been able under the Bank Act to issue the usual exergency circulation for crop-moving in September and this date was set back to Auguet. (3) The Government raised somewhat the limit for that part of ite legal tender issues which je not entirely based on gold. (4) The Government undertook t; make boans to banks on approved eecurity in order to aid them in carrying on the business of the country. At that moment no machinery existed by which Canadian banks with eall bans or actual cash, in either London or New York, could use such resources te pay db8in Canada. It seemed at firet as if i t would be necessary to deelare several Bank Holidays in succession to afford time in which to work oui remedial measures, but the latter were provided s0 promptly by the Government that no general cessation of business took placaz The value of sucli measures is not te be judged by the use made of them. On the contrary, we are proud that they were used so littie. Their real value consiste ini the assurance to the public and to, the banks that steps have been taken, so far as lies in the power of the Government, to enable business to go on as usual. Since the passage of these measures the effeet of the really wonderful provisions for financial relief set in force by the Imperia] Government, the consequLent ending of the British moratorium, the recovery. of Britieh and the partial recovery of other international exchange markets, the re- mioval of nearly ail enemies of the peace on the high seas, and the lowering, there- fOre, of the charge for the war risk in ineurance, the partial resumption of operations by stock. and merchandise exehanges, and many other remedial fea- turcs, ail these have helped largely te re- store the broken machincry of the world by which before the war all international and mtîch of our domestic business trans- actions were carried on. The only moratorium legislation put into cffect in Canada thue far is in Man- itoba and Saskatchewan. in Manitoba proceedings to enforce mortgage security on land are delayed for six months, while the period allowed for redemption is ini- creased to one year. The Act doca not affect trust deeds securing bonds, de- benture or stocke. In Saskatchcwan an Act 'vas passed giving widc powers to the Lieitenant-Govcrnor for the protection of debtors, and these powers have been exercised by a proclamation extending protertion to volunteers and ireservists from aIl legal proceeses for six monthe, and b 'N a further proclamation giving pro- to-t ion to ail debtors against legal procese 1l11 er chattel mortgage, conditional sale \"Ir hire reript, except with the approval .fi îliesheriff. Ini Ontario the Government have in- tiiii:iried their intention to introduce ~ITRITE .ys for our new Edison Catalog-tbe catalog that tells you alil VV uw model Edlison with Mr. Edison's uew diamond point reproducer. about ou n.o Edbmso der Now read: Endless Fun mu p lne l lfoad real hppinea.la lbund to-ate te f bit citiée, ZABuhanti Isnging at the uninet of fan ne htz 1 éhows. Be ar the m id aid chrch hymne tho maleseie choira alur choiNms orZane. the eeji.f beans ,the unitu eibet utein. the sa$ds ean M aW tte AiluS b.yae ith the ~ibs n Fm oe s. *0 Cob.mpot TODA. about the wenkhfM It wilmis\" uni 7m vot o el\u003eAt a hoaulb ock-bottmupre 9wdirne t frm- . The Réason: 0«.,shold wemaktem yuch r é, àm prod etbiEmnfàcent new instrument. Wiun eitn«tonec» vl bod wlà v jit Dthnlu lke ih bas ever been beard-mo woadeirful. no gra\u0026 se boss fui. mech iXnr 0f enterta¶nera-ea W. are Pretty sure that et lemt àaMeorne, if mmat'0,. thenaombad eel vl ant to buy 0 eof theme Dov ad ismImnspobUw u.I,. bb\" au\" I mev at the aêmlg ubohmsnai a -à Ev dmm a mon\u0026h Our New Edison Catalog Sent Free! Your naine and addresa on a fpostal orZl) a ltter, or Juet obligations lu aaking for the caaog. Oct thia offer - wlae thia oflbr le. F111 out the coupon today. F. K. Babson, Mm .fbh.qql %iUim bot.7442,35 FIMsAW.. Whsg. Mj U. I Ok. OBes issock, Chicag -r r dso .Wonderf ul New Instr- ut r, MstruzÙii P in thie eugen le ýates are hlysiciall. ýshiii\u003c4Oil rriage of ca led ini Il becaie foi-ce the \u003eiisetl by v. whilîl al is re- 'lie, New icli Ivil of the pli , sical 111v andi 1is free ed. His ti-aetiiig, iîîgq the life iin- an tlîat tied lia(I wh1osc lisite to tter-of- The aethe Humbiier 1 prefer lai) the Juat Ont -The perfected musieal wonder of the age. And shipped on a- stupendous special ofter direct from ms Mr. Edison's Ho0 6., e L a Ofr bi onyrh. Y. the brand new records on an \"\"\"ofryee..loua. Heur aU le tii.aisastva. workeveai stepe, vaudevilles, minstrels, grand opera, ad sacred hymne uvuy klnd et te ri =t p comieansd populer music, elso your choice.of the highast graj caearts ami nagraph. At lest ho operas, as reudeed bethe would'a greatest artiste. Entertalaj_ y ou t as prouced tubbylhrn nw madl bnk of and yur fInnde. 17.,,, waïe j« ug w f lvs.mtA M e t l7MOurm It; over 23 yjranof gwai back e Or .xpeuw. work on a i theSe -~~~ e=oc- alglvSn- .mho not a penny dovu--no deposit-no guarantoe-n C. 0. D6 BVto us-no olilgation to byafu natrial ln your ova hame--dbwWu and hobby perdectedl frein ur-diret t you _Rat-unab etou pense r paybl I 7",
         "Wsk'n-WoeuW M~btb1y VNAB4-8LE OUI RUS sage C9 Lm 1TED WINNIPEG *1 hn~r a~1.~raq in the 1915 Plan: 20 Year Endowment. Amount: $1'000. Issued 1895. Matures 1915.* Age: 26, Pregnium: $47.34., Total -Cash value Of Policy in 11....1,577.00 Totalof Premiums paid 046.80 Retumnm\"n.exeseof Preiminspaid $ 630.20 Or over'41% Compound Interest on the iuwestment in. addition to Tuebèo1~tàIs gves prýsnt rates and guantees. Write toThe Great-West Iàfe, Winnipeg, for a oopy. WinaiegFeb., 1915 - v. /. v iàp\"etlve-. The offiiaiCxEssf ooeelx--no0e-u for the half 21%0% but P»ùitting ahipmente of corl an\u0026bulionit wuonly 804,02%0G Fro, hi tmefoerdimpore aou\u003c show av ra I décliné, whil, ea s of hîg pries for grain, the oerrying outI0o wu cantracts for thé alliéd countries, an\u003c the -gemeral desire t su lall that in avail. able and to buynohg that is not a ne\"ty,.our exporW\"andimporta should In théeriver future more néarly meet tham aI- ny lime uincé thé early yearsof liii century. This will bé a highly creditable accomplishment, showipg that withoui 'ue pesur we could in two or three yesrs do whatour unfriendly crtics thought imposaib1e% that s, adjuat the very large trade balance agamnst us. Of courie éhavé stili our interes o 0py and t' country, in order to méétpth most consérvative demande for devélop- ment, mutst h a borro*er for many years bo come, but Ithink weneed haveéno great fear of tbé future in ttâsrespect if wetake sufficient car of our crédit. During the year 1914, although thé markets wére only 'favorable a t timesand, sinéethe war, havé béés practiMaly closed to us, we sold securities abroad amounting to over 225 millions. .. As méon as Great Britain begins bo buy any new securibies éther than war issues she will buy oure, snd méantine wé muet hope that the market for our bonds in thé United States wilU continué té grow. We cannot 1toé oftén- draw -thé attention of thât country té thé fact that when our foé . _ trade is analy.ed thé net débit for thédifféegce betweea our sales and our purchameais payable té them and not to Europe. If t hé w prevents London from buylhg our securities, eithér thé United State. muet buy them or our gréat trade with that country muet fail away, andi thé cry of \"Mulde m Canada\" woul then havé éven a wider significancé than it bas té-day. During thé year ending March, 1914, again omitting thé figurés for coin and bullion, wé made purchase fromn thé United States té thé value of M40,818,000 and we sold thém goods té the value of $178,282,000, sé that with a net éxcee of importa from ail countries of $179,945000, thé éxcesa i nthéecaséof thé United JStatés was acbually $231,- 536f00. Part of this is, of course, offset by thé actual cash brought into Canada by sebîlérs from thé United States, part b investments made hère by Américans, antdpart by thé purchase of our securities, but it has mainlý beén settled in thé past 1out of thé procééds of our sales of sécurities in London and on thé Continent. It is not possible té forécast thé éffect of thé war upon our économie position, and we muet bé preparéd té meét each néw condition as it arise, but we can learn sométhing from thé évents of thé war, and gain courage or caution as a resuit. The coet of thé war to Canada is already arranged for in bondon, so Ihat né money is béing witbdrawn from Canadian money Markets on that account, and to thé ex- Itent of 60 per cent, represéntimg that part of thé war expenditure wbich je paid out in Canaawé obtain money in London with which debts abroad can bc paid. Thé war bas brought us military con- tracts and purchases.of. supplies on ac- count of Get Bribain, France and Russia, thé amount of which bas béén estimated at much higbér figures, but may safély bc placed at about $30,000,000); our exports are thue increased and a cor- reponding ability té pay debta abroad created. One estimate of thé resuit of thé war on Our foreign trade places thé annual valué of thé importe into Canada, thé movemént of which is eitber directly or indiréctly affected because of the war, at S110,000,000. We can gather from this srerough idea of thé extent bo which our importe will bé restricted by inability té obtain the particular articles we desire. Ib is already cléar, however, Ibat réduction will aIsé comé from lessened imports due directly té léssened brade at home. On thé éther band, éxports will hé enlarged in quantity and value by thé foreign demand for foodstuifs of ail kinds, and already thé préparations for next year's crop exceed anthing known béretofore. Lese notice- aLble, but probably of great économie importance will bé the resuilt of the wave of economy which has swcept over Canada, mainly an enforced cconomy, but affeetiig aIl alike whéthér incomes are reduced or not. Thé effect of the carefuil'use of food alone, thé realization of the vaille of a bit of unused land as a garden plot, the littIe or great increase in production of almost evcry farm, in Canada, east or wcst, the As Others See Us Thé térror in London at thé menace of Gérman airships is such s cannot hé imagined. Nightly are to hé seen fright- enied crowdasesurrying to, their suburban homes liké rats flééing to théir holés from thé chasé of thé cat, and al Ibis notwithstanding thé powérful séarch-, light installations on thé prominént buildings and monuments. Aftér a comparatively early hour in thé évening thé streets are deserléd ex- cept for a féw drunken stragglers, thé ragged unemployed, and the police, and in tlieir gloom and solitude thé thorough- fares already present thé appearance of a con quered city.-Vossische Zeitung. Transcending History Let us sit down and read history. Read thé most terrifie pages of hirtory Read of Caesar, of Attila, of Napoleon. Cet our souls fulîl of thosé pages. Com- prelhend the sublimity of their upheavals And tiien force ourselves to realise that the page now being written transceiids them ail in horror and importance. We cannot realise it. . . But we rnust. And thie sooner the better. This thiîig hasi Iappencd to us. Tlhe realisatkfl should iiîduce a solemn state of mind, for wliieh there 15 1n0 word except thé Wvord reli-ious.-Aruold Bennett. a wifbflngut@ wmI out oI\u003c1clothees ad té r. put Off thé purchase Of -aUl uxuries-no a Inatter hô* dàhible:-the cry for goode \" \u003cMade in- Ca\"àd,\" and the slow but a gradual réalistion that every unnecessary e mpért yb. a wrong to Canada eveti If if thé Purbaérinseif can afford it-aîî 1 ùf thesé thingo muet, taken togethér, - niateriglly increasé our financial ability, t to béar the tirain of the war. On the 1 other hand, many of our greateat industries a re working on short time~ or are prac.. 3tically closed down, our railroad earnings espealc éloquently of the contraction of *business, men are not thinking so much of making money as Of conserving their 3position for'better timés,, unemployxnent )as a ànroblem face us as rarely before, and tthéeal newspaper makes it impossible bo fort that our material affaire are a secolr considération while we rel undér thé vast shadow of the war. Immigration has nearly stopped for the bimé being, exoept frora thé United Sates and thé Orient, but, owing to the war, it is impossible to obtain figures showing prent conditions. We havé, of course, at for a timé, a large number of our béat people by thé depatch of our own contin- gent, by thé réturn of réserviste, and in other ways. The reports of our superintendents and others on thé business conditions in thé various areas ini whieh Ithé Bank is inter- ested are, neédiéess to say, of more than usual importance. They range from référencés b thé 'greateet financial évents in thé history of thé world to thé price of thé agricultural products of a locality, and théy give faibhful représentations of thé various éléments working for or against our proep*rty. If wé coneider thé awful éfféctsof thé war, we can but congratulabe ourselvés on thé manner in which Canada has stood up under thé strain and on thé spirit shown by her people, while if wé look beyond thé war, we cannot doubt thé ability of Ibis country to carry out évéry prophecy made as to hér future. In connection with thé success which bas attended our confederation of thé North American provinces i one. Dominion of self-governing people, wé draw at-. tention to thé report of our Newfoundland manager, in which thé hope is éxpreséed that thé sat ste p contemplated lby thé Fathers of Confédération is now possible. of attainment. Thé report of thé Directors was then adopted and the retiring Auditors, Messrs. T. Harry Webb, C.A., and James Marwick, C.A., were réappointed. Thé usual votes 'of bbanks were passéd and thé old Board of Directors were re-elected without change. Civilisation Pérl Civilisation, as it progresses, réquirés a higher conscience, a keéner sensé of justice, a warmer brotherbood, a widér, Ioftier, truer public spirit. Failing the\"e, civilisation must pass in.to destruction. It cannot hé maintained on thé ethies of sâvagery.-llenry George.",
         "Winnipog, eb., 195 The Western -Home Miontht.v Conimunity Building By J. S. Weodworth, Sec-retary Canadiau Woifare League bues sud t. PXrures--no 'fôr goodâ slow but nnecessary âada eveti rord it-ai together, *ial abiîity' .On the industries are prac- d arnings raction of go much of ving their flployflient )efore, and impossible airs are a twe reat %T. Sed for the [ted States ýhe war, il; 3 showing of course, )four best wn contin. *s, and ini dents and Sq in the k is inter- nore than ige from ial events te price of ality, and Ss of the Sr against the awful igratulate h Canada idon the iie if we iot doubt carry out turc. In rhich ha$ he North Dominion draw at- oundiand expresscd 1i by the rpossible. was then ;, Messrs. Marwick, ual votes Board of L change. ¶ I corporations, politica a \"«dirty mess- and so it m-iii be until the old proverb is relegated to the scrap.\"beap sud vs bang up the shining new motto, \"Ever7body's business iu each body's business.' Men in reality, \"tbe velfare of ecsh is the coucera of ail\" vo bave entered upon the new day. Co-operation la. partieularly difficut if Our Western communities wvbich are Inade up of people froni ahl parts of the world, and differing et ten lu social eus- toms, lu religion, sud even lu language. OeGjrraphica.lly vs bave become neigh- Ionl sympathy, vs are often etili living at opposite poles. How get together? That is perbaps Vhs greateat probiemt that confronts our Western communi- tis. Boy build up a community spirit? From thoe eonomic standpoint, voe au neyer ýattain our maximum prospcity or even successfully defcnd ourselves from exploitation, until vs learn te co- operate. Froni the social standpoint, life lu a amal eommunity la unattrac- tive enougb, sud becomes unbearable if race prejudices aud petty jealousies are allbwed te persiat. From the sta.ndpoiut Of tmue religion, bow eau lave te God aud man be deveIoped lu an atmosphere ef suspicion sud ivalry sud scism? Our unhappy divisions! But they may be healed. They are after ail, se fan as - - w tpromote varioue commuuity enter- prises-a municipal skating rink vas opened, a diarepuitale saloon closod, the. poor vere systematlcally cared for, mre of the public, sehèoo teachers vaq set asde by the publie sdiool .boardte teaeh the aduit forelgners tlé.enhlglish language; the minlatera cof the varlous local ehurehes vers drawn lt. sympa- thetie relamionsud co-operation. .Iu the s'uburb cf-an Eýajteru Can- \u0026auCîtY, a deomiaaional brother- bood began to, redlie tii.wldr ueeds and poasibilities of the. ueighorhood. A Comnunity Cpuucil vas formed, on whieh vers represeutative cf alildenom- Inations and parties. ud\u0026M ees Wltbin a few months, \u003cvon a stailr. actlonary oid oouuilman7A1otut vIli his rake on #'olsaa.up da3eaud \u003ci share ini tidylig Up h trn tuseta ud Vacant lots. A litti. -later, vbumltae, firat pisygrounda vern opened, the à. urn turned eut en mais.. N\" l adjacent elty s.m ma. Nov, pù are being laid for extensive Iuiprgv- mneute that viii make Parvula a ther- oughl1y desirable reaidatial dixtrict. ommuxity buildhin sa serions £u4 delicate tant Tbrown tqgptiiup a heterogeusous mass cf materlal-hbow' put it together t. f o ue àanpoIQu and purpoa'fu l virltBrl b- la -for a master-bulldert \"I wt Ma tonial is uot dead etuff, but litnj eonalities aIncady inlchy eRdDvd some inaste.ici ; ide ivth à uln Whh impel them t. taes thnir P-rOq$r plae in the social 1afm come togethnschit uoàipau we anreoonoerned, mercly accidetaL. The fact tha4t one man vas boru a Scotch Preabyterian doesn't make it iu- possible for him te become a good negh. borto, another man boru anu Insh Msthodist. Ignorance and prejudice and iusularity are overç~ome by getting te- gether, working together, and plalug together. 1Here in the uced for the community center. This may. be and perhaps shouI(l be, a apecial building. Somne day, it viii b. the finest building or group of buildings lu the. commumity. The property of ail the people, for the use of al he people. But after ail, the building la of aecoudary importance. The developmeut of a community spirit in the great thing. Xvery truly enterprising busiless MOu, every wide-awake farmer, eveny pro- gressive minister, every far-eeeing sehool teacher, every advocate of the voman s movement sbould coustitute bimaeîf a community secretary in his owu comn- munity. Then as the boosters say- watch us grovi Ini one littie Western towu a football grouud became a truc community centre f rom which later there emauated varions helpful activities, In several towus lu Canada \"Commun- ity Secretaries\" are employed, viiose sole business '!,ate diseoyer and-develop cemmunity resources, and to prometse eommuniity activit. In a town iu Saskatchewan a group of young epe began studying their local probima They enlarged their group into a reaily representative Sodal, Service Lague. This League vas able BoVbh by 'bir1th and by training, Cana. dians are iudividuals. They corne of *pecially selected stock. Their fore- fathers vere hardy plousers who left the old-world Oommiinitiss and fared forth to battis single-handed with ths hostile forces of the uncenquered wilder- ness. Those cf United Empire Loyalist blood represent stili another fifting vwhich separateil a few sturdy indepen- dents and eust them into the inhos- pitable northern wilds. Thcre tbey grew sud flourisbed. From their descendants we gathered the adventur- ous spirits vho did the early pioncer work of the great West. Yea, specially selected stock, sud then, rigorous training. Iu the early days every man had to shift for himself. There was no room for weaklugs. Eacb man had developed to the utmest ail bis initiative and resource. Listen to the story of au Ontario pioneer. With his axe on bis shboulder ho pushed bis way into the \"forest primeval,\" c uttiug down a few trocs, ho made them into a log hut. Ctting down a few more ho made and fenced a little clearing aud there planted hie first crep. He now returncd te civilization for, bis vif e, and tbey two, aud the eblîdren vho vers given thcm, gradually transformed the wolt- infested torest into a comfortable farm home. They had need of iittle outside help. An occasione.l \"barn-raisng\" or \"quilt- ing-bec\" vere about the only events that brought the ncigbbors to their assistance. The schooi at \"the Corners,\" the village grist-mill, the littie meeting. bouse, largely sufficed fôr the simple eommunity. needs. Among people living. under suc'h con- ditions, independence vas exalted iuta a virtue. \"Paddlo your own canos\" was the advice given toô the young man as lie vent out from the parental roof. This individualistie position even re- ceived a theological sanction. lu order to save his own precious soul, \"Christian\" vas warned to leave bis copanions and fiee trom the City of Dstruction'. But times have cbanged. Now no man lives or Snu live unto himself. *We are gradually learning that we are mem- bers one of another. We are ahlu the same boat. No mnan any longer can paddle bis own canoe. We must pull together or sink together. In modern life, independence once a virtue, bas be- corne the greatest barrier to social pro- press. * The modern Chrstian bas been granted a vision of the Holy City cern- ing down out of heaven. Ris job is not to fiee intothe wiiderness but to stay and dlean up the back lanes of bis own city and make it the best residential district in the Kingdom of God. Life to-day ia socially orgauized. In Ontario the farmers use Niagara Fahas to mnilk their cows. In tbe city, ail the people use the Winnipeg river te light their bouses. Let something go vrong vith the electrical macbinery and the W9innipeg people oit lu darkness, vhile the Ontario cova have a very uncom- fortable expérience. Let there corne a fluctuation ln the London markets, and the farmers alike lu Siberia, in the Argentine, and lu Saskatchewan receive go iany cents a bushel more or lesa, and buy, or are forced to go without, a parlor carpet or the wife's xiew dress. The world bas become like a spider's web. Toucli one strand, and the vîtole vibrates. In the new socal order, everything depends upon effective co-operation. This la precisely the point in which Canadjans are weak. They baven't yet learned the value of team play. Thcy continue to \"hog\" the bail, and vonder Why after ail their efforts and brilliant dodues, the score is againat them. The secret? Lack of conbination! Inde- PC1dence as an ideal, must give place ho it erdependence. Ev-erybodv-'s business is nobodv's bus- fi ss'\"i- a proverb that lias corne out If the bitter experience of a society in M'hichl individualismn is anpant. Coun- tri- cerneteries neglected, roads impaas- afl1e, sehool yards over-ruii with weeds, ct-franichises the prey of exorbitant 10,000oo FA RMERS WAN TeD To Stand Behind The -Sarnia Metal Products -Co and the Organized Farmers in aGat Co-Operativè Proposition Mre want every farmer in Canada that contemplates usihxg Corrugated Iron, Meçtti Shingles or any other- Sheet Metal Building Materials, to write us ah once for information of our new co-operahive plan t\u003ey which we are supplying the farmers.of Canada with Sheet Metal Building Materials at thé Icwest possible oost. $.25.oo to $50000 Saved Every Fermer QUALITY We guarantee the galvanized iron used in the manufacture of* Sarnia Metal Produet. to be equal to that of any iron used by any manufacturer in Canada in the manufacture bi similar lines of roofing products which they are selling to the farmer, at the time of advj- tising, at an advance of 25 to 50 per cent above the price we are quotlng. And please. remember that ail Sarnia Metal Products are mnade fromz galvanized iron, of a quality specified by the-orgamized farmers themuelves. PR! CE By an agreement with the farm organizations we bave agreed to supply afl fanceers with' sheet metal building materials ah a smail percenhage in , advance of -the. cost of our raw materials, leaving the control of the seiling price in thme farmers' banda. We bave estimated'our profits on a very large volume of business and évery order you 'send us wifl help in making our price stil lower. .t SERVICE Our factory at Sarnia, just completed, is the most modern factory in Canada for thme manufacture of the liues we offer, and we carry such large stocks and are situated 'li such an advantageous location that il is possible for us to, make the quickest possible dafvqry, of orders. A VITAL QUESTION' If approached by anotber company or its agent in an endeavor to seli you Corru- gated Iron, etc., simply ask them what they would supply you the same material for, -if it were flot for the Sarnia Metal Products Co.' Limited, and its co-operative plan. We haveè some information in regard to the plan used in the endeavor of others ho head off Our business, which proves very inheresting reading. If you contemplate the erection of any new buildings or the re-roofing of any -already buit, please send us a rough sketch and we will do the rest. WRITE AT ONCE TO HEAD OFFICE The Sarnia Metal Products Co. Lim ited SARNIA CANADA - - - - - - - - - - - requ ires sense of a vider, ng these, truction. ethies of enace of ,nnot be a frigbt- uburban 'ir bois aIl this search-, *ominient bour iu rted ex. [ers, the ice, and iorough- rance of ung. ]iistory. history apoleon. a. Corn- )heavals js that mncends ce. We e musat. s thing Iisati,1 f niind, pt the Pur lats arc aold a-id dlstributed l hrough the United Farmers Co-operaftveCOMPas y, of Ontario",
         "Tue Weate,'n Home Monthly Winnipeg, Feb., 1915 EveryThin M*in and Woman liere tot»a t m tmOur EzP.um »a.'týbe idu IItdWta.att tbFe li\"So a Pualy, Peeyish people Ptumpsu Tbis h au invitation that ne thin man or Vmàmuia ea aord te ignore. We viiitel you w»a~. Wé are going te give yen a wondierful rc*es2 that heipa digest the food you eat, fbthiireds cf letters say puta good solid .E Bona people *ho are thin and under- e auve do ths? ve iiiteil ju. We baye foutu! a wonderful cescentratedIreat- iment for lncreasng oei grewth, the very aubk etuce of wbkéh our bodies are. made; for putting ln the b1oed. the red corpuÈcles whic eVery thin -ia and vornan se sadiy-needs- a- sientific assimiiative agent to '.strengthen the nerves and put the digestive tract in sucli .ub4pe that -every ounce of ilesh rnaking food Y\u003cY ta fuit ameunt of nourishrnent te tubg b oodnstead of, passing througb the sys- .tn undiqested and unassirniiated. Users'tel bi 1mw t is treatrnent bas made indigestion and other stomacb trouble quickly disappear wbiie old dyspepties, and rnany sufferers from weak nerres. and lack of vitaity deciare in effect it ban made themn feel like a twe-year- *oid. This new treatinent, which has preved such a boon to thin peope'is cailed SARGOJL. Don't forget the mame S-A-R-G-O-L. Noth- ings gond bas ever been dscovered before. -tWemen wbo neyer appeared styiish in any- thing tbey were because of their thinness, *Men underweigbt or lacking in ncrve force o ehergy bave, by their own testimony, been able to enjey the picasures cf lfe-beenÊftted to , ight ife's- batties, as neyer for years, tbrough the use cf \"Sargol\" If yen vaut a beautili and weilireunded figure of symrnetrical preportions of vbich you eau tee! utly proud-a body of throbbing lite aud energy1 write The Sargol Company, 5-B HeridBilding, Binghamton, N.Y., te- day and we vili seud -you, absoiuteiy free, a 50c. box of Sargol te prove ail ve cdaim. Take one with every meai aud sec boy 'iuickiy tbese marvelous littie coucentrated tqblets commence their busy useful work ot uebuilding. Many users dlciare tbey have increased their weight *t the rate ot eue pound a day. But yen say jeu vaut proof i Well, here you are. Here are extracts f rom the state- ments of those who have tried-vho have been conviinced and whe wiil swear te the virtiles of this wonderful preparation: REV. GEORGE W. DAVIS ssys. \"I bave made a faîthful triai of the Sargol treatment and must say it bas brought to me new lite and viger. I have gained tweuty pounds and nov veigh 170 potinds, and, what is better, I have gained the days ft _y boyhood. It bhas been the turning pen ttylfe My beaith is now fine.I do't bave to takre any medicine at ail and neyer vaut to again.y MRS. A. 1. RODENNEISER write.: \"I bhave _gaineil immensely since 1 teck Sargol for I only weighed about 106 pounda when 1 began uig t and nov I weigh 130 peunds, se really this makes twenty- four pounds. I feel stronger and arn look- ing better than ever before, and nov I carry, rosy cheeks, wbich is something I could neyer saLy before. \"My old frieuds who have been used te seeing me vith a thin, long face, say that I am looking better than thy haveee seen me before, and father and mother are se pleased te think I bave got te look se well. and veigh se heavj 'for me'.\" CLAY JOHNSON says: «'Please send me another ten-day treat- ment. I amn veli pieased with Sargol. It bas been the light of mv lite. I arn getting 'beck te my proper weigbt again. Wben I began te take Sargol I only weighed 133 pounds, and nov, four weeks later, I arn weiging 153 pounds and feeling fine. 1 don't have that stupid feeling every morn- ing that I used to have. 1 feel good ail the time. I vant te put on about five pounds otfiesh and that wiii bc al 1 vant'\" P. GAGNON write.: \"'Here is my report since taking the Sargol treatment. I arn a man 67 jears of age anid vas ail run down te the very bottom. I had te quit vork, as I vas se veak. Nov, thanks te Sargel, 1 look like a nev man. I gained 22 pounds with 23 days' treatment. I cannot tell yeu bow happy I feel. Ail my clothes are getting teo tight. My face bas a geod celer andI neyer vas se happy in1 my life.\" MRS. VERNIE ROUSE saya: '«Sargol is certainiy the grandest treat- ment 1 ever used. It bas helped me.greatly. I could hardiy eat anything and was neot able te sit up three days eut of a week, vith stomach trouble. I took oniy tve boxes et Sargol and can eat anything and it don't burt me and I bave no more headache. My we gbt vas 120 pounds and nov I veigh 140 and feel better than I have for five years. I arn nov as leshy as I vant te be, and shahl certainiy recnmmend Sargol, for it does just exactly vbat yeu say it viii do.\" Yeu may knov some ot these people or kuow somebedy vho knovs them. We vill send yen their full address if you wish, se that yeu can fiud eut ail about Sargol and the venders it has vreught. )Probably yje are now thiuking vhether al this can he true Stop it. Write us at once and we viii send jeu absoiuteiy free a 50c. package ot these vonderful tablets. No matter vhat the cause ef jour thinness is frem give Sargol a chance te make you fat. W/e are absoiuteiy iConfident it viii put geed healthy flesh on jeu but we don't ask you te take our word for it. Simply cut the coupon be- lev and enclose 10c. in stamps te help cover the distribution expenses, and Uncie Samns mail viii bring you vhat jeu rnay seme day say vas oeeof the mest valuabie packages you ever received. COliN, BAT WITH US AT OUR EXPENSE. This coupon entitles any thin person to one 50c. package of Sargol, the concentrated Fiesh Builder (provided you have neyer tried it), and that the 10c. is enclosed to cover postage, pacldng, etc. Read our advertisement printed above, and then put 10c. in stamps in letter to-day, wth this coupon, and the fui! 50c. package wiii be sent to you by return of post. Address: The Sargol Company, 5-B Herald Bldg., Binghaniton ,N.Y. Write jour name and address plainiy, and, PIN THIS COUPON TO YOUR LETTER. The Western Home Monthly, Wlnnl, Canada 4\u003e Fcloed fnd teyesr's subacription to The WIrSTLJRNrHOME MNHY ............................................................ Town...................................................... Province..................................... A t... .. .. .t A . t. A. . ..A . . . A.At t Wbeu writing advertisers please mention The Western Home Monthly. The Home Doetor Courage \"Your Length of Life Depende Upon Your Courage\" is the titie of an article in a health magazine. *Yen sec, nature abhors a vacuum. If. you ait back on your haunchesansd all0w yourself te become paralyzed with fear sud uncer- tainty, nature won't continue te pour good vital force into your body. Unles yen have the courage ta use the energy stored in your body, nature won't re- plenish the store. 'Se when physical effort seems a burden, if you day by day allow the burden feeling te domin- ate you, the condition will become chronie. If, however, ycu nicet every seeming obstacle with a whoop of cour- age, new energy will flow ini and you'll get s0 interested in cvercoming the obstacles that you'IlI forget anything like burdens. To keep your courage good je nine-tenths cf the victery. The mental attitude cf courage ie a tonic. Courage depends to a gree.t extent upon your will. Use your will te keep to the track and courage will back ycu Up. This does not mean that you are te keep mind and body tense with effort, but tlîat you are te move steadily forward, adhere te your purpose and net aiiow yourself te bc side-tracked by trifles. Courage mieans activity and au active life ie far more likely te ho a healthy one than a life cf ina.ctivity. What to do when the Baby bas Rlckets As maýny chilclren are inclined te bc rachitie it will be belpful for the youug tuother te be somewhat familiar witb the symptomnsin arter that she may recognize thetbe early and bave it prompitly treated. it i. what we cali a constitutional diseae,\" showing it.seif in many different ways. The cause cf rickets je mnt often improper food or inahility ta absorb proper food; it is aise, sometimes due te unhyg-,ienie surroiîndings. Babies who have been brought up on condeused milk or an some cf the propriptary foods whicb contain littîe fat, are espeeiaîîy apt to, have rickets, as are also children who are kept exclusively on brem.t rnilk after their first year. The tacet marked symp- toms cf rickets are usually seen between the sixth sud fiftéenth months. A babyv with rickets in apt to be nervaus and irritable and very restîcess at night; the child's head will alten perspire very prefusely, se nmch se that the pillow may bcme very wet. The cbest, instead cf being well shaped sud like that of cther babies yuil frequently have depressions at the siJ sud little nodules or \"-beads\"- in the ribs. The shape of the child's bead in aise peculiar, often being very fiaqt on top and measuring more ini circumfercnce than is usual at a certain age. There are also friequently«\"soft spots\" in the skuil besides the fontanelle, which le apt to be large and late in closimg. The cbild is aise apt te be very late in cutting teeth. . Hie abdomen in eeneraily very large and preminent, bis wrists and ankies enlarged sud bis muscles sol t sud flabby. The baby catches cold easil and in apt ta, have bronchitis. Ri l eften ale sud anaemic, sud when ho begrins towalkbislegs will bond easly sud7 he may have \"-baw-Iegs\". When the child site hie baek may ýappear curved, alarming tho mather, whe tlunks ber baby bas sanie spinal disease, when the defarmaity is due te rickets and may be evercome before long. The child is aise elften coustipatcd. As soon as the mother recegnizes any af the above symuptome aIme sbould bave her baby examined by a gaod doctar and the proper treatment begun at once, for if the disease je looked after promptly it le much easier ta central than if allowed ta con- tinue. The mother should cee that ber baby bas naurishing, digestible food, and a variety cf it, such as 1 have already sug- gested an this page. As rachitic children require plenty af fat a baby ten te twelv-e months aId may derive soîne benefit from being allowed ta suck a piece cf bacon for a few minutes every day. 0f course be should not be allowed te bite off or swallow pieces of it.1 Lt ebould be cooked well, but not so crispj that it crumnbles. Fruit juices and beef juice should be given early, but very little starchy or sweet foods allowed. The babyS îhould always have his tub bath each day,C and if hie is inciined to take cold easlily he may have a littie cold water dashed over .i chet and spine% fllowed by agentie but brisk rubbing te start up the circula- tion. Sun baths ame also excellent to give such children.ý The baby should be placed directly in the sun, but with hie back to it, 80 that thé light will flot hurt hie eyes for an heur every day. Re should have ali the fresh air and sunéhine, botIb indoors and outdoors, that can possibly be given. When ababy persistently refuses bis food, appeausdrowsy at unusual time, f efu, feverish and generally uncomfort. able, a young mother is often puzzled to knrow what to do until ber doctor can arrive. She should look down the child'e throat to sSe if it is inflained or bas aýny slot.s on the ton.gil\u0026 $lhe should examine bis body carefully for rashes. The baby should be undressed sud put te bed in a quiet room away from other children, and if very bot sud restiess a sponge bath, with a tablespoonful of alcohol to a bas~in of lukewarmn water, should be given bita. Hia usual food should be diluted with water or barley-water until it is just half the strength generally given; if old enough to have other food than broth and milk it should not be given. A teaspoonful of castor-cil is sale to give, but no other medicine shoîîld be given until the docter arrives. A baby having fever Mill ener- ally be very thirsty and lhe should be allowed plenty of pure bciled water, which bas been cooled, tadrink. If the cbild bas flot had a movement cf the bowels for twenty-four bours a soapsuds enema may be given. Fish-SkIn Disease Teih lynis-frorn thle (Crpek word for fieli-is the sceîîntific naine for, a pecîîiiar disease, or ratiier deforînit 'v of the skin characterized by ain avergrowtb of a horny, scaly laver and. an obiiormal dry- ness. It usualy exists froin birth, a]- though a few cases of acquired fish-skin disease have been observed. Its cause is îinknowu. 1V often affects several nienibers of the sanie faîuily, and in mauy cases is evidently hereditary. Althaugh existing froni birtb, it may not bc very mnarked in the inîfanît, but may bc littie more tban a roîîgbne.4s and untisual scaliness and dryness of the skin. It juereases gradually, becoiing very apparent by the third or fouirth year, for six or eighit years perhaps, anîd tiien its progress stops ani it reiîîaiîus practicaily unchanged for life, aithougit a siight improvenient is sornetiines uoticed as the chiid approaches mant- hood or womanhood. It varies with the seasons, being bet- ter ini the sunimer-and better the botter and moister the air is-aud ivorse again in winter. The skin is aise hiable te inflammation in cold weather aud chaps easily, giviug rise te painful cracks over the kuuckies and at the tips of the fingers. The usils are rougît and often break and eplit, and the hair ie also dry and frs.yed at the en\"\u0026 There are ail degrees of the disease, front a simple, dry roughness aud scali- ness, te a condition in which the surface is covered with thick plates resembiug the scales of a crocodile, Ini almost ail cases there are more or less definite markiugs, especially ever the -exteusor surfaces cf the joints, resemhling flsh- scales or a serpent's skiu. The disease may occur iu patelies or lu curved bauds of vary iug width, with healthy or nearly lîealthy skin between, but niost coin- mionly it invoives the cutire surface,.lue- ing least uîarked 'where the skiîî is iiaturaily thin. The treattacut is mainlv local, its object beiiîg to 1-erove tu;e excessof 11o1-1Y scaies and, keep the skin soft. Aîuointing the body at niglit %vith stf soap, followed by' a warmi bath and thoro0ughrîi bbing witli a coarse towel or a flesiu-1rusii vill, if ofteîi repeatedl, k-eep the scaling w ithin lintits. The free use of a good cold creaiui, borax and gly cerin iu water, lanolin or vaseini, ap- plied immediateiy after the bath, and if uecessary again in the morning. will go faî-\u003eto keep the skin soft sud pliable. More severe cases will require more severe remedies, wliich would be iisett Onlv under miedical direction. 84 Wýi\"peg, Feb., igir,, The - western - Home monthly",
         "Wbmlipeg, Feb., 1915 The Western Homre Moeithly About the Farm Ld easlily he Lased over Za gentie he circula- lent tb give d be placed Sback te it, ridoors and given. refuse bis mual times, uncomfort- J uzzled to octor can the child's Dr has aýny Id examine The baby o bed in a jidren, and bath, with a basin of Iutý,d with .s just baif oid enough tmd milk it poonful1 of ne other the doctor wil ener- iter, which .0 cbild bas bowels for nema may Testlng the Age of Eggs There are various ways cf testing the age of eggs. An old-time method wbich was often adopted when a \"'stole»\" nest was found, was te, put tRie egga la a vessel cf cold water. On thie principal that weigbt decreased as age incrcased, it was ol that cggs which bal been laid several days would float, while any cf recent date wcuid go below the sur- face. Ail that prcniptiy sank te thie bettoin werc supposel to be gol for food. This was an easy rnethod, but unfortunately as a. gool alany people who bad faith iu It discovered after tbey bad made a few experiments, it was net always reliable. Juat why its resulta wore not uniform, bas nover bec» satla- facterily cxpiained. It often worked out corretiy but sometimes eggs that were very far frein gool sank in the Water. Wben bRese eggs were breken the one wbe was te coek thein bal net an aitogether pleasaut surprise. A preminent poultry journal 'bas just reprinted, frein a. French paper, aud with- eut comment, a description cf a soe- what similar method cf learuing the appreximate age cf eggs wbicb may 'work out aatisfactorily. This involves the use of sait water, aud thie eggs te ho tested are placed in this solution. YeIIow Butter That the ricRi yeiiow eler demanded by the public ha dairy produets la pri- inarily due te tRie character of the cow's feed is demonstrated by meent experi- neIts carriel on by the United States departmeut cf agriculture in co-epera- lion with the Missouri, Stabo Experi- M07nt Station. For some years dairy Uoe on LUvo Stock Perm animais, especially those houaed in stables more or lbau lnfeated with insecte and verma, are cemmonly troubbed with lice. Animale in good heaith resiat the insece, but those al- ready in a non-thrifty condition do not fare se 'well. Lice cause a. good deal cf annoyance to, farm, stock, inasmuch as they bite the skin, auck the blood, and thus cause considerablo irritation. Lice oan be 5e» with the naked eye. Infes- tation, as a rule, takes place in ilthy quartera, and the best means cf disin- foting such places is by the use cf a spray or kerosene. One cf -the. beat means cf applying this to hogp consista in rubbing posta, which are constantly smeared wlth kerosene. In this way the hog are induccd te treat themeelves. Infcsted hogp may aise bc treateil by pouring kerosono directly over the in- fesbed parts, ike the »eck, shoulder andl back. Dipping tanks, made of cernent or wood, are frequeatiy located lu the ru»n yards in which is placeil some disin- fectant fluid. Hogs use these amal tanks as wallews, and iu this way they disinfect .thcmselvos. For herses and cattie a good remedy lu made as foilows: Bl for an heur 8 tablespoonfuls cf arsenic, 8 tableapoon. fuis of aeft seap in two gallons of water. After being prepared by boiling, add eneugh water te make two gallons. When cool, 'wet the animal ail over with a libtie cf it, using a brush or curry comb te get it into the akin. Another good remed\u003ey la made of boiling stave- acre seeda, 1 part te 20 parts cf wator, for an heur, and let lt siminer for an- other heur; then add water to make it up te the original bulk. This applieil te the affecteil parts bringa quick relief. lb la adviaable te repeat the application in a week or te» days, se as te catch any new lice freon any eggs that were net caught by tho first application. A very cemmon treatment is secureil by mixing a plt of linaeed oil, 8 table- spoon fuis et cil cf tar, and 8 tablespoon- fuis cf suiphur. This la thon rubbed en the affected parts once a day for two days andl alloweà te roemain for a few daYs, after which it la washed cff wth so\u0026p and water. Ia serieus cases the ap- plication should be repeated witbin a week or 5.-Exohange. The Teeth ln Dalry Cattie Disease and irregularities cf btche tb cf dairy cows cause a mcnetary boss lu beef and milk that weinld ho surprising if it were known. Wben thie teeth are la perfect condition they grind thie food i» such a manner that it la easily acteil upon by the digestive ferments, and tbc essential elemeuta necessary te, repair' the. body waste and lucrease the flow cf milk arc readiiy assimilatel; whereas when thie teeth are diseasel or irregu. larities are present we have a decrease cf both miik auppiy and condition. I ho teoth cf dairy ccws probabiy require more attention than de those of herses, because, by their methodB cf grazmng, atones, nails, wires, and ail sorts cf bard substances may be brought into the mouth, and are liable te break the teeth and bruise tho guma. Cows failing te reach thie higber standards cf milk production should not ho discarded until a thorough examina- tien is made cf the teeth, for without perfect mastication of thie fod we eau- net have perfect digestion and assimi- lation, and this ia the basis cf tRie milk supply. On examining 500 cowa the writer found diseased or irregular becth in 371, or over 60 per cent. 0f these 4-é Rad eue or more teeth diseased, 19 bad one or more teeth absent, whiie 31 bal one or more points cf enamel pretruding i threugh thie mucous membrane cf thie cheeks. The teeth are objecta impianted lu aud prctruding frem the jaw-bones, snd contai» 76%/. per cent cf eartbiy sait.. They are harder than bone, and can bearÀ experts have bec» studying this ques- tion. Their conclusion la thiat, although te some extent a breed characteristie, the intenaity cf this yellow elor may, !within certain limita, be inercascd or diminiaheil at will by changing the animal's rations. Chemical tests show that the yellow Pigment'in milk consista of several'well known pigments found ia grec» plants. 0f these the principal one la carotin, so caileil because lb contitutes a largo part cf the cloring matter of carrots. The other yellow pigmenta in the milk are known as xanthephylls.' These are foundin l a number cf planta, lneluding grass, but are especiaily abundant in yeilow autumn leaves. These igenta pas\u0026 dlrectly from the feed inte the milk. This explains the well know» fact that fresh, grec» grass aud carrots increase the yellow- nescf butter, the only standard by which the average perse» juilges ita richuess. O» the other hand, a large proportion cf these pigmenta la de- positedin l the body fat and l clewhere lu the cow. When the ration la ehangeil te cae containing fewer -carotin sud Xanthophylla coutituents, this hoarded store is graduaily drawn upc» and in consequence the yellownesa cf the mâilk doos net diminish se rapidly as lb otherwise wculd. This yeilowness in- creasea, however, the instant the noces- sary plant pigments are reatoreil te the ration. Grec» grass la probably richer in catotia than any other dairy feed. Cows feil on lb will therefore produce thie higheat colered butter. Green cern, in whiçh .isuthophylia constitute thie ohief pigment, wil aIse, produce a higRi- ly-colored preduct. On bthe other haud, a ratio» of bleachied lover hay and ycliow corn la practically devcid of yel- Iow pigments ad the milk froin eows red upc» lb willl gradually loso itseler. it la, of course, indisputably true that the breed doos influence the eler cf the milk fat; but vary bRie ration and there will ho a correspondiag variation lu the color cf the milk fat in each breed. In cown cof tRie Jersey and Guernaey breeda tho body fat la frequently cf such deep yellow celer that soute butchersanmd consumiera look with dis- favor upc» beef frein these breeda. For tRis prejudice there lsasbaeutcly ne justification. TRie yellowncss cf tRie fat apringa frein the saine causes as thie yeibewneaa cf the milk fat, and there la ne reason for cbjeoting iluoesecae te the very thiag that la prized in muother. To efiftIW \\ hots who anaier tht. adletlomeS lu Hors.TraIninead coltBe~Î D BOLUTBLYFnE. et ioÈaeumuwblp Twonty-ai'rathoussailPARMERS Mad borse-owmet taken my regidar cousue mailfoumil that d d # H eti eWO m-lea-Ua tamer and trsamér et horMOse. AQ' my atudentas sa@M\u0026 «The borne bua~ eyrbesuà that Prof. Deery cmnnet bamile.\" Xy recod p»Vei Thie Beery Course gives he. pricelemu secrets of oca a lifettme-enabtes 7011to master any horse-to bU tRe \u0026W\"iô m u dIpstion of aMr bora. at W-00-- qM. sgttadmamydoUanto '- th vu o Z m709 x«W ofgT t b y owaMdub 1 Dg W.mird oe'--MI\"nm i *o wi s wam- uwwu W vu-i«_ 1 incudbt afinidwuillu atuaialami howf ng i.b~ga\"e Cailfomia Redwiod lumber mmd - mot paimted to e mInferior çiatetlaL Bradoe a#Mi oootahtami ty ubuu mlt wLais@. *mm 95 SENT ON TRIAL IikmCAN REAMI $ SEPARA.T-O, bemparaDtor fr aVS qumoi ua kt wa Xecldakes thick or tIbsc«..Dfrm thipitur. hlc llusra os or oypricedlargocapacitymac ns.Th bomd la a maotry muvd and emboit.. ailOur lateut ImProv.rmt\u0026. 0wr Tweaty-Y.ar Gumrah. Pnt.cta Tme. -ab=*a'm ge.'m~cUlieiiaiatuyou. Wbdmyuudable.l . de itmmbouWew make pou. Adii AISERCAN, SEPARATOR CO., Boit 1196 Dlbldgie, N. Y. ~m~a~tr e mis191 35, Bd R abits or rn-y srnft toaO\u0026d cf a\u0026iuto mobie. a th etal ar Sim lamhaioed. cbm I Atm àb.gsvoe word for a pecittiar f the skin. vtb of a irmal dry- birth, a]- fish-skin Its cause s several -, and ini Lary. h, it May lfant. but hine.4s. and S of the beconling Dr foinrth ,haps. and renailis aithougli ionetimues lies mani- \u003eing bet- hec botter rse again hiable te ind chaps acks over s of the Lnd often aise dry disease, mnd scali- e surface ?semliflg imoat al definite extensor ling flsh- e disease 'ed bands or nearly )st ern- -face. 1*. skiii is ocal, Uts xcess of zn Soft. iith Softt ath as([ towel or repeat(41, The free, rax anid elin, ap- [th,. and [ng. will Spliable. \u003ee Morle be usett",
         "TieWestern Home monthly Whmlpeg, F.b., 1915 îleth.im woel t ham e m ~a . gol\"Undor voyTBL !Uwte ofSav-Th-Horme l soith ake, or tendon, os loua Of hai., Norme Sample Contract le\" t. (Hors. Ownm m\u0026Bd 1 - z am -l * S*tf.r Ut! -'ms--i P ATENTS Writetfo ooitad irautar. terras, etc Featherstonbaugh \u0026 Co. red. É. Feýatheratonhugh. k.C..M.LG. (ierald S. Rozburgh ,B.X. Se. 2«9- go Ban\u0026 .1Nov\u0026aScotia. Porttae Ave. (Corner ofGarry) WINNIPEG fultlp sd qoure, wviii.bon.e au u ».ue ethe vithout becomlug dluaed T.. bord structure enter lAta the r.l aionna.- of teeth-dqnt las, ~5umfflf\u0026 ué *èmnntum. Dentine le a bad yelwsb tanesd coutains the bulk of tie'i. .tiiy ulte. Enamea la the 'haret anilÜtertur,aud coutains abOut Où Per emt ertiiy e«14la wite ,4 caler, aM viiea -once deatroyed la neyer repr«odueiL It lana.protective tissués cverhg the entirée epoed sur- face, sud ilu-tiihe ra inix ecwitii the Otiier ý\u003etuos to *ur4isthe roue giproJéîls for grinding purposes. Cementuin- r.«ouata petresa, tii. third eo-tit,4ent, emup)stel-, cavera the.em- beddè portcis M tb eth.I t -i bIownii.011yeil baoirand elosey rum b mlustu Ture. i.pro- fiotm '01 earthy matter, thsesmine as m boue, in albout di7 pr cent. \".tMag the Eyes Open te Dalry Facta . Ruinng round. fer a f ew days, a.ay fram ,hoen,- 1-cause acroua a frmer *ho iiak li me experienéea that are worth while. 1 get hlm te tell me about them. H.' wua a.bit backward about comlng forward at lrst.1[ vonder if that lanet tii. wlwtii moat men who have dons thinp.iM--this vorld?- But after lie got started h. put the. lm lt, ie .atory; ne douht about thati \"TherimtuciiOf t toteL Iluat pt my oye. open, that'a al; -you Iknow, it takes quit. a. littie viii. to do that ae0metjes.m Myl 1 eiould think 001 Wy,1 kuow of greyiiead*1 mnnvii. are f umbling ilong in the. dark 'nov, Just the saineas they dld forty or Uity yeara ago. Wonder why ? \"I iiadn't a eow lu my bord that gave four per cent milk. Terrible, waau't it? It took et meat Besasons et the year not farfrosntventy-eight pounda. of milk te make a. pound of butter. The vonet it was, fdid flot know which vwers my good cows and which 'were my poor ones. I tiiink nov nons of them. vere very good. If there ha\u0026 been oe really good cow lu the lot se. ould have brougiit my test up somevhere noir viiat it ougiit to have been. \"Along about that timo I heard of a min that vas getting a pound of butter out of sixteen pounde of miik. e 1ived not far away froin me sudhadl a. lot of Jerseys. 1 used to look at thein as I drove paît bis place and think they 1oored pretty good, but I neyer thought I wôidd bave any like themi. But 1 stopped sud talked with that man one day and he told me be would seil me a thoroughbred bull caîf for $10. That vas a big pile of money te pay for a young caif in those daye, but 1 paid it and took the caif home. \"ýes wasn't vorth a cent-sometbing waa wrong with hie. makeup. 1 neyer got a single caif from, bim. It rather took the tuck out of me te b. brought up standing that way; but sometîmes it le a good thing for'a feliow te have his head knocked againet the wail a few times. Stirs up hie ideas a little. ,«The next bull I got was sa seven- eight'a Guernsey, sud fie vas ea beauty- kind as, a kitten, and wo got some nies calves from hlm. That blood je in the herd yet, and a good many of the neigh- bore have some of it, too. I neyer charged a neighbor a.nything for the use1 of my bull. Maybe that doeflot seem like business to folks that think the money je everything. \"My test began to go up wben those heifere got into the harnese. To-day my hèrd sssa whole tests tih. best of an.y- laody'e that goes to our creamiery. WVorh wbile? I sbould say so; but I arn not more than juest etarted. If nothing heppene, I'm going to show the folks corne cowe one of these days! \"On. of the good thinge about this je tîtat it makes thie viole farm better. 1 kîîow that sounds queer; but it je a fact, p'st the samne. A man gets some wel bred stock on the place and he vante other thinge. te correspond -better barns, better crops and ail that. 1 actually be-c lieve my- farrn ýs worth more than it would have been if I had kept on in thet old rut. I know it le, iu fact. And whatt is more it makes more of a man of a fellow wheu he gets his dander up to doi things. ihf Càreo f the Brood Sow Professor Shaw of the University of Saâkatchewan, gave aome useful pointers on pig-breeding to short-course students. Pigs were, hie said, a class of stock t4ai all farinera could keep-feeding on by- 1 produots that might otherwise be wasted. Raising -hoge je easy when understood but easy to fail in if not properly taken cmr of. The number kept should vary with the farrn and breed. Two types, Ibacon and lard type were mentioned. The lard type is produced in the corn beit and is not heard of bere. The British market demanda a lighter type with the fat laid on in layers with the leaiz. The best American bacon je mnanufactured lu Minnesota. The hoge of Minnesota do not get as much corn, and therefore produce a better type of bacon than those of the Chicago district. The Canadian, market demanda the bacon type. Any type can be turned into a bacon type. This change of type ie casier with hoge than 'with any other stock. The farmer should start in lightly ihogs and go on eaeily. The average farmer can start out with one sow a year, four eows in a litter which with. cars, one litter wil l infive years produce one thousand. In selecting a sow for breeding pur- poses she must have certain lies. Good length, high back, with curve over loins and as much depth as possible, thin and neat about head, no surplus 'fat about the jaw; smooth shoulders and rather upright. Strong bone le necces- earY, stiuf, etraight in the pasteru. Enough thioknese giving room for heart and lugs for good constitution. Ribs sbould have good spring. Good depth to carry feed and large litters. It la easy to take care of the 50w in summer. She can be allowed out-ýroot- ing around. The wiaest plan for the beginner la to have the 80sW farrow in spring. 8h. muet be taken care of during the winter, muet »not b.i allowed to get too fat or too lean. Her feed for winter should be. ground oate and .shorts in equal parte--a perfectly eatis- factory feed-dry or wet. Housing the s0W over winter je very simple. A few poles over which the etraw from the thresbing machine ie dirccted. The sÔw muet get plenty of exercisee-they ueually take exercise, but tliose of a sluggieh. nature should be forced to, take exercise. 'The s0W should bie placed iu a pen by hereîf about farrowing tine. A laxative diet ehould be added. The sow eliould flot be disturbed. A guard rail niay b. placed around the pen, to save the young once from being laid on by the sow. it je dangerous to allow an old fat sow too much straw to make a nest. It is not neceseary to disturb a eow until she has corne to the trough. Site ehould not be fed very much at firet, but increase feed each time. With only one litter a eow may be allowed to wean the young herseif, but wben. two litters, .eiglit weeke je eufflcient. Skim milk je the best food for young pige. They ehould b. taught to cat as soon as possible. Ground oats je not a good feed for young pige, but if paesed through a sieve the~ fine part may be fed to them. Grocund barley je good. Wlieat je ncarly equal to corn for feed, but je not good feed alone. G round wheat should flot be fed alone,. but ehould be mixed. Canadian field peas are very fattening. llogs are flot cquipped for making great gaine on grass or alfalfa. A combination, however,-wiIl improve. Linseed meal bas also proved a very satisfactory feed. A Sow sonie- times neede a tonie in winter. A good tonic is: 1 bushel wood saits, 25 11)8. charcoal, 5 lbs. siIphuir, 3 lbs. saIt, -abou)t '/2 lb. of blue stone mnixed in wvater. AMix Up and place in trough where the s0w cau get at it. Of Course Not \"Doctor,- this bihlei exorbitant and Il won't pay it,\" said the patient irritably. 'Besides I'm no better than 1 was bfore 1 came to you anyway.\"l \"0f course you're no better,\" retorteil the physician, \"and aill he oi use take my advice.\"din' \"Oh!\" said the patient. \"0f course, ag I didn't take it I don't owe vol,-nyhn for it. Good evening., - nthg Wm wrtsg*im a tm eu mention have saved mhoney by naing. vinCue orSpavine, Curb, Ringboue. Splint, Bony Growths and Lamenes from many other causes. It keepa horses'working. A $1 bottie'may save ahorse for you. Get abottle the nex.t time you are in town. Sold by drugglats everywhere, $1 a bottle, 6 for $V, ueo.ask for a copy of aur book 4\"ATreatiseon the Horse$-orwrite to Br. B. J. IGUCDALL COMPANY £aonb.,yFaDa. Verm.t 101 Winl redue e \u0026 bla.i.Slalmei swenik. Tuomu, 4Ligaments, nmes or Drmblm\u0026Stops the lau mu sudpain from a. spilat, MUisDomsor Due Ispavi.. No blister, no hair gone. Horse ceu be use\u0026. $2 a bottie, delivered. Describe your case for spocial in- structions and D* 32K Ires.é W. f. Ymu. I...138 lwms INid..Mm 4 CmOs. ~L~LmBOOKS mhem c hu\"ezmi goum amia oubom\"fe\u0026egg aS 1 S n Im l u m u l d d j n WorIdrs champions jell. City 21 TsWe1I FactV' ilawbolato. ..ta~~~~ Z.ht a mi i mib mo ar 05e-d.utr ce.., am 192 îRaw. . RIDER AOENTS WANTED eeher ard ude te ampe 1915 Rydap Bicycle. wth mlilateatimprovemeets We abip on appoOvai te any addmsaineCanada. wltbcut any depost.anUdaflw3SlIMAj Il wlll flot coet ySe on. cent ifune satbfked afr Sing bicycle bdays. 0O MOT BOY O l -0 e uddsa 'f rscentl yon geoerlatestig z!ilustaedcatalog0 ONE OEN -te Us a postal. andotalgahfnltaruamwll ,.tu,.= . ot vaut. HYSLpt 21OMRSCa\" . KIM us your films ONCE \u0026,ýand you will ALWAYS 6 Exposurfes 10 cents Ten and tweIve exPosures 20c. Brow rie PrintiS35ca don. 2,1 z 4X, 3% r3 3!ý x 44 X40c a dos. 3U x 5!4 and 4x5,5Ocados. Potardalcftados. 'Money or Pos 1 Office Order to accornpeay. Prianpteqt detivery gunranteed. MANMTOA HALL STUJDIO IOOM 2, 291 ý Portage Ave., WINEIPEG Noen wrln dveriuereuementirrvt noeS The Western Home Monthly.",
         "WI*ulpog, F.b., 1915 ThO' Western Homio mont hiv I _ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ __ IFashions and Patterns diom a11 Or\"oruto Pattern Department. Western Homo mont*.yWinnlpeg 1172 -- A Smart Afternoon' Gown - met or canton flannel or linene. Thc neek There is a. jaunty youtbful style to thkis edge may be finished with a flat collar, costume of novelty woolen in bine tones, or eut out in square outline. The combined Wvith blue serge for underskirt leg portions may be gathéred or uncon- and trimming. This design is a Iso good fined at the lower edge. The pattern is in brown serge with satin or poplin for cnit ini 5 sizes: 2, 4, 6, 8 and 10 years. underskirt and aleeves, and ecru batiste Pattern 10c. for collar and cufs. 'The wgist is eut 1144 -Ladies' Apron with Prinoeaa on simple liues, and joins the tunic Front-This desirable model bas shoulder under the girdie. The skirt bas plaited straps that extend over the front and futinesa at the ide seams. There is a formn deep éonvenient pockets. The skirt choice of sleeve finish, and a chemisette portions are- joined to a \"Princes.s\" for high neck effeet. The pattern is cnit panel; and are finished with a beit at in 6 sizs: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 the waistline, to which the strape are inches buiât measure. Pattern 10c. attached in the baek. The Patterni is eut A\" 1-1 A boue. eness leeps may le jthe Id by ,tie, 6 book ite to, 3topa the a splmt, avIs. No Elorse uni delivered. special in- mmi en i Dotk 0u dsh p- FTES andE'S3-e m'e, \u003er unti oa ini 3 sizes: amaîl, mediumn and large. Pst- tern 10e. 1162-1161-A Dainty Evepn Gown- Chantilly lace and black Ztin combine to make this superh cr4étUm. It is composed of Ladies' Waist Pattern 1162 and Ladies' Skirt Pattern 1161. The ,waist bas a smart style feature, ini the cape back, which is adjustable and may be omitted. Mt is finished in surplice style and with sash ends. The under- skirt is of black satin, topped mwith the flounces of lace, tliat are edged with satin folds. The design is lovely for crepe meteor, charmeuse, crepe de chine, poplin, or silk chiffon. The waist pat- tera is eut in 5 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40 and 42 inchles bust measure. The skirt in 5 sizes: 22, 24, 26, 28 and 30 inches waist measure. Two patterns 10c. each. 9934-Ladies' House Drese with Long or Shorter Sleeve-Checked ginghani in. Ihlack and white with facings of white. are here comibined. The design is miade -with a panel on the skirt front and baek, and the right waist front îis crossed over thec Ieft at the closing. The neek is (Mllarless, but finislied with a slîaped fâving. The siceves are uesirable iii eftlier wrîst or s,'Iorter 1.ngth. The pattern is eut in 7 sizus: t4, 6, 30,4, 40) 42 a iid 4-1 juches butit ineasure. Plit - teli 1oc. f S Gmret' At Our flouse Boys enthus. about Puffe% Wh«an d Rtc.. ThWVsý many a food which they enjoy, butihéss the2' Bach \u0026raiai.ke a toasted n4tp..=*ld,thn $aI1 and porous. Baçh is a bubbla, bl o oujlgieabf millons of steiin explosions. Bach is a confection, yet it issUl foodî md ia4b Prof. Anderson's proces\u0026-sto it ail digests. Goodies Withont Creasi The chief delight in many a cereal lies in the,écream and sugar. Pufl:ed Wheat and Puffed» Rtc. ar 1e goodies when one eats them dry. Countleis children carry thoe= at play. Served in milk-like brçad or crackers-.tJey are fascinating morsels. They are used in candy maklng -and as garnish for ice creamn. Imagine how such tid-bits tante when soeWlth cream or sugar or mixed with fruit. These grains served in puffed formn insure easy, complet. digestion. Every food granule is blasted .to pieces. Other methods break part of thegranules. ,This method breaks them ail. In Puffed Wheat and Ric. you get not only the whole grain. You get every element in form to. digest '. When you f-kn-ow what this means, as your doctor does ,o will- serve these grains.in puffed form every time you can. Try them aIL. Serve a difforet om «* \u0026y . The Quaker Oms Qmpu .sole Makurs Peterborough, Ont. Saskatoon, Saisk. 16 7 1167-Girls' Dress ini High or Square Neck OUtline-As liere shown black vel- \"et and Irish lace are conihined. The stylIe is equally good for serge, cashmere, coi duroy, messaline, plaid or checked sniting, challie, voile or wash materials. The back laps over the front at the shouîder, where it forms pointed tabs, that niay be omitted. A deep plait in palte! effeet outlines the front and forms p)art of the skirt which bas plaits also at the sides and back. The pattern is elit in 4 sizes: 4, 6, 8 and 10 years. Pat- teî11 ]Oc. 1152-A Neat and Becoming School Dress-Blue serge with trimiming of 'vhit.e soutache braid is here show-n. -rown and white checked suiting or plaid in any of the pretty briglit pat- tiPfll3 is equally good. The shield iliay bc flnished in round neck edge or 'ývitit the standing collar. This model is (cas, to develop, and will look well ini ga1lateae, or ginglian, poplin, crepe, liinen, or Iiinene. The skirt is a tliree-piece st)e ith a lap ttick at the centre back. Thle pattern is eut in 4 sizes: 8, 10, 12 a\"(1 14 years. Pattern 10e. l 149-Chjld's Night Drawers - This \\I1 1 i poduce a confortable sleepfillg 104 liit, inost satisfaetorvY for y011111 vlli1i,î qil. 1m -~kiek off\" their e\u003cvevs. If es go,( l'or caiiei, mubuliti, laiiiielette, do- Puffed Wheat, 1lOc C li Puffed Rice, '15Ces",
         "TII. Weète,'n Home, Mont hi\u003e mou ou ornoo.oomrnuouoouuouoouiiorniiiiiuui1 N E 4 E Autoqvaphic Kodak Date and, titge your negatives prman ently, when you mike the expoeures. EVery negative tisl worth xaklng lu wortix a date and a titie. lu busk eaM farmmg, with every picture that you talce of stock and croeu, suLd maohinery med builIdiags, you eau 'Frite valuable data permanently en th o gat3i7e. The places you vsit-4aterestUlg dates and facta about *thé eUadren, theïr %q ai -the time the pictures were made-the autographe of friends you photograpbr-Mbe notat4ona add ito the value of every pcur o.nae Juot release a stop and a doux, open\u0026 fithe bock of the Rodak; VwPite whatever notican you waDt; expose lrom 1 to 5 accords; close the door sud you are ready for the. next exposure. On the mnargùns iebw.mn the negatives will - oppear a permament photographie reproduc- tion ofUnetho xtation you made. .htisl not a p~art of the Autographie plan to reproduce this lu the pnùzbt bot ibat it sxmply b. preserved as a per- manent record on the negative. htisla \u003cvious however, that such rec- ords can hé dxowu on the priais themeelves whenever desn-ed. The. greatest photographie advance ln twenty yeara. MAtogmse Kodake'no w realJy ini a score of styles and sizes from $9.00 ¶Up. Canadian Kodkak Co. Limited At \u0026Ul Kodak deslea', or wite un for Autographia bookiet. 610 King St. W., Toronto Specieal Clubbi*ng Rlates WEappend a very attractive list of combinations embracing \"The Western Home Monthly\" and the principal Canadian British and Ainerican periodicals, which should interest those of our readers who are in the habit of subscribing to several papers, Class A The Weekly Free Press The Nor'-West Farmer Grain Growera' Guide Class B canad\" West Sinday at Home Girls' Own Pap«r o0ys' OwnPqaper Cassell'a Magazine Quiver Girls' Realm Modern Priscifla Everybodys Magazine McClure's Magazine Ti.Western'Home Monthly dany i Periodica1 in Clas......... $1.25 et ,ý2 \"do.- 4 A .......1.75 dg 1 tde B ... ...2.00 a 2-- B . .. ..3.00 Britlph Publiomtlons Let us send you an Lnglish paper and d'The Western Home Monthly\" toyour f riends at home. We have Special Rates on ail British periodi cals adqoaions on any flot given here will be gladly furnished on application. \"muieWetern Home Montblv\" and any one of the f ollowing periodicala for one year f or $2.35 ; any two for $3.50. Oversem a m11 Mail The. London Mgzn The Strand Magazine Ro yal Magazine WloWrdmagazin Tit-Bita Quotations on other perlo\u003clica on requsat Addrens The Western Home Nonthly WINNIPEG, MANITOBA Wh.n writing advertisers please menton The Western Home Monthly. Wbuipg, Esb, 191s s M 1171-A\u0026 Styllah Eecomlng hrock for the Growing GIa-How jaunty, up4-to date and becoming thub design in, du ail un s eimlcîy. Ih wiilrequire ltle by way of decoration. The right front crosses over the left in unique shaping. The long uhoulder is comfortable, and a popular style feature. The aleeve in wrist length with a band eulf, or in short length with turu back culf, is equally good. Shaped trimming pieces are added over the fronts, and meet a wide collar. The skirt joins the waist under a wide belt. In brown galatea, with brown and white checked trimrning. This style would make a nie echool dress. The paViern la eut in 4 sizes: 8,'10, 12 and 114 years. 1168-1117-A Simple Dress-Compris- ing Ladies' Waist Pattern 1168 and La- dies' Skirt Pattera 1117. This amart model is good for serge, velvet, corduroy, cashmere, crepe or voile. ltiniay be pleasingly developed lu a combination of checked suiting anid serge, or velvet and poplin. If made of one material, a trim- ming or binding of braid would be very stylish. The waist is ia simple shirt style with a new collar and coat closiag. The aleeve, in wrist length has a flare cuif. In short length it is flnished with a shaped turn back cuif. The skirt is trimmed with a tunie portion over the back, that forms a flounce at 'the sides and front. The waist pattern is eut in 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches bust measure, and the skirt in 6 sizes: 22, 24, 26, 28, 30 and 32 inches waist mensure. Two patterns 10c. each. 1155-Childs' Bonnet and Coat with or without Cape and Cuiffs-la serge, eheviot, Bedford cord. novelty or fur cloaking, velvet, silk or corduroy this design will be equall.y lovely and bcconi- ing. The fronts are Lipped at the clos- xng, which xnay be finisled ini higli neek outline, or with revers facings, to mieet the rolling collar. Thie siceve portions are eut in one with the body, and may bave the cuf or a siniple hem for a finish. The pattern is eut ini 4 sizes: 2, 3, 1 and 6 years. Pattern 10e. 1165-Dress! for Misses and Small Wo- mea The new basque lines, flaring tunio, and becomin veut, are attractive style* featurea of tn mode!. Ita youth. fiand becoming lines will assure its popularl'ty. The fronts are eut low, and outlie the veat, which lu ftnishcd with a flare collar. The waist in lengthened over the back in basque style, anddils finished with a broad beit, 4hat may b. ,trlmmned with sash ends as illustrated. The tunie is joined to the walut in rcd. igote style, and no forma a separate garment, ths.t may well be worn over any skirt. The pattern in cut inx 4 size*: 14, 16, 17' and 18 years. Pattern 1oc. 1148--Boys' Russian ]Blouse Suit wifli lrnickerbocker-This trim littie suit la splendid for serge or flannel, and equally good for galatea, linen, linene or ging. ham. The left front is made with a box plait over the~ centre and lapa over the right front. The blouse is finished with a \"Dickens\" collar, and the asleeve is plaited at the wrist. As here shown blue and. white striped galatea was used. The pattera is eut ia 4 sizes: 3, 4, 5 and 6 years. Pattern 10c. 1146 - A Conifortable Ncgligee or Lounging Robe-Figured cotton crepe in whie and blue, with facings of plain blue crepe was used to make this invit- ing model. The shaped yoke is eut with the siceve combined, and is joined to the body portions. Flannelette, silk, Iawn or organdie are ail suitable for this de- sign. The pattera is eut ia 3 sizes: smail, mxedium and large. Pattern 10c. 1151-Ladies' House or Home Dres- For a simple cotton gowa, suitable for home or buisaess wear, this design is very practical and pleasing. hI portrays an ever popular «\"one-piece\" style, and is easy to develop, with a ehoice of long or short sleeve. It could be made of cashmere, voile, poplin, or, serge, and with a neat linen collar aad smart bouv. 15 just right for service; while at the saine Urne it is stylish la its simple graceful unes. The waist clos'ing 15 under the box\u003e plait ia front and*tl- Skirt joined to the waist, at raised or normal waistline, is fastened jnvisibly under the panel. The pattern i8 euitila 6 sizes: 'M 36, 38, 40, 42 amd 44 inches hust nmeasure. Pattera 10c. t",
         "Wbmàmp, F.b., 19.15 Was Ail lu Iowa musb, 191s re atstractive Ite youth. .assure its Out low, and Inished with 3 lengthened tyle, and ils lhat may b. Silluatrated. valet ini red. a separate worn over it ini 4 aise*: ;tern 10c. le Suit wlth ittie suit is and equally ne or ging. Swith a box psover the Catalogue Notice Send 10o in silver or stamps for our up-to-date 1914-1915 Fail and Winter Catalogue, containing over 400 designs of Ladies', Misses' and Children's Patterns, also a concise and comprehensive article on Dress- making, giving valuable hints to the home dressmaker. Western Home lYonthly Winnipe 1154-Girls' Oas p\" ceDre8saVith Long or Short Sleev-Mahogany browa cash- mere with trimming of new blue talYeta is here show». This style is also good for blue and white checked, with coliar and eufs of white pique and a beit of patent leather. .Any of the pretty bright plaide would b. equnlly effective, or a combination of materials could b. used. It could be made of white linen or linene, with a simple design of em- broidery, a scalloped edge to replace the tucks, and have a sash of ribbon or a beit of embroidery. In poplin, faille, niessaline or erepe, and aise in- wash fabries, this style is good. This pattern is eut in 4 sises: 6, 8, 10 anîd 12 years. It requires 3 yards of 44 inch material for an,8 year aize. Pattern 10c. bied with a aleeve is Lere shown t was used. s: 3, 4, 5 egligee or )nl crepe in s of plain ,this invit- is eut with ined te the silk, lawui Dr this de- 1 3 sizes: ,tern lOC. nie Dress- aitable for design~ is [t portrays yle, and is ce of long \u003emade of serge, and ,mart bowv. Mue at the ite simple clos'iflg is tTnard th~e raised or inviibly is euit ini 44 belles 1164-Ladisa' Coat-Broad cloth ia Rumala green with trimm-\u0026ng of noveity plush vas used for this design. It wili aiao look weil in any of the many nev coat weaves, in reversible plaids, ehev- iota, astrakan cioth, caracul and similar cloakings. The coat in eut in redingote style, with fiaring skirt sections. The sîceve is set in the arrnscye and finished with a broad culf. The pattera is eut in 6 ies: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches buat measure. Pattera 10c. 1153-Ladies' Combination of Corset Cover -and Drawers-A praetical feature of this model is the beli portion on the cover, which bringa the fulniess well above the waistline. The dravers are eut on new lines and with comfortabie fuinesa. For lawn, cambrie, muelin, erepe, batiste, silk or domet fiannel, this design us very apprepyiate. It may be finished with embreidered scalleps, or wirth lace and insertion. Ail over em- broidery oould be used effectively for this style. The patter»ni eut in 3 aises: small, medium and large. Pattern 10c. 1166-Ladies' Skirt with Yoke-For broad cloth, serge, cashmere, satin, pop- lin, or erepe this model in equally de- sirable. The front and back portions are stitehed in tuck effect over panel sections. A shaped yeke is added, that may be omîtted. The patter» is c'nt ia 6 sizes: 22, 24, 26, 28, 30 and 32 inehes waist mensure. It requires 414 yards of 44 ineh material for a 24 inch size. 1150-A New Dreas for Mother's Girl --Good style, grace and simplieity char- aeterize this neat littie model, whieh may be developed with or without the tunie, and which looks equally well with long or short aleeve. For ordinary wear, for school, or home, wash fabries such as galatea, ginghiam or percale are very desirable. If warmer materal is liked, tiiere are lovely haîf woi suitinga in plaids and checks, aise fice serges, repps, voiles and cashmeres. For n best dress, serge or eerduroy, 'Velvet or poplin are very good. The pattern is eut in 4 sizes: 6, 8, 10 and 12 years. It requires 3', yards of 44 inch material for a 10 year aise. Pattera 10c. 89 WITI EEEIT TEOUBLE Ail IEEVOIS!ESS. When the heart doca flot do its. work prpryadth nerves become unstrung the whole system becomes weak and rua down, and needs building up before ou aufeel fit again. Milburn's Heart and Nerve Pills wil do this for you. Mrs. Hugh Mosher, Chester Basin, N.S.. writes: \"Just a few lines to let pou know wht Milburn's Heart and zrPuMshave done for me. I -have ulered greatly with heart trouble and nervousness, and was ail rua down. I used lots of medicine, but received no benefit until I was advised to try your pins, andIdid so, and before I had finished the frst box I feit so much better i got 5 boxesi and amn now veil and strong. I cau truly say they are the best medicie I have ever used. 1 cannot praise them too highly. 1 recommend them to any- one suffering from heart trouble.\" Milburn's Heart and Nerve Pis are 50e per box,' 3 boxes for $1.25, at al dealers, or miailed direct on receipt of q nS by fThe T. Milburn Co., Limited, otOnt., OUR FAMOUS $1050 SWIrCH ElevenyeRas go vs established out mail-order department. Siace that turne vs have had many competitore, but nons have been able to give Western customers a servic as good mi ours and so it is that aUl orders for avitcbes,.pompaours, curis and, tu fact, al kinds of hait goods corne to un 110w jusas 88they did eleven yemarmgo, whea we bad the Mil to ourselves. Our Catalogue wlll explain the advantages of buylng from a flrrn wlth a reputition. SEAMAN \u0026 PETERSEN New Yorlk Raa Slow 2U3 SMITH STREET. WINN EG Imm F or Groy HAIu 1 W1Dl Tell Tum FM lRaTe Usie ou UaIrt teurMI oduuwif 1.11 nd Lk Tsas Omou ne Dy\"a @d.m IsaRb\"\u0026Mgêousl . baieto tz =mceea ~m~ i j *e l n fomi\" o la ur o coaourana'0-auy1c ,oulb,. wh ynaeraMtb.Mam. m Old and Gopai 97 Youqa\" Ham ai a. myseifwa preinatuiv4yMrpeat 27 MAail a hlars e b.au ookud old. 1 rmtorndi t to girihOWds colov !broqb lbthe t vi..',ota ceutillc trIen~d. 1look 4= uier ..ua i4lài yýuraffland am a Iliving exa\" grtht eyamUflnith logreitfor anyone. 60d 1 b ave arnungeité glRie fuillhutruetiouu aboulwy f. aofchargce tb auy rder of this pa\",r uho wiabuti trt. store the naturael.sesof youtb 1téa y 0. Nebve. fadod haîr wtthout lie ureof any eky or InJuitenu itemor saalnaand withoubdetection. IpledgeeuccmwlMiblbM.iq and \u0026il agea ne matter boy urnny IbInubaye fhiied Bo write me to-\u003clay. , Gv. your Dame and addre.. phlmi. state whether lady or gentleman \u003cMr., Mm. or Mise) amiche. two-cent stamp for return p~ ag ad 1 wiii muni yen ffl Instructons to reatore lthe nat.urel colon? aud.aj.raee yonth tbouorbalr, making Il eoft. natueal al!.iymm aged. Write today and nover bave a he aïr a\u0026pin. Ad- dreu Mm. Mary K. Chapman4 Sull. Ur\"I.L B.IIBIpI 1dl\u003c.. Pzov.EIL Whcn writing advertiaera pleile mention T'h. Wc.teta iMome.Monthly. 4 N .,~ -\u003c ',.-.,, r The Weateg'n HOMO. mont hly- »M« B DwtbekMu.k ft b BOVRIL' DuBffm je rldukto heDc- bons. \" ikemone, beef bOfttieo roil l a \" fror CANADA195Tm UU COIT 01.11 $Wou, e, i.-1 , c:ieq .' S.,r o dial , are4S. %.. Idéel., Jhuu. lid BieNdVmm\"). $12s. - - - - - - - - - - - - - - ' 1Win, - 1169-A Simple 'Up-to-Date Nole- Tihis attractive design vas made of Per- sian silk in blue and green toiles. The lines are simple and it is easy te develop. There is a ehoice of aleeve finish; either the wrist or elbow Iength are popular, with the jaunty cuif. The fronts of this waist open at the throat, and are finished with peinted revers that meet a smart collar. The elosing is i» coat style. This model will be equaliy suitable for char- meuse, satin, veivet, lace, net, madras, lînen or flannel. The pattern is eut in 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inehes bust mensure. Patter» 10c. 1158-Ladies' Costume for Maternity or Iavaiid Wear-This design 15 grace- fui and effective. It is mnade with sur- plice fronts and yoke portions to which full sections are added. The large arm- seve ie most eomfortable, and a good style feature. The piaited tunie is joined to the waist, and the entire gar- ment is so arranged as te give ease and comfort and -aiso te admit of extending the waist'size. The underskirt is a two piece model. The model as here shown was made of eiik crepe in Russian green, with trimxn)ing of black charmeuse. The design is aise good for serge, faille, pop- lin, broad cloth, crepe, satin, or voile. The pattern is eut in 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches bust measure. Pat- turn Nec. 1 09%",
         "The~ W0m Wf#AaRin .\"thIy Wl~nnIpeg, Peb., 1915 Ilvuw ~fkIyFïenLibrary \u003ctour ob»Iw of ATm Z JOOKS from thi usmfflb. iéêgt puèft Wd * \u0026-ouru * Y~ It~~ undG b om Y..r1W ubmlp- FAMOUS- NOVELS PO*\"PULAR AUTHORS The. foflng ls m ontr. y new liât, just publlah.d, of standard and popular woeki lo a on By *liwnauthors.- Bach boek is complet. in itseif, sud la - e - !I\"*tsd ftroua .débi yp on good paper. Thi e la convenient for resding Jnoluded lhe i.lit ane the mont popular works of soeeof the. moot code- *ÉW M iors ef Ameriea and Europeand eseh book la publish.d complet., un- sudà \u0026 unsbridged. Look the. liât over, and we are sure, you will find thrl.a considerabie number- that you irould like to read and own: Ny A,. Conti Doyle' gaÉ The Secret of Gorethorpe Ny Josiah MAleu'a Wif e la MisJoues' Qulting gri Our Jonenvili. Foike Ny ia Jane G. Austin g14 The. Cedar Swaanp MyR'tery g«6 The Tweive Great Dlamonds \u003c8 The. Wr.ck of tihe Kraken Ny Emerson Bennett g!! The. Kidnapped Heireuts «SI The. Midnight Marriage Ny Charlotte M. Braenie gOlady Gwendoiine's Drearn .8O Beuty's Marriage g4Coralie 8sOn Her Wedding Morn g34 My Motiier's Ring g41 The. Mystery of Birehal é47 Marion Àrieigh's Penance g59 The Story of Two Pictures g64 The. Tragedy of the Chain Pier gO9 The. Coquette's Victirn Ny lira. Frances Hodgson Burnett g80 Tii. Tragcdy of a Quiet Life g36 Pretty Polly Pemberton Ny Mary Kyle paiIas g15 Cora, Hastings \u003c33 The Mystery of Mordaunt Man- Sion g73 The. Devil's Anvil Ny \"The. Ducheas\" A Maiden Ail Forlorn A Little Irish Girl Sweet la Truc Love À Little Bebel Ny Alexander Dumùas g44 Otto the. Archer g55 Tii. Corsican Brothers Ny lira. May Agnes Flleming g3 Hinton Hall g10 Tii. Child of the Wreek g20 The Rose of Ernatein g45 Tii. Mystery at Blackwood Grange \u003c Ny'Anna Katherine Green g56 Two Men and a Question g60 Thre, Women and a Mystery g65 The OId Stone Houe. g70 The Doctor, His Wif, and tiie Clock By Marion flarland \u003c13 Lois Grant's Reward g50 Stepping Stones By lira. Mar J. Hoirnes g1 The Gabled Roofed flouse at Snowdon g17 The Old Red Houe. Among the. Mountains g39 Rie. Corner g6l Tii. Brown Houa. in the. Hollow g66 Tom and 1 g71 Kitty Craie's Lif, in New York Ny Etta W. Pierce g22 Tii. Blacksmith's Daught.r g3l A Mad Passion g52 Tii. Heir of Brandt By Effie Adelaide Rowlands g62 The Power of Paul Latrobe g72 A Love Match By lira. Emma D. E. N. Southworth g2 The Crime and the. Ourse g5 The Wife's Victory g8 Tii. Little Rougii-Cast Hons. gIS The. Refuge g29 Tii. Phantora Wedding g42 John Strong's Secret g68 The, Fatal Secret By lira. Anu S.Stephens g26 The Bride of an four g37 The. Love That Saved Huim g5l Tii. Charity Seholar Please Order Your Books by Number only. Sunday- Reading He'a My Brother l met a elender littie maid À roay burden bearing, \"«Ian't h. heavy, dear ?\" I eaid, A» pai anc ahe was faring. She looked et me with grave sweet eyes, TIis frailie l\"litti. mother,.\" And .awered, as ln swif.t surprise, W. larger children tSl and fret To éelp the. old world onward,; Our .yes -witbh tears are oîten wet, Se alowiy it anoves sunward. Yet, would we al the.t eret seek 0f *Iis dear «littie mother,\" Unwearying we'd bear Up the, w.ak, Beoo.ho ila \"my brother.» Minnie Leena Upton. John Wesley'a Old Âge' lu tii new abrig. edition of \"«John WesIey's Journal,\" by Mr. Perey L. Parke, thei follo'wing interesting and valuab, vessons are given by Wesley for his long and heaithy 11e.: \u0026atm*dy, June 28.-1 titisday enter on my eigdty-ftfth year; and w'hat cause have I te praise God, s for a thousand spiritual blessinge,e for bodily bless-' inga aise! io'w littie have I ufée. yetby \u003c'L'h rush of nurnerous years!\" tis truc, I ar nent se agile as I was ini times paet. I do not run or walk se fast as I did; -my sight is a littie de- cayed; my lo.ft eye is grown dim, and hardiy serves me to read; I biave daily seine pain in the bail of my left eye, as \u0026smo in my temple (occasioned by a bio'w received corne nonthe since), and in mny right shouider and arm, which I impute partly to a isprain, and partly te thie rieumatisen. I fin1 iikewise some deeay in my mem- ory, witii regard te naines and things iately pat; but 1 arn net conscious of tny decay in writing sermons; wbich 1 do as readily, and 1 believe as eorrectly, as ever. To what cause can I impute this, that I arn as I arn? Firat, doubtiess, to the power of God, fltting me for the work to 'which I arn called, as long as He pleasesj to continue me therein; and next, subor- dinately te this, te -the prayers of His children. May w. not impute it as in- ferior nmeans, 1. To my constant exercise and change or airT 2. To my- neyer 'having lost a night's eieep, at land or at sea, sinee I was born? 3. To having sleep at cmmand; se that wthenever I feel myself almost worn out, I call it, and it cornes, day or xight? 4. To My heving constantly, for a'bove sixty years, risen at four in the morning? 5. To my constant preaching at five in the morndng, for about fifty years? 6. Teuiny baving had se iittle pain in 'my life; aud se little sorre-w, or anxiousi care? Even no'w, thougli 1 find pain daily ini my eye, or temple, or arm, yet it is never violent, and seldoin lasts nlany minutes at a turne. Whether or net this is sent te give me warning that I arn shortly te quit this tabernacle, I do net know; but be it one way or the other, I have only te say: My remuant of days I spend to lis praise,C Wiho died the whole worId to redeemn: Be thbey Inany or few, My -days are His due, And they ail are devoted to Hirn! The bard treatmnt meted out te Wesley ut Oharterhouse Seliool rnay have had something to do with bis hardy nature and iengthi of davs. Though always abstemious, he attributtd bis founidation of health to bis obedience te his father's wish that he should runi round the Charterhouse garden three turmes every nlorning. Stili, the Char- by the law thait riglit is niýlt, tie eider boys took the mepat aw ayx fromî the yoiner; and it is on Welesreeord that \"a smail daily potion of hrt',,, wvas ]is only food\"; yùt lic lived to his eig-ltv,-eighth yeer, and sixtY-fiftlj of bis nu;inistry. CATARII 1111 TONd ln a *Impie Way le Aparat, Ilerau, Sains:, Lotions, HaufuI Drug, Suke v Elecfriojty Hoals Day and Nlght It le a new way. It lu something absolutely differer L No lotions, sprays or aickîy smelling salves or creams. No atornizer, or any apparatus of any kind. Nothlng t. smoke or inhale. No steaming or rubbing or injections. No electrlcity or vibration or massage. No powder; no plasters, no keep. ing in the. bouse. Nothlng of that kind at ail. Somnething new and different, omethlng delightful and healthful, something instantly successfuL. You do flot have, to wait, and linger and pay out a lot of money. You caui stop it overnght-and I will gladly tell you how-FREE. I amrnfot a doctor and this is flot a so-called--doctor's prescription-but I amn cured and mny friends are cured, and you, can be cured. Your suiffering will stop at once like magic. 1 A, Free-ou Onulé Fm My catarrh was filtliy and loathsome. It made nme ill. It dtdled my mind. It under- mind nmy health and was weakening My will. The hawking, coughing, spitting made M~e obnoxious to ail, and my foui breath and dis- gusting habits made even ni\u003e loved Cnes avoid me secretly. My delight in life was duiled and my faculties impaired. I knew that I time it would bring me to an untimely grave, because every moment of the day and night it was slowly yet surely sapping my vitality. But I found a cure, and Iamn ready to tel you about it FREE. Write me promptly. RlSjK JU$T ONE CENT Send no money. Just your name and ad- dress on a postal card. Say: \"Dear Sain Kat.: Please tell me howyo cured your catarrh and how I can cureyomine.\" That'a aIl you need to say. I wilI understand, and I will write to you with complete information FREE, at once. Do flot delay. Send posta card or write me a letter to-day. Don't think of turning this page until you have asked for this ivonderful treatment that cati do for you what it bas done for me. BAM KATZ, Eoom E 5714 142 Mutual St., Toronto, Ont DON'T WEAR, A TRUSSI1 Blrooks' Appliance, the nmodern scientific invention, the won- derful, new discovery t4at cures rupture will be sent on trial. No obnoxious springs or pads. Has auto- niatic Air Cushions. Binds and draws the broken parts together as you would a broken l1mb. N ,salves, n0 plasters, no lies. Durable, .IOKlSOV cheap. Sent on tria. to prove it. Catalogue and measure blanks mailed free. Send nains and address to-day. C. E. BROOKS, 1705 B State St., Marshall, Mchigan. If jt's Made of RUBBER W. Have I. Write us andi mention your wants. LJNIVERSAL SPECIALTY 60. Box 2704. Montroal. ~~13ED DUC CHASER njUid loeu hou.of BMe nou tain. dust or dtga I. l To-j Bana fmtiafied euatoeoaverWhe. O\u0026. bkfeog to kill thoosanda ofbu -e pl~~ain wy.suer. or * Domnestic Mfg. Co. Desk B Minncapo-.s, Mina. WESTERN HOME MONT HLY, WINNIPEG ...................................... 191 Gentlemen: Enclosed flnd $1.00 for which send me The Western Home Monthly for one year and the following books, postpaid (order by number).................... ........ ........... ... . ............................. Yours truly, WUmip4 Feb., II)IS",
         "Wlnnipee Fe'b., 1995 b Way I, Loti'Ons, Nlght !.n absolutl '5 ickly aoiror o thlt irrbigor vibrationg or îsno keePé tt kind est The Permanency ef Peggy '\u003cMo you like your maid?\" asked Miro. Bothwell, who took a mothemiy interest Sn the first bousekeeping experience of fer young triends, the Faxons. 111 dont flnd ber very satisfactory,\" answered petty iittle Mrs. Faxon. \"The fact is, sihe doesn't lnow auy more about cooking than 1 do.\" \"«That is bard,\" Mrs. Bothwell laughed. \"Such a situation iplaces entirely tee mudh esponsibility on the receipt-book. Wby don't you lot her go, an~d secure an expeienced girl v0iho cin take charge of things; whiie you are getting broken înto bamness? Yes, if I wemo you I'd diemisa Peggy.\" 'II wonder if you would T\" sigbed Mre. Faxon. 've been trying ta, but I siinply can\"It, and 1 expect sh'ii stay as long as sAie win'hes for the reason that 1 oan't sucoeed in discharging lier.\" \"Wbat a foolish é\u003child, you are, AMy. Rt's a very simple inatter to tell a maid thut you wiill have to dispense witb lier services!\" \"Is it? I haven't found it @o. I've tried over and over agnin, and she neyer lets me. 'Sure, Mme. Faxon,' ehe said the :ffrst timo, II do be wishin' ail the moru- in' to see youm ate face in the kitdhen. Is it going to stir up a cake yer are? I lhadn't th.ought of mnaking a cake, but I went ight at it. Then, again, when 1 decided I muet speak, she spoke fist, and with shining -eyes and fiushed ceceks Proudiy dispayed a batoli of .bread which I immediately complimented bier upon, aithoug'b wben it came on the table Ned Bsked me where the bread-axe was to out it witb. She ie always se happy and 80, sure tbat she picases mie that it Mnakes it impossible ta tell ber she dloesn't.\"1 eWhy don't you write bier a note?\" Euggested Mms. Bothwell, ironically. \"I did think of that, and I was just com\"oing a lind and dignified dismissal Whic'h I hoped wouid settletCie matter when Peggy came with a letter f rom Ireland for me te read te bler. Shecan't deeipher a word of writing.\"1 \"«Then of course you dccided ta have lied undertake the task.\" \"Hlow did you guess it ?\" \"Weii, 1 have known other young wivee Who shirked . their responsibilitics,\" Emi led Mrs. Bothwell. ', ed juat hated -ta do it, but I in- aisted, and one evcning last week hie went into the kitehen, and I was sure that he, who was so forceful anmd stern When occagion dem, nds, would make bier understandthat hie wished lier ta leave, bUt 1 was 'nisiaken. When hie returned to the sitting-room, and 1 asked when \u002611P wouid be going, he said, 'Going?' àSl1eis;]\"fit going. Why, Amy, Peggy isnt a0141u as you-are, and whcen I spoke to -Ji e ried.'Y ease cetainly seems hopeiess,\" Mi.. Bthwlisuppressed a smile and blI. rightly ta tle rosy-chieezed TIrish gil\\01o îust then entercd the room with oiybriskness. Wefl Preservod '1 Vead-\"My graudmether reaeed bier huindredth birthday!' Ethel-\"jShe couln't have etopped at twenty-three no long 88 you have. Âccuracy Street Bandit te Prof esoor--«Tf you inove y ou are a dead, man! \" You're wrong, my mnan. If 1 move it will ahow that I am alive. You ebouid be more careful in the une of your wordâ.\" Betrayed ilamrry-\"I« understaiid Gertrude (Gads- lette married a man who made a big for- tune by a lucky speculation in soap.\" Grae--\"Yes; and he disgraced her while tbey were on tiheirhoneymoon.\" llarry-\"How did he do it ?I\" Grae-Gertrude wanted the other pafflengers to think an ocean voyage was an old story to, thein, wheu -ber busband, the first crack out of the box, pointed ta a row of life-preaervers and aaked the captain what was the ides. of tii the goe Th.k It Eack lu a certain town ùf wetetu Mtaaaacdi- setta two ef the imeat promIneut èliUsu a're a M'thodxet brother and 4 Preeby- terian brother. Thoue anre ighborai and, for the nieut part, d\u003cbro u p godl tere, except when tbey try tô effect an ex- change cf horses or te talk religion. On eue occasion the two had traded thorses, and aithougli the enteeme rankied in the. breast cf the Methodist, they had met and started a discussion on the sub- ject cf predestination. As nuia, an altercation eusued, wh.n 'Lb. Methodlst lost coutrol cf himueIf. With mixed emotions concemning borte trades andi John Calvin in bhsm mmd, he suddeniy ex- claimed: \"You're a ra1,ler, a liar, and a Presby- teian! \" This poved tee mueli fer the Presby- terian, anmd a fight began, in wbich the Preshyterian got the best of IL. As ho sat upon bis prostrate opponent, bump. ing bis bead againitt hie gund, ho said: \"Take it back, take it back, or I'll bumnp your fooiish bead off!\" \"l'Il take it back,\" gasped the van- quished Methodist, \"on the firet twvo counts; you'me flot a robber nom a liar, but you'me a blamed ild Presbyterian if I die for it!\" At breakfast réotlesa littie Tommy bc- gan te play with the cruet stand. Bie father told hlm net ta do ao. Tommy persisted, çand at last upset it and spiled the popper on the tabd1'loth. '\u003cNow, Tommyv,\" eaid bis father, \"1you were disobedient and upset the pepjper caster, and I realiy ought ta make the punisbment fit the crime by putting some of the pepper on your tong-ue.\"1 Tommy looked up in a flash and eaid: \"Should 1 ho plinisbed the same way, dad, if 1 upset the-sugar bowl?\" .00Mécad a '\u0026.eN$àCuL 2 WARA PUZZLE Mrs. Weepurse-Wouldn't it be fine, Rarold , if Boenee would givé un an automobile? Mr. Weepurse-WbaL would we do if we'd burst a tire? mrm. Wise--Our reetor preaeed such an excellent sermon \u0026unday, agnast thé danger and vulgarity of fiauâtiug of weaith. Mrs. ý 7rdy- But, morcy, wbat's weaith for ? Why? 7%8euerate of a faghlonaàble tbnreh was endea.voring tô teach the ulgnifleaince of white to a Sunday-sohôol clans. «Wby,\" said he; «\"does a bride ln- variably desirs to be clothed iii white at her marriage V' As no 'one answered ho expiaiued. «\"Whi'L.,\" \"id he, «Otads fer joy, and the weddiug day is - iM mont joyous occasion of a wemau's 1fe..» A smail boy queried: \"Why do the men ail wear biack ?» G\"at Gerru vur. R- was an extremely careful mother and had repeatedly cautioned -e six-year-oldd ni£htor apant~n any ebjeet that m ht bontain germae. One day the little gi'i camé ln and.t*id: \"'Moibèr, I amn noyer golng to play with My. kitty \u0026nt more, bocan se han gemmis onl er.» .\"«Oh, ne,\" repliei1 ber mother, «there art no germa on yenr-kittmn.» \"Y., 'héré e ,h Insisted the ohild. \"I saw eue hep.» À substitut» for 1Divorce Â recemtly dfroroèti Ite1enn 'vas ln- vited to a frlend'a housè te d\"our. 4 soon as ho wua seited the ho.t'a ltte daughter asked aibruptly: \"Whe'è your wife?\" The man lu some confusion answ'èred: \"Don't ktnow?\" replied 'th. enfant toer- rbe. \"Why dou't yeu kuow'?\" Since 'Lh. chiid persiètéd ho th: gthie ealset way out would b.e î%m.k e à dlean breaetý difthe ilatter. Se ho àImd, as we can t agr eé, we 'df botter n t.\" . , But the littie torment WoUM ilot stop. She exclaimed.. 'Van't £gref Thon why don't yen figt (t out, as Pa 'and )fi do?\"' 8.ajiW .ID HOU~ 7 OTMrENT emd lua Artificial Limbs Wbeaun fit ynu at short noticn with the beqt that nney cati buy. Write un Lot J. H. . Carson 857 Notre Dame Ave. Wlnniïeg L~LTT COb IibIVkl ~ 10 deefre. ta~ak.A fat at tIi. w. iÇo dlitIIig flot Eew Ipk, 18 Becoal Âv.., NwXu~l Wbmwrfdlor alvertisers please mentlog The Western Home Monthly. - r t-fl ' .-t.-.--.'rr- t - t Lighter Veli The Western IIf1U *JûothIy ib m\"Is kt, somethlng Ing instantly ýo wait, and ýy. You eaui Ldly teIl yoýu r and this sa Ption-but I red, and you. wiIl $top at leFm kthsome. It h.I under- ing my wiJL r made Me~ ath and dis- d nsels avoud was duiled new that ln imely grave, y and night ny vitality. ready to tell romptly. CENT me and ad- \"Dear Sam cured yOur le.\" Thatsa mrstand, a\"A information Send stal@ y.n' Iyou have nt that cais Le. rit ronto, Ont Es 8 Catalogue Send name fASER mnds of ,bur",
         "T. . - -I .4t.. o'.loek cmn nAug usi on- in M-prem li the.Uttle printing-offie Ou thO sumnit1 eeased its elatter, and COreY Green brogght out a bundie of StaMs wrapped lu enameled cloth, to Bart Collaniore. \"R«e'. Your five. hundred,» said ~rY, \"bot frorn Ghe tveec. \"1ilr gti\" replied Bsrt. \"«They'll be o the btel couaters twenty miles away by six.\" They wilked dowu the platform before th. eummit House. A dim ligbt ilium- iued thé. office, -but the rest of -the loug building was daek. OnIy two otiier lu onswere awakeFruk Simmous, vover the priutiug.preaa, aud Luke Martin,, the hotel watcbmau. Ovexiaead -an oecasionsi star gliunmered thaaougli the driving wraek, aud the lew east disclosed the first faiut tokens of a joloudy dawn; but in, the west frowned a 8\"th- joUly éoep;Iey o Wasaînatyrto C§Utpatioaa. Wetried AM. caig ce the Caleudar wlftbout e.isfaoton. \"Id speait large mumu cf ey until w, happened on \"Fruit- %e'*W. 1cam M Y 5toi muc la l Ibtr fayor. \"We have unéd the, lu the famiy for ,fkfbut two yean ad we wouid flot use a ý aaeae'as lonag as w. cmn get Th.tSation 15in il\u0026, sud » *distreas *M U.I have recommended them to Mm ;other people, SMd our hl 1. W. EWAMMOND. Those 'h be .. cred by \"Fruit. \"4v.\" 'ame paOudaMd lhappy te tell a a\"k Or saag tfrlend abouit tii... on- derful tablets made froua fruit juices. fiOMe-a box 8fo 8250.trial e 25.. I -At ail dealers or seut on reelpt Of praco by Patiy léimited. Ottawa. lion1111WAY TO MTRME A MATOU. Once in a while we have comPlalats about our mat- Ches breaking in two. This - lsUO fault Ofthe match, as Wtjth Eddy's Iatches .e. otl Mutkndè made frGUmsPeCââlysetlected ening, ~from which, a etrong wind a straltht-gralued wood only. tesriug detaehed mnasses and rolling Porfae bieaeflt of those who thera agaiust -the. mountainside. Now sud then s few flakes of snow flew by are stii u Ignoras18tO 1on tbe raw gale. the prpe ay to hold a Lifting his slide-board from the plat- math andtiereM mM\u003ey) form, Bart set it on the cog-rail midway we give the foflowlng dite.. of the track. ti \u003e-This rail was bolted to a. wooden te-lucenterpieee ou the ties, and consisted of \"Thoforiqgur of tus right -two parsîlel stiips of wrought angle- basai, hould b. plâmed ov.e' irou, couuected 'by steel pins three inches tla p of the match, and spart, ou which the coga of the engine wlBdaawa Ulckl ieu tuhe worked. Re turued the nut on the hecommet. Tspee brake-rod imtil the iron plates by means my vaule lev«rag on the of wbich tbe speed of the board was re- match, and instinct Preveuts tarded were in position under the sgotung one's luger. bora. langes of the rail. Mhen ho pulled on Sdn 'bis gloves, jammed his cap .down bard, EoL.IL EDDY Ounpony, Li. aud 'buttoned bis reefer ui\u003e to bis neck. NULLAMADACorey glaueed at the black western HULL, ANADA kv. \"You're lis.ble to bit the storm going down,\" said hie. Guess I eau beat it out,\" returned Bock on Bart. 'Seating bimself on the slîde- board, with the bundie of papers be- tween bis knees, ho gripped the brake-1 008____SE handies. Almost of itself the board and How to Feed began moving. t\"aLdrm . CLAY GLOVER, V.S. 'TII bo at tbe Base House in ton 13tbho . minutes!\" -he called back, as lie sped il$ W. au8. nt., .Y'aUSA away dowu the alope toward the notîî,1 ____________________________w-hile bebiud hlm the. drone of the wind M*~I7 pes. mntonalmost drowned Oorey'a shout.e Tb* M. Mutiade Mrtaer. j oo\u003ci Iuck!\" I .The. glide-board wsa the eonveyance sed 1b7 employees snd twakmnen in descending the. mountain railroad. AI- though'perilous for a novice,.it waa easy of management for an experienced hand. It was8-of seven-eigbthe-iuch apruce, ten iches wide, and sometbuug over a yard long. Three eleats screwed acros Ra top kept it front aplitting. Uuderneath were two sets of I\"shoes,\"' the forward of wood, -the rmai. of iron, parallel nt\u0026ipe baîf an inch thick aud four iucbes spart, just far enough for the top of the cog-rail to slide between them. As Bsrt alipped dowuward, the black buildings on tbe summit were blotted out by driviug elouda. Littie by littie he swerved westward, turning hua boack te the dswn, hesriug only the hoarse mur- mur of the risiug gale and the- rattle of bis board. Guide-bookas ay that the tbree and one-third miles f oa umuit to, base \"nY be eovered by elide-board lu twenty minutes. Actuaily, the. record is two minutes and forty-seven seconds. This p Wlnlpeg, PFeL, l9l Cured 0of Piles and Eozema By Ushag Three Boxes of Dr. Chass'. gintineut Mr. Abmsm Buiir, Hierbert, Sask., writes :-\"I want tc; say that I was troubled witlh eczma and piles and euffered greStly £rom the .iteing, bu ru- 'Inpee ntiusaued 1bY these ennoy1 ments. 1sent for safree samlle0 Dr. Cbae'a Oiixtment., and thisi did me so -mueh good that I bought three boxes more, snd after -asiug smre ws cird of qboth eea nud piles.' Thlis 18 Vthe kiDd. of Jettera we receive daily from peopile w1ho 'have been cured of 1ffhse treseing skin diseases by the use of Dr. Ohse's Ointmeut. No matter how skeptical yen miglit be, you cou i mot read these l1etters for many dtti'a *îithout oncluding :tiat Dr. Chasý'a Oiutmeut la 'undolibtedly 'Oie nust prompt relief sud oe\"tn cure for these ailments. 14 y'ou (bave doubta send for a .fueo sane box and -be conyinced. Tt was by use of a. free smiple tluat Mr. Bunhr wae cduvinced of the merits of.this treatment. For sale et ail deniers or\u003e FIdmnmsn, BatS \u0026 (J., Imnùte, To-. rontô. Paint Withou t Oil Rehuaikaba. flhuoovery that Cute Down the ContOf pintseventy-Flye Per' cent. A Fiee TriaiPackage in. Mailed tb Everoie Who Write. A. L. Rioe, a prominent manufacturer of Adamia, %T. Y., bas discovc-cd a proecss of naiua la w kind of paint without the use of oM. lie caIL.. it Powdrp t. Itcomesin theformofa dry powder and ailthat is required 1a cold waber to make a paint weather proof, lire proof snd as durable as oil paint. It adheres to any surface, wo\u003c*i, Stone or brick, spreads and looks Lie oùI paint snd coate about one-fourth as much. Write toe Mr. A. L. Rice, Manul'r., 440 North St., Adami% N. Y., and he will -end )-ou free a trial, package, also color card and full information Show- ing you how you eau Bave a good many dollar. Write to-day. CANCER R. D. Evans. discovemerof a whaouc jieme Daines Z o iera can Ile apreciated wben one remembersouitra that there is a drop of four thousand cancer. feet, and tint the average grade approxi- mates one in four. Bart had nmade the R. D. Evans trip some hundreds cf times in bis fýour- - ~ A teen years ou the road. Every nuorning BRANDON m that summer lie bad gonle down ýbêfore daybreak; iu order thnt the little paper printed on the peak might have early Cyo eun distribution s-mong the various hotels. Faster sud faster sped the ýboard. The Procuous Stones and roarls top of the rack was abuudantly lubri- cated with oil from the cogs cf the Blue Sappbire of 2 carats foi- your ring, sent on apprpval ........ engile, and the grade was growi ng Variety pacet of 100 carats asy one); i 131F 80 steeper. On the left a dira shaft flitted 500 carats Moonstonoe .................S@\u00260 by, memorial cf a life lost by exposure 100 carats Ceylon Diamond or Whîte mountin yars bforeSapphires .................. 00 o ou the muti er eoe 100 carats Blue Sapp*b*ireas..**..........$10 Blart put s little more pressure on bis 100 carats Aquiamaines .............. $28 braes Th soutbid h nles sme 96\u003e Whole Pearls, 8 carats...... psa braes Te to-tbiel lanle, 0le'2 Rows Necklet Graduateci ri 00 IOO wvhat smalier than basehail bats and Pay flot big prices te dealers. Buv ýconnected Trward with the brake-rod enud of ivar te get American orders. Variety .runniuîg across the fronit in a liollow packets aego o rmu.Lte wooden bar, and with an iron plate ud.psae god fo 5preiun. Lte each lange cf the rail. To retard hisl)OStagO te CEylu5 tals.e 8q course, the ri(ier sinmph- puuled up on Ls re salse 8~ the handies, wlich ere direetly ndfer Bottom Rates te Show Goods. his artis, thus lifting the plates again.,t Wikan n \"' \u0026C the flanges and pressing the boardc dowvn J i1r m n y k o harder on the top of the rack. .. e Mo tet The track curved nlortiîwest for the Kajutara P.O. ceyloil Meurs A. S. Fujier \u0026 Co., Souti Porcupine. uext fifteen bundred feet to tne Gulf Canada said. \"-BIe SaPhires for our reznittalcO Tank, a water cisteru on the left. Thue received'with tban1ks9. ave much satisfaction.\" grade varied from one in four to one h __________________ eigh't. 'The wind, keen, strong, and shot When writin\u0026 advertisers pieall. mentiola witb hurryiug snoivflaikes, stung even ThWser oeMnly tàê Weatém Plome Monthly Young People'",
         "mnBnipog, Feb., 1915 cema »r. chas.s' ert, SaEsk. -bat I was piles ai' fting, 'burn. 3e eflfoying b gamffleo01 ihis did mne bhree boxes vas tired we roceive been cured Ifca by the No ma4tter yout COifi.l rnany dtl, r. Cha se'a Otie niont e for thes. for a. f red Tt was Mr. Bitlir L8 of. this deniers, or\u003e mited, o Oul Down the WCent. »o Evoryon. er of Adamie, a lu w lie e:,ILý it dry pouwder r to malce a a durable as wo\u003c*1 Stone lt adceai ,440 North u free a trial, ration Show- any doilai. LD. Evans, lccoveme of ho !amous waws Cci r ~doe Who mir vth Cancer b wiite le im. The rea ment aue euiernl r internai anCR. hoid on those handies, and th. board would soon carry him safely te tuhase. Suddenly is. eMincreaaed. Ho had struck tho La oer. The grade at its head was net far fromn one ini Iv. Devu hoe shot, lifting bard on the birch bars. What vas that? Il could not be that left brake-bandie vas bueklingt Yesl Somthing has givon vay. Up came hie hand, higher, bigher, higiier, yet thero wvas no repone of iron grinding against iron. For just a second Bart feit sick. The fluge vas only threo4ourths cf an inch wide. If that left plate once got out froni under it, hoe knew very vel what would happen. A single brako could nover bold the board on the rail. On the next ourve, if not before, it would bound from th. track with trop' ndous veloity, and ils rider would land somewbr. on lb. ugpd mountainsido with a broken neck. Some- how, if bie cared to live, that plate muet nover loso its grip on the flango. The Ladder was four hundred toot logand thirty foot above the rocks at its ighet point. Bart vas -travelling forty miles an hour, seorosing thie trestle took bass than ton seconds. Be- fore hoe eft it, ho samy vlat he muet do. Instinctively easing up on bis rigbt bar, no as to bring an even preqsure on both sider, lie ran bis lef i bad quickly forward down the birch stick, b' o - le the break. Net mny.laches iror' the. socket bis Angers found il, viiore a kzurl imporceptibly. weAkened by long Mse, evideuiyyielded aI last. 'Sitting whore ho did, hao ould juat roaeh 'heyond th. break by extepiding bis arm fulilongth, and hc couid exert ouly a ellght upvard pull. If ho hoped to keep 1h. board on tho rail, ho muet im- ie\"itoly h\"t bis position, s0 that ho might put ont hi. it strength. Several ahort ourves ver. just ahead. To ehange eue'. place on a narow board flT4ng dowu a mountainsido at fort y miles an heur Ihrough a pitch- black hurricane is no fool's task. Very earefully Bart hitcbed straight forward, until bis knees vere upright, and ho vas able te if t strongly onthe unbroken portion of the bar. Hia speed vas now simply terrifie Round a cuve 'ho whiskéd, leaning far invar ini tb. fear that he might ride 1h. rail. Thon, as bis board settlod down on a straightaway, b. pulled up with a\u0026U \"i might. To his hiorror, ho found that with se short a lvegeho could net prom the. = t e~ ~InsthflIW~ bard onough te The board vwas running away with blini Bart knov every yard of -liaI track, overy pitch ande.urve, froni the engino- bouse aI 1h. suinmit te the Mrsflld Me'.Worm Powderm wem e dvhed te preinpty rege ebidrea wbe uaff4r-frei the. ravapaici vorans. It àlas *ple pro- raatdcm warrated to destroy' .twn*chiç end .Itsutinal *orme s wltout ahoek *or injuryt tbi ut istat sutive aystqm.. They aet therougbiy and pallesly a4 thiu L4 \"MO w naàU.emg prop.r17. tumntablo; and ho realizod liaI thi. wa the meut critical minute in ail hi. years of railreading. Two courses vero open te bm-be might stick te, the board, or, b. mighî roll off. Wbich vas tihe leas dangereus? If ho roiled off at thal speed, the best ho could hope for 'would b. a fearful bruiing,broken boues and insensibility it vould b. hours beforo esce_ s ooul fnd him; and heur. in that stormniesut doath.1 Tf ho taye\u0026 qn, b. toe thoechane of boing hurled f'rom tho rail aI somée urvle; besicles, what weuld happen viien. ho reaced the -bottàm, if ho ever 'did roach it 1 Ho decidod to stay on. Theulilde-board took the ,p'rVv a* expesspe.Titàe and igal art thougtiML a lizgof.ue vo~4i tb lnd himao1lf ah» sltth 'bh4 t thesaguceenWaumbokTsfld t didnzot see il But ittl. more tisa a mfbs due wus* and almost thirtoon hundred'foot lover; lay lb. terminus.- Waa Ibis te 1i -hi\u0026 lait ride on thé lino? la,\u0026- Couple gr minutes atI the moat lhe thirsi w944 ho declded, Bart manned hinM-lf foi the down through th. piteh dakas ý vms dashing ag namlafwyliSl I aneqa pedthat a qlvlI1 egl iles. 1l mril on iagt nesrbable fury, strl4ln bitM i i Bart'as easoned face. He had worked on tbe mouiltain long e»ough te, know what vas comig out -of that inky bank ahoad. * Guif Tank Swept past, a- square gray .hadow, and the track gradually swung verI. AM d ow ho caught it in good earnest. The moan of -the biastý had risen to a furions bowling. -Bulets of aleet pelted his cheeke. Rlgbt before him rose a 'black waîl, the edge of the real storm. It ioeked aimost as if it wero solid. Catcbing his breath, he ducked his head, and bolted straight into the heart of the tempest. In a second it enveloped him, rain, snow. leet and bail. His board whizzed faster over the wot, slippery rail. The grade increased, and he knew ho had reached Long Trestie. Beyond lay acbsLadder, tbe steepest place on the lino, pitcbed considorably over one ini three. Ho muet Dot go tee fast there. It was more than a mile and a baif still to tho bottem. If the board once got away fiom him- Bart stiffened bliaeif.against the gerce blast, grippod the brake-bandles bard, and pulled up u them. A stream of sparks trailed out on each id, as the plates bit aItbe flanges. Ho was leaning weil forward nov, bor- ing head foremoat minoe .yolling gale. His eyes wore closed; h. oould not keop them open. Nov tho Trotie vas past and the Ladder lay just ahead. Ho could tel whero ho was by th e fol of tho traek. afs head vas clear, bis nerves steady. AUl he needed to do was bo keep a good GIVEN AWAY IN Grand Provorb Cont.stj~ AC.muaIn.I~UkilhuumulDIt5gusw.4umtsr7bday FRE-A is. .o f I.doi lleu\".vuw v Soeieu e\" Twe et\u003e r.obfhtwMM»Coshu CMds00 U.MhmUde mm bmI1fite ua~ia. a d envol (5tud smple Hutos9 s.d ursuIIvtii sa.\u003e 1 -W - pinoem ta 3ad Pr' \"~ SdalPO 5hmt «Lb - end Barm poI.vil»s $31000.- aselt d (.OZTINEAL FUDLISMIGCO. Luiod Us WW4C00 ~ebb\". mou ** rua em~hum.i 82W.Wu hIsz\": MIQu laewbmà G.t the comple Mt of P»ws PIowv. to-day. Thom's a me*\", fylag primo f« a v ma, q»Uff *u*\" pitor -- - muuusly soIvIug tOW. Woed.wuub moOOITO.CAAD The Western Home 'Monthly s - \u003earls £080 6ms0 Beu low tili Variety Letter d 187q. [S. k Co. Ceylogi orcupifle, mittafle mention \"mi",
         "\"4 bakadfom bis seat. Bis cap wai tonM aways and the, aleet pattered like a saadbba.t on bis haro akuiL (lold Spring Tank flitted past, an\u0026 the lust stoe pitch vas near, asev'nteen hudre toe mile., lu a moment Bart W.rnshhig madly down -the descent. Iftzbu w'am vith the hideous apeed. 'IU board vibrated anid trembled as it Iàu *lmong the track. Al seeined un- Y8,lmmany. But although dazed and bugle, ho nover for an instant loosed Sof -the bam, . À«reeu\" uman ~ikve let bis head, sand that' could ha.adbutminuresuit. AlMost soofter theh could think, b. vas st the. bottom of thé piteh, darting over the Ainmonoosuo bridge. Only a few lhundred feet more. The. track, ý h. .ko,*\u00268aeear- to its end, fer cars and englues were house4 for thiight, Nov for ee laut, long, bard pull! Doaf, blnd, -.nunb,.eïhausted, bént alnuzom double, ho. drained bhis streZgh to thé 4rgafor a clutch on* the ha1dles; tfe e olffted, as if he vould tear the âlýnprom, te terpiece. Thr as a -terrifie ebrieking as the. lroý uUrfaces \u003croud.togethr.' Fire fol- Iowe e\u0026hbrake. à builda ruéIhed by on the. right-the earpner.hop -Bart did -mot ctually 500 it but lie know- it vas gone. ~Theu1 cme 'the ear-bamn, the. tumntable, the. en\"'ehoés. and repair-sbop, and the long -ood-shed. Les than- -tiirty yards Motel E M~eoi vd as slackening on the level radebtit vas-,till tremendoaas. * ni ov. tii.lauzrdry* vas past-thie luat building. 1'wenty-flve foot beyond itth ti.og-rail ended.. Bart threw aIl tbkt vaseft ofiimself -into one final, -twouIater'-iie found bimmeif rolling bljudle\u003e alongthe tics, -head over heels andhel ovor head, cuffed, punched, bat- terd o ifa dzenflails were beating ui,-t once on every'part of his body. At 1a rh cam téà stop, a bruised, Mfter a littie Burt sat up, tried his araand legs, and found ho oeuld \u003cet The western Ho pie onthly *on hie- fét. e feit himself all ovor. * Luekily bis bon.. wer,wel padded vith 1muscle, 60 noue of thbIu vero broken. e\"The, storrn vas atili blowing forty n. miles an heur, but by contrast it seemod. to1 hum'to b. almdst over. le hunted L. untithe found his bundie of papers; it 1. d Ij en tiod, tightly, and had not burst toen. Then ho liMped up to the Base I- ouse. d .\"Hero are your Stars,\"I said lie to the* ddriver of the team, shivering outaide. a 'v. donc mny part; nov see if you cau CI\u003cet 'eIli to Bethlebemi before six o dlock.\" à Match Story By Gertrude L. àtonc L Phil tried- two matches before he suc- eeeded in getting: one to burn. ' 41 do -wish vo had some decent matches!\" he exclaimod. \"Deceent- matches l\" Iaughed grandma, viiose Iarnp Phl vas Iitg. \"I wonder what you would think of the very firet matches I can romnember, or, better still of thc firet your grandmother's mothê; used. 1 have iheard her tell about them, and I don't believe that, Iamp would be Iighted now if you had bad to use one of them. You would still hé down on the hearti Iighting your match- that iM if there wsn't i i inteý;cUt you could y use. fepac t a ';If there-vasn't any fire I eould urne?\" rePeated Phi ma puzzled toue., \"Why shouldlnMdanyfireto light amatch? I'd strike it.\"1 \"But the match wouldu't strike; it waan't made so it could,\" replied gadra. Phil put away the broken audburpàe mitches,.picked up the big Angora est, sud settled bim eif hi a big char I o' tell about the matches -îttwudt striios,\"h. said, inhi bs na erusv tone, \"Il won't fuse to-morrow nigit if 1 have to try tbree.\" Grsndms smiled and closed her book. et~~ odwr they if tbey wouldn't \"Oh, et deal,\" answered is grand- ote.'If you bad some fire on band you could Iight a 'sqpunk,' as they ealled them, very quickly, for su iur blazes ia tvinkling; and you COM cary .Our match frm lzp to lamp te o brininte laPB or candles to the fire. fcorse uer. reother tilgs that ligit as quickly as suiphur. Paper doce; but burning pape isn't very pleasant to handie. Tewayi vhich, these matches were most useful vas i ligbtig new fires, I tbink. People tried to keep fire on hand in those days when a nov fire vas so bard to kindle, but if a nov one had to hé lighted itvaa pretty fine thing te be able to use one of these spunks that you tbink vere no good. To get a épark from flint and steel vas no little trouble, and tien this spark must be caught i a tinder- Iox-a box full of stuif that would kindie easily, but not blaze, stuif like-like-- uga, she added, witi a meaning smile. Pbil understood. Only that mormig * e forgot to put up the brass fonder, and a spark fromn the open fire bsd left a little round bolei grandmas eartb-rug. How sorry ho had been! \"NXov if you had vanted nome new fine,\" grandma vent on te say, \"anddbW Put the suiphur tip oi a spunk down on that littie burnm spot,- puif! you would have bad a blazing match. Soon the wood of the match vould have caugbt, sud yoý would have bad a nov fire atarted. bhn ow mucli casier than te blov sud blow te coax the burning tidor to ligbt a piece of wood. '«People thougbt these matches vouder- fui helps, even ify ou couldn't strike them; but they did notUvet s he ra vbile, beesuse somebody thougit of something botter. I can just. remiember the next kid. Tbey ver. tipped v ith suiphur sud soming else, but thosee, eoud et . igtdy scratching te. People ligbted them by dippig them hin a bottle. trange vay te Iigbt a match, wasn't it? That bottle was tie most mysterious tbhig i tic vbole bouse te me. Winuipcg, Pcb., 1915 -i are readily understood by yoirng or old. This Magnficent Combination DINNER and TEA SET FREE to Our Subscribers Tiio ubove illuetration oaly begina ta do juntice to this handuome conibination and velvety in tous. A Deat, emnboased design f oUlows the edge of every pince. Ail Dinner and Tea Set, hcw aedcddt ieaa re hDde i de r rcdwt od Each set is guaranteed by 'l ho Western Y oor rad5lL Hrn Montbly and by Mesama Robinson \u0026 Co., the wel-known Pianeer Winnipeg The Combination Dinner and Tea Set consiste of 47 piece@ and in made cf the merchanta. AUl that You have ta do in arder to get this set in ta .end un.neveu new best Enslith Semi-Porcelain. The deeipi in one of the mon t popular patterns we have subacriptians to The Western Home Monthly at one dollar apiece. Surely a magni- oVer Been. The floral decamation in pranted under the glazet n a rich flow color, soit ficent reward for such a littie labor. The Western Home Monthly, Winnipefg Canadau It was fild with asbestos. You know' wbat ashestos is, don't you? Tbat qtwer kind of rock that is q0 very stringy and ml soak up %vater or oil or any other liquid? This asbestes was soaked in suiphurie acid, a strong chernical that made tile match tip blAze when it teuchcd it. I always wanted to watch wben my father lighted a match. Down vent the match into the bottie. Just as soon as it touched the wet rock, flaz! we had a light. The first of these matches we had I've heard rny mother say cost twenty-five cents for eight.-four.\"1 Phil gaspcd, as he thought of a timne in the year whcn he wanted lots and lot.s of matches. \"il never could have saveil enough moncy for a good Fourth if l'd had to buy my own matches,\" he said, with a~ sigh. \" You could have pieced out a match or two with a slow-match of rotten wood,\"y aaid grandmna, comfortingly. Then tbe'y both Iaughed to think how times have changed. CiCi was quite a girl,\" continued grandma, \"vhen we had our flrst friction-matches, matches that light by scratcbig on a roug surface, 1 mean. 1 amn afraid you would not have though4 them 'decent matches,' but I thought tbem' vcry wonderful. They vould not strike with a littie esy' scratcbmng \u003cl the bottom of your sboe or the under side of a table; instead it took a very rough surface, and we bad to scratch hard.' We used sand-paper folded two rougi. surfaces together, heid the paper tight, and drew the match between the layers. And for ail that, we thought theso matches so fine that it neyer occurred to us that our grandchildren could possibly have anything boter.\" \"Well,\" said Phil, laugbing, as tie sup- pr-bel sounded, \"perhaps these new par- 1er-matches of yours are pretty decent, after al.\") Simnple and Sure.-Dr.ThasEleti OU 1s so simple in application that a child can understand the instructions. Used as a liniment the only directions is to mb, and when. used as a dressing to apply. The direc- tions are sa plain and unmistakable that they",
         "WM.inipr, Feb., 1015 The Western. Home Mont hiy Correspond ence ceb., 19m,\u003e YOÙ kuowl Tbat queer «Y and m-ill ;he J.quid? aulhurie Ilied it. ie My father the match 1 t touched iglit. The I've heard 'e cents for f a timre in and lot.s of ave saved h if I'd had aid, with a a match or ,en Wood,\"y Then th'y imes have 1 grasdma, n-mnatchm. , on a roug you would ,matchem,' wonderful. littie easy ur shoe or d it took a ta, scratch Dlded two the paper tween the uglit these irred to us sibly have a the aup- Snew par- y decent, M.\"117=11 .at a child Used as c) rb, and The direc- t tlat they r old. W Einvite readers ta make use of these columne, and an effort wiil lie made to publieli ail in- terestiiig letters received. The large amaunt of oorrespondence which is sent us lias, hitherto, made it impossib~le for every letter toî appear in print, and, in future, letters received froin ubacribers ,wilI receive firet consideration. Kindly liote we cannotk send any correspondent. the sames and addresses of the 'writers of the letters published. Persoa wieh- ing to correspond with others should Fend letters in stamped, plain envelopea under caver to the Carrespondence De- partinent and they will immediately lie forwarded ta the riglit parties. à Han'a Opinio Ingereol Dec. 1914. Dei Editor-After mucli considera- tion, deliberation, and a large amount of deep thinkig, caused by reading the fine correspondence letterai the W. H. M., 1 have decided ta try My luck at letter writisg and ta make it as short as possible, that being the only salvation between it and the waste paper basket. I have been a reader of the W. H. Manthly for three years and find it ail riglit outaide of the \"Fashion and Pattern Departinent,\" but the \"dear\" (?) girls would have nothing ta talk or read about, so we bachelors wl have to put Up with it. That nice letter of '¶reda's\" in the October issue took my gat, but I can't agree with lier as far as trhe \"yellow liaired girls\" are concerned, because some of the sicct girls Ive met (and I've met a lot) had red liair. I have had the isifortune to lose my Monthly that liad \"Sunset Bil's\" letter in. He seemed quite friendly with the girls and 1 wouldl like to hear froni hiran d learn wliether he has had any experience with the \"Rainbow\" kiss. 1 have just read \"Qne girl in B.C's\" letter and cer- tainly appreciate it, but.have aometliing ta say about \"Women'a Votes,\" \"Henpecked Husbands,\" etc., myself. Isuppose you wvould aay that woman is inferior ta man insanerepetsonyand tha eause long centuries of enslveent hae killed her abilities snd' that if woman was given thé opportunity of warking and partici- patin gi social snd intellectial life she wo uld develop lier slumbering abilities, would overtake and perliaps surpass lier enlaver-man. Let us agree then with these reasons, that woman cannot keep abreast with man ini saie professions, whie froin many others she is entirely. ex- luded, therefore ahe cannot achieve excelence. Nevertheless there are splieres which have always been open ta ler. Something For Everybody I ake music as an example. The aLudy of Medicine Hat, Dec. 12, 1914. t his art has neyer been held from woman. D\"Eio-eei ihn o n On the contrary, man lias aîways encour- DerEio- reswshnyuad aged i the.persan of his daugliter, fiancee your staff A Merry. Christmas and a or is wif e an interest i this occupation. Happy New Year and my compliments of But the resuit? lias there ever been one the season to ail readers of the W. H. M., woman who has proved herself the equal and my wish is this, and my toast this of any one of the masters of the art or has Festal Tide: \"While we are climbimg the had her name handed down from genera~- H11l of Prosperity may we neyer meet a tion to generation with Mozart, Wagner friend.\" It sounds funny, but the truth and Beethoven or ha up with aur modern is: if you are going up when you meet a Paderewskis and Kubelik? Just as'inthe friend, lie surely must be coming down. case of music, we find that men have en- Weil, 1 have just a few words to say to couraged and favored wamen in the art of my fellow readers on various subjects, painting and sculpture, but wefindnothing which I hope won't detain you long, or to compare with the Raphaels, Rubens,' take up mucli of your valuable space. l\"ossns Muilosand sa an. And what tow \"Sunset Bill,\" I understand you wmnwriter who can compare with affaira\" and still unmarried. I take it this Shakespeare, Dickens or Victor Hugo? way, that the ehls liaving found yau out, I will admit that these fine arts are not as merely a flirt, abandaned your com- wîithin the reacli of the majority of women pany, leaving you stifi as yau were at firat, and this to a certain extent exonerates and your \"love affair\" falls away as a pass- t hem, but we wiil turn to the culinary art, ing fancy. 1 eau give you a few years the cooking and preparation of food. start in ie, and 1 arn not married either- Man lias neyer excluded wamen from this my ovin fault though. I cail sincerelyr hranchof work nor lias lie forced lier into say, too, that I have had no \"love affair,' it, as the present day suffragette is wont as yet. aithougli I have had the pleasure t(; say, but if we want a chef to-day to of the company of quite a number of niée, prepare a good dinner, why is it that Nv respectable and jolly girls on variaus 'ns rwhmfonternao h eoccasions. People nowadays marry flot With ail these things to look Upy to, only for the \"love\" that should exist be- twcen the twa parties for one another, which mea.rls a happy life for mas and Relief from Asthma. Who ca,, describe the wfe, but tey also marr for love of c(,rnplete relief fromn suffering whicb follows money, love for notoriety and tities, and thle tise of Dr. J. D. Kellogg's Asthnia others for the fun of the thing, and sot for Remedy? NVho can express the feeling .f nytilat cornes when is nft and gentie in- the. benefit, the good and self-sacrifice fluence relieves the tightetîed. clogginig air 1tfhçre -,atce oalieo armna tubes? Tt lias made asthrnatic affliction a love. 1 see \"Just a Girl\" wants \"Love\" thing oftheli past in ail lands. It never fai'. explained. Not for minc-some tail think- Cood druggist., everywhere have sold it forintobdnc Prhs\"SstBf\" !;s. In, obcdnc eras SnstBil 45 Goo0d News for Canadias Health Specialist SPROULE The Great Catarrh Specalist xpi\"s HIS METHOD OF TREAM p..,. can't sec why womnen ehould -wish ta, enter that realin whicli las always belonged ex- clusively ta, mes, viz: Polities. Neither Can I account for any henpeeking. It ahould be the other way. If wifey camesl home frain a five-o'clock tea and starts out with the neiglibor's faulta, unless yau can ide mn with her (whicl ist doubtful) any man would begita wilt sud would begm ta think, \"Slie'l be pahnting out ine before long.\" And yet she ha empliatie ini her opinion that it is the duty of the wamnen ta exer- cise their riglit of franchise at the polis. The average womsu ha better than the aVerage mnan, but the average woman pohtician is as bad as the average man politician-only she ha worsel If ail women would ji in one concerted move- ment ta unseat botli the prafessional man sud the professional waman politician, then the riglit of franchise vested in women would be of inestimable value. But it will ot bc for some years that this wiil be. The trouble h, she wants ta lie a polithcisu sud a womsu, too, sud this combination doesn't go very weil ta- gether. Women, generally speaking, vote ta please the men. Not as a matter af direc- tion, but rather for the sake of liarniony in the homes. Lçft ta theinselvesansd uninfluenced by -men, womnan's vote would lie clisotie. By way of example, a really hsudsame young man is a strouig asset on any political ticket. Women are, by nature, of a truating disposition in everything save love affaira, sund it ha therefore an easy thing for the mes ta control their votes. Equal suff- rage ha still in the experimental stage sud as a Insu litii aaid: \"Politics are pollUeës, sud civalry, or- a regard for the- fiser insincts,lias nopart in the political gaine.\" Must close now as the Editor wil be gettig tired of aà this. Would like ta correspond wth \"«Ose Girl in B. C.,\" \"Cleopatra,\"-yes, sud with any one wha cares ta, write. A poËt cardwouldbefully appreeiated sud would lie duly answerd 1 have been living on a farn ever since I was knee-high ta, a grasaliopper. Have always liked it sud have no desire ta leave it, and if suy of you write me about farm- ing liere don't head the letter \"Hello Whiskers,\" as I don't sport sucli a thhng. After tliakig the Editor for this space and wishing the paper every success, will aigu myseif asMacTaviali. P. S. This ia no argument for or agaiast woman suffrage, but rather as a picture of the situation as I sec it, or have read about it. MEDICAL ADVICE. FREER Ho wHii diagnose your came vithout charge and fr11 you juil what ta do. Do sot delay. 'Ins canes every moment lapn cu.Do mot nielect yourmeLf Above \u0026iU do flot cive yomu.f ,ým treatmont. The reulta ma hericua CATAZUE ou' TM muA» NDTEROAT DIEEA8UO'F lONOMU-VUff The mont prevalent f orma ofCatarrh reuts hm aarh itisa eadwsud4hwm ' f~he reinawhlectd cold.t.,- i Do yen spiteUpourneuncheeked it extenàd devitise 1 21Are your eyes u lmr? the bronchial tubes, end M nsmPl tbaaet 23ADeesyour ens waeolui? 1lungasuddevelop ilio te ibrhmfdmùpl 3Dace your nase dicl ull? 1 - Do you tale cold -oily? 4 oe-u os icae 2 la your breathiig toc quick? 5 Do o nes edédem? 3 Do yen rýais. irothy matrlaif' 6 Doorusmormiugtheos?4 la your voieseh-srMeaidhtuk 7 Do yen have pain acrome lhe eyes?\u003e 5 Have you a dry, haekng cmei?- 8 Docs your breath mmeil offensive? 6 Do you feel.worm out oun Wg 9 là your heariggning te fanl? 7 Do you beel aiu atuffed uplals 10 Are yen usinWg you Of a.ai mli' 8 Are you gradully lamlng il Do you havk up phlegm in the mnorning? 9 Have you a diaguat for f at\" s 12 Are there busaing noi9ea l your ears? 10 Have yen amsena.ei of ghC0m4 13 De yen bave pains acMsathe front of Il Have yen a sc\"theella ' 'u your.forehead? 12 Do yenou ~ hlhm~~ 14 Do yen feel dropping in back part of 13 Doycn tahîwO lpw Ibrat? If yen have nmre cd themo qmptùgi If yen have nmorn f the above ayniptoms your Catarrh of the branchia tubes.\u0026 disease la Catarrh of the head and throat. Anaver the abeve questions, yen or no, write yeur full narne aud addremm p1ainly on Puil Marne........................ the dotted lines, eut eut snd sen):t Catarrh Speolilast Iproule - Ade. .............. 117 Tradte Building, Boton Be ure and write to-day. .............. TI-J LAB L onyourpaper, will tell yru when your SEND INi OUR RENIEWAL WREN DUE -- TEE GECRUTDELISR SFUCtAimT?, Gradualein odi anr$= i D \"\" * Has Curéd'ail F*onüs of 'Catatrh\u002bË' Tvlenty-flv,eam Moou\" butlghl ooe umal b rlasRylMi p osct = akee M 1 hd ar mn atise theaM menace tothelifeanald happinem ofthe civiIfe va . Wuothph\" 'lu er uniporau. Seciilt 8 =ulo tudied ils nature and tise measor cure. a. labor odin and ,aor ney.Homasteodthe ubjoot. As Speila SpouChd fareseen, Catarrh apresd wth frlghtful \u003emMlt. Tu Catarrh vsamatukn .NWo no0goor mmi a xà ptfroil. ,NoiatMor.lsE~ff for* it. -It in in many came.tho fano e ci o.uup«Éu. Vial uaUliaho» Consumption mthis country have -lamsd the la i lYomyen'.lustrlg faihlM MEA1M mmzîy cf tisese cases have been treced bock tb Calarrh s tisir atuagpcln. a Catarrh Speciait Sproule, the firsIto m nk Catarrhi a apomaty, bas=nr dm~ tutional treatment whioh hma cured hundredeand ual dredé ci csmm ofamri. m Canadian people, throughout tho provinoce., bleu th. daY theY uaW.hmdertann e tft ago. Tho widely advortiaed a\u0026maed \"Catanh cSur acte do more hr isagodL by i Catarrh germia deepér imb btcesyutem. Painful atoumcldiiordemd vs oemain Catarrhtila adimease of th. mucous membrane and ln gera le only Ibrougli tis. dI. rernedjes prepared for esch ccm N edmnetisaI viiicure w i oltmen a sianotIs. Sprouie'm mnethd drives every germ ouI of the-body. -Ilet eltWhesd, êltbobh iavkhnganel sweetena tho brealis, .trengthesa the oye., retore. 1h. =eamlOMMIt«t\"\" the Iii irvgora edluUp the entire mystent. It aivesnov ji.,enercy, snd ambition. The' pe of le er aertbar. Work becoms a p9=su.The felsolm ifii mdeaver. Catarrh Specialit Sproule amnoie arevrai tisof a a moator ln thoumagdm ci home.. If.4ou have any ymptoma aof Catarrh, the Spedcit m mlteanly lavis. YM o aw\"ritehm and tell hlim ant-I It wilIcost you notblng. Bewviigiveo utisemoMlvaluali",
         "rhô Wetat Homo .Dlonthly Wannipwg, Plu, 115 cm s\" jYOIo d d 494 without muéh hemictiO\u0026 à4 = you on home- ol me. Il la a difficuit task uàt 1 am hdil snorayau , IM.e hoet\"d \u0026idprie \"Ouly M%1\" you mm bave aatulosym- fI~e bêchdWor onthe bomete\u0026d, rOr% wtcèýk nd umwork corne l- goU tbSrale awkward at times for one mmrnet c f t e daye. 0fr. me a tldy sud ctaky woman, \"SweotAlice,\" fori h . mue cranky I cmn boa*itioutalde, mothlb. mfor a wbils. TIi.mme ammmwoe h o Now, \"Jerryi» l'1l bot the drm\u003eWSàie you for your leUw obWomm uffrag. 1' da.'t MW hem bdfl boe ia the.houae, dities.outaide. à-7tSn mM Now Ilbd\" to quît, I wmtthls in the Niew Year lue, Mr. Edtor, don't teral.Ha~pyNew Year te ali-by that 10=a=okheif le dtor sud staff W H. M. ris\"rmand subaciber. doo luok, frora Dido. no Votes For Women Simpoon, Dec. 22, 1914. W tenHome BMomth Deir Ultor-As tua lLrla ionly from a M»r man, 1do net know id the ladien WMI PaY ranch attention or net. A\u0026 re-j =ard. iefor .nmýI Id 11k.tb toud yen do nott hbnm i your ewn your are lrying te set up a FRW FRE TO LADIES A Bottle ot Blush of Roses Fb. pale cthebmbottie of Zà\"UMPImdIM' buin 75c. lu lady abmo at is. t. 1.yi porhot yp reetomoorn- pi Mr t i teDdothe MMeau n Sne hd in ita use in eSla hr - amr;DO uel a Ithe iiore.. LU, 0FROE M lpcmithefr emove t4114freoshlma, plephahhed, livewq»btmmoth-patches, tybIam sud matbokun m â\"nhae bie i, m mattor how dut rk armaow yu ijiay«yiivi!mes it da y day untila Alakm, a A\" bmiMhaatcese- pllnhobtalmei. Qallmea Woadma la' cla oomwSdzoaaire fDot te thavla Ibe m»na hummstv.aAnd vhyé~ldthe~ be Il . 0me the. BLEO't meS? toi sla car as wates. t\"mke oMahnefrom the. face, remnoes adl tisa mpurities of the aida n mihave.s nomiga k. powder or paint. fle only cear, disons. Price 75o per boule. Address Mu. Francem E. Currah. Wimdeor, Ont. Mgr Write For Free Trial Off er Blush of Roses Is Aiso For Sale by the T. EATON CO. LTD., TORONTO and WINNIPEG SUPERFLUOUS FlAIER Moles, Warts and SmalfBirthmarks are successfully and permanently removed by Electrolysis. This la the al y sade and sure cure f or these bleMishes. Thick, heavy eyeMryws may e eautifuly shaped and arched by this method. Tere ae severa Ipoor methode of performing this work, butin the banda cf a xert it May be done with very littie pain,leaving nosca. I havemae tiwork one of my specialties, and with filteen year' experience, the very beot method in use and a determination to make my work a gue, I cam guarantee sa tisfaction. Write for bookiet and f urther particulars. Mrs. E. COATES COLEMAN 224 SMITH STREET, WINNIPEG Phone Main 996 Broadenaxe Hair Food Is flot a dye but a food that oothe. the dry scalp and lifts the dead skln off thug allowing the hair to corne through in its natural shade. Directions for use on jar. Mail order price $1.00 postpaid. ESTABLISHED NIN£ YSARS BROADENAXE CO. 29 Stobart Block, Winnipeg SUPERFLUOUS HAIR Moles and Warts slî(cesfully removed. Eczema and acne treated. Facial treatrnents. Scalp treatments. Soft water Shampooing. Manieuring.1 irs. Mocoichy, Suite 5, Credit Foncier Bldg., Regina, Sask. s\"Itemin gotting the vote and having the wiord u\u003cbey» effaced from the mariagef oeremony, *bich the Lord basp ut down as againit Ris wlIl and against Hia Word, cour» ie bave te submit mnd tell you that IOu have a vey attractive banner to un- Iiibete i.people-\"lThe Cloomg cof thehr-room Door' -but won't nme of yOnadi ttyouwould liketosoothebar cloded mfllrgt but would much sooner bavelthoe. Does l never touch your conscience, or do you flot believe, that if the Young and iin eeratâon were brought up m te way f:attheyrshould go, it would not b long beforo the bar would cosse to exit? However, if this is wbhat you reauüy dsret putth bar out of ommisson-I buhnbly apologuse for my mistaken suspicions. Homesteads for women on doubt have be a geo tiga tee' years ago, but at the presnt ti. mano eo ow il would help, sa the Iadla nearly, if not ail, gne that is wertb home.teading. In rny op\"nion, it would help but a veryfew, and theywoul ia ail probabiity liv. with their parents or brothie while domng the duties. How many would go away back frorn ten to fifty miles from town and start up bouse- keeping by themeelves to get a quarter section now a days? After paying out a lot of money, the chances are they could net Seil it for what it would cost them. I think the girls should be satisfied te let the men do the homestead4ng, because 1 bave done my share cf it and it is no fun, but te take another one now, I wouldn't do se if the Government was te give me money along witb it. Arn an old batcb, and, aIthougli I have te search myseif with a microscope te o the faintest -shadow cf box,. for a better alongihat line wbich would lead the pros.. pective partners te consider Iheir suit-. abilityf or eah other, wbetber their tastes are congenial andi fact, whether lhey are rea2ly mated or wbether it ajs tho fascination et youth. I amrnontdr- mng alone on mny wn experence for tbem( cencusinsaltoug I ave seen quite a lot cf 111e, but rny observation cf thQ people I have known bas convinced r , that it la a dangerous thing te jump into matrirnony at the dictates cf passion alone witbout its being balanoed by judg- ment. Hoping.that I have convinced yeu of my srncerity sud made myseif clear, I amn, very truly, Sunset Bill. Thé But Home Paper McGee, Sask., Dec. 2lst, 1914. Dear Editor-I have been taking The Western Home Monthly for tbree months. 1 think it la the best, home paper that la published to-day. I have saved my tbree copies sud I am going te send them tea friend i the United States. It mnight encourage them te take your paper, and I feel quite sure that they will neyer regret 't. Weil, I can't step) right out with a lot cf our other writers, but 1 hope you will par- don me. I think that the \"One Girl, i B. C.\" sure has got a geod idea cf the wonr.cn folks sud aise the men. Well, 1 think 1 had better close, and if any cf the members care te write me, niy address is with the Editor. Wishing The Western Home Monthly a Merry Christm ansd a Happy New Year, I sign myseif Pony Boy. ftrI still try and remain content- at Follow This Example that. Hoping to see this i prit,IreW ,SakDc19114 main, Icecycle. Dear Sir-Being a new subscriber te The Western Home Monthly, 1 wish tu Sunset Bih Back Again express my appreciatien of your maga- CornatonAlta. Nov. 28 1914. zine. Its numerous departmnents must be CoroatinY a source of great pleasure te the lenely Dear Editor-When 1 wrote that letter homesteader, espeiiyteCrespon- wbich y ou published in the August num- dence page. Lixe manyof the corres- ber, I had ne idea that it would cause se pondents, I always 10Zk for that page many and varied commenta. Sonie agree first, although I ha've only received four with me smre say I arn merely a flirt, while co ies of The Western Home Monthly. \"111gb chool Kid\" aya she doesn't think *our magazine lase good that I wan.t that I believe wbat I wrote, but juat said those at home in old Ontario te read its it te see what sornebody would say. I arn pages, sud arn enclosing subecription wrlting Ibis letter te convince the readers price, and address on separate sheet. that I was mincere mnrny statements and Wishing The Western Home Monthly for the purpose of making myeif more every success, I remain, clearly understood. Yustuy \"Aura Lee\" seema te voice the commun Yous tuly idea when she implies that 1 characterize MG ail love as a \"sweet sud passing fancy.\" 1 Patriotiom said \"in more than half the cases?\" There la certainly a sweetness sud Manitoba, Dec. 1, 1914. charm in that sentence of \"111gb School Dear Editor--Some montbs have passcd KId\": \"I haven't had any experience mn since 1 wrote te this page, but still I arn the tbings you write about, but I don't not losing interest in it. On the contrary, believe it's so, suyway.\" And 80 it 15 1 take a great deal of pleasure eut of read- witb us ail in the high echool days. The ing the letters every month. Some of the future la a golden country where ail is readers have appreciated îny other letters, pure sud noble sud true. Life te us then and I feel encouraged te w-rite again. is \"one grand, sweet song, and our ideals Nearly ail who write te the Cerrespon- sud ambitions reacbh le clouds. It lis dence Page have semething te say about well that it is se, for ail tee soon must the cither cf our three subjects, wbich are dreame of these golden days give place te \"Weman's Suffrage,'Y\"I\"l marriage A the realisation that real actual 111e cannot Failure?\" and \"What is Love?\" I gave be brought up te this ideal cf youth. But, yoiino h is oetm gP in he eatim, i i no wel or s, hoit as not necessary te say any more. A s have seen the golden dreams of our acheel te the second, 1 think our married friends days fade, te Just bint now and then te sheuld handie this subject-it is more in the boys sud girls that life holds bard- their line, and we might benefit by thcir shipssud \"things are net what theyexrine Some time age we had a fine seem.\" letter fromn \"Sunset Bill\" and in it he ex- But back te tbe question of love. We plained, according te bis views, the mys- read, for instance, \"Evangeline,\" and take tcry of \"What Is Love?\" The lady writ- that as a measure for a il cases, when, in ers seem vcry rnuch opposed te bis ideas. ladt, it la perhaps enly twe persons in a 1 rather think myself that love is senie- thousand who are capable of such a de- tbing mere than a sweet and. passing gree cf devotion. We read extravagant fancy, but 1 would rather ]cave tbis nattcr fiction. The hero baces bis true love and aise to the more experienced unes. Hom- mourns ber loss the rest of his life, when in ever, 1 wili say this mucb, witbeut fear cf nine hundred and ninety-nine cases eut Of contradiction, that it is one tbing to bc a theusand, if bie la normal and beait hy, rcally and truly in love, and quite another hie will mate again and live a fairly happy thing te bc mereiy \"rnashed,\" yet I believe life. In this age of intellectual advancc- that many people mistake the ene for the ment, we have cerne te use our judgment other. in everything else but love making and If w-e were te introduce a new- subjeet, I choosing a lile mate. That we stili leave would suggcst \"Patriotisrn.\" Lt is a very te caprice and instinct, with what resuIts9 comnmen word at present, and everycne w-e bave only te, look at the divorce records cani sav semething about it. I bave read in the States. I. would net reduce love- prose and poetry lately which beld the makinç and marriage te a strictiy business soîdlierast.hetrutepatr-iot,,and put reproach proposition by any iflears, but what 1 on those who werc not soldiers. Se I arn would like te sec as serne s:ine instruction lest going to say a fem, tbings in defencc cf -_l1 c latter. The seldier is very much in No child -hould l'e alhiu ed Io tlffcr atule public eye at present. M-epraise our l'our from wornis when 1,ot' icfCl soldier ho.ys foi, their patriotism, me sing got in a simple but strong reniedy' Mtersoflgs aho,ît thern, we call them berces, wc Graves' 'Worm Extermiinatur. are proý- cf thexi, and\u003c justiv se. They *1~ 46",
         "l Winnipeg, Feb., M91 The Western Home monthly 1te pros- ler their b, whether r it laut nat drCw- D for these en quite a n of the virnced nre jumnp iflt( 4f passion 1Lby judg- Bd you of clear, truly, miSet Bill. Ust, 1914. %kng The e months. er that la 1 My three lhem ta a It might per, aud I ver regret Lh a lot Of L Will par- n B. C.\"1 e wouncn se, and if e me, niy f onthly a ew Year, 'ony Boy. 19, 1914. criber ta Swish tu ir maga- i must be be lonely rrespon- e eorres- bat page Wed four îthly.. t I wan.t ,read its icription ieet. MonthIy M'AN ~r ery ini this tm fwx wuld not try to takbufroI ae a hato of being a soder,bu1 soByta tradesmenh professioflal men, farmers, etc., and their wves and .daughters are very necessary ail the time, althouglâjhe papers mnay say nothin about them; they may neyer be caled liroS, but ther' may be true patriotE just the same. contend that the man who stays at home and cares for those dependent on him, or the man who Providee for and ream a family to be useful d iiidltrious citizens is d\u0026ùngbis country as great a service as the man on the firm line;and greater than one that leaves b. failfY toý shift for themSelves. think that this kind of patriotism is just os good as that of the soldier. Hwvr I stll say honor to those who go to fight for our country, and due honor to those who romain at home. When I think of the reams of poetry that will be written ai ter the war, about daring deeds and glorious victories, i fear that that littie poem, \"The Farmer FeeçIs Them Al,\" wiil be lost entirely. 1 hope some one will give their opinion of this subject, or pull my letter Wo pieces --either wiil be interesting. Yourstum Who Wiil Eelp? «Hareblfs P. 0., Sask., Dec. Gath, 1914. Editor Western Home Monthly, .Winnipeg, Man. Dear Editor-We have been constant readers of your estimable paper for the pust year or so, and especially interested in t he Correspondence Column. We read about the awful lonesomeness of some. W~e are bachelors but happily are not troubled very often with the complaint, as wee have lots Wo do, bakring bread, fighting the cat (who ia an awful thief) an dlaying football with the biscuits we make, be- sides viitmng bachelor neighbors, among Corps cannot exist when Holloway's Cora Cure is applied to themn, because it goes tu the root -and kilis the growth. WHO whom is \"Happie Wilie,\" who *-rote ta your coluimu a winter. We would like Wa have soine of the girlsi give us a few hints on washing, as it is a year ago since we wasbed the shack floor,1 and we are havmng to put a new one down. this winter, which we hope takeep dlean.i We feel that it would be ice ta. havei a girl now and then Wa take Wa dancs, card1 parties, etc.--somcone like \"Juat a Girl,\" in November issue. Well it la pretty nearly supper time, sa we wilL have ta get busy and cook.some park and potatoea, after which we usually indulge in a game of cards and a smoke. Should like W see this in print and hope somne of the girls will write. Our address is with the Editor Amateurs Bath. Wh\"chla The Happler? Scandia Sssk., Dec. lSth, 1914. Dear Editr-lt is time for me ta e- new my subseription ta The W. H. M., and at the saine time wiil try and write a f cw limes and sec if it wMi pass the waste basket. 1 have been klnd of busy farm- ing during the summer, but mot too busy ta read The W. H. M. Just nowabache- loi bas more time than momoy, so I can paealf of mytimeinreadingand carres- pdng. I ilk e very much the way The W. H. M . la conducted ail through and I do not raa by the correspomding column, eithe. amsure it bas passed away many lonely moments, for the bachelors as wdl as all its readers. Ths year bas been kind of bard on the scttlers in this district as the crop was a total f allure. But overyome seeme ta have gaod hopesofbetterlucknoxtyearso we are gomng ta try again to raise a crap. I do mot remember of ever reading a letter in the Correspondent Column from a married man or woman-moetly from the Ionely bache. I suppose all married couples are so well pleased and their time ls a sowell taken up that tbey have no time for corresponding, buit 1, for my part, would like tosme aletter in The W. H. M.- from them. We bachebors wou4 like ta hear from those that have hifched NEyER Dr. Cassefl' Tablets, the A1-British Remedy, effect most s The lwo Shades By Louis Dodge Late in the night, when no man saw or heard, Two Shades returned to earth front some far .place, And came together for a ghostly word, Though bands met not, nor face looked into face. \"Mlas, \" complained the first, \"the jears are f ew Since hoesI1dwelt end mingIed arnong men; Tics had 1 many, commades Who ware truc, With whom I had f ul sbire of honore then. \"But now nAoue speaka My name Mn praise or blame; They go their happy waya who shared my lot; I have no fragment lef t of goodly fane- Dead but a day or two, but qixite f argot.\" \"Full fift y years have paaaed ince that I died\"- Thus said the other--.'And my place is kept By one who drearna that I arn by -ber aide, Who wceps to-day as then uhe. touqJy wept. «One speaks my naine when that Iier heart is aore; Hunger is bers a -little tirne ech day; And so she loves me; and foever more. Will love me ais when firet I went away.p up in double harness, and find out how they like it. We, Us. and Ca., have kind off figured on acceptmg a partmer wben the chance cornes, s0 a f ew instructions from those wrho have gone through the Il would be appreciatcd. Here la somt . tW discuas: \"Which ila happier, a marrie or a single man?\" I will sign mySelf - The Village Blacksmith. AU Wgat TmeW. IL M. Olda, Alta., Dec. 13, 1914. Dear Editor-I have juat finishod read- ngthe letters front the readers of The W..H. m. I amn a student of the Oids School of Agriculture, which.I can say is one of the best institutions of its kind that there la. TheW. H. M.comestothaS8chool and there la a kind of a scrap among the bofo thia paper. ()Ïta'or gratintereeft inisucb letters as ,«Estern Girlie\" writes, probabl be- cause I amn an Easterner mysef. i also, as she does,, take great interest inf al kindg -of sports, and 1 think that al young men and women should enter into this sort of pleasure. The very best mem and women of to-day have been in orne way connected witb ports, but at wark or play, always keep this motta in front of yau: \"Play the gaine.\" I would be glad Wo have this letter puib. lishcd and hear fram smre of the chanuimg sportswomn of the East. 1 thlnk \"Sweet Alice\" bas a style that wauld cheer any western homesteader up. Well, I must close, as they are caMlng eupper in the dining hall. Oh, how.I long o the turne whem 1 will be li srne other lihttle ahack on a hornestead. Well, good luck ta everybody, Yours truly Basfl Bingo. 'I wish 1 kncw where ta go this summer.\" \"IYou have been away every summer for years. You ought ta know where you want ta go.\" \"«No; ail Iknow la a lot of places where I don't want Wo go.\"ý-Washington Hcrald. hutibaxd remzeqn- SLEPt eiuar A recent letter from Mr G. Arthur Felton, the man who neyer slept, recails the etory of a culre by Dr. Cassel'a. Tablets, which aroused great interest in Great Britain last year. Here was no ordinary inso na but almoit unwinking wakefulness niglit af ter night, with no hope of relief, till in the end came Dr. Cassell's Tablets, and then blessed rest of natural and refreshing sleep. Now writing from 6, Cipsteau Villas. Chipstead-road, Coulsdôn, EnÉland, Mr. Felton says :-' --I amn delighted to tell von 1 feel very fit-neyer better in my wliole if e.\" The story as originally given was so .extraordinary, the cure so re- iiiarkable, that we feel justified in publishing it again for the benefit of our Ganadian friends, thiat sufferers from sleep- lessîiess and nerve failure may know how wonderful ie the curative power of Dr. Caseell's Tableta. Here is the story:- \"Dr. Cassell's Tablets freed me from the terrible affliction of sleeplessneos and nerve failure,\" said Mr. Felton, \"when nothing could give me even temporarX relief. In 1905, as a resuit of au accident, an operation had to be performed after which I sufiered from neurasthenia, and ultimately ncrve failure. I was taken into a special institution, only to be turned out after months of treat- ment as hopelessly incurable. I had claimed compensation for my accident, and even the Insurance Company declared that 1 should neyer work again. I eould just get about with the greatest difficulty, dragging my right foot along the ~ ground, and my right hand hung hclpless. Then came sleeplessness. Do what 1 could, or take what 1 would, I hardly ever slept night or day. For Ilve years altogethier I never could have slept more thian a few minutes at a tiine, for I heard every hour strike every nighit. Often I wished I could die. Sleeping draughts of opium, and injections of morphine bad no effect whatever-I was always awake. No torture of the inîquisition could equal mine; but somehow 1I1r Atu Mb\" .àlived through it. Relief came at Iast wi th Dr. Cassell's Tablets, and oh I how I grateful I was-how blessed the man who could devise such a remedy! Almost from the flrst dose I improved. I began ta get a little sleep, then ta sleep riglit thirough the night, and that gift of sleep was more to me than al cIse that life ~~ can hold. That was only a year ago, and now 1 amn a strong, healthy man again. Friends tell me it is a modern miracle, and I think it is.\" SEN D FOR A T- 1.§;.- . I\u0026 OUSl __ ___ ___ ___ ___1__ _1__1 FREE BOX. ~'.I5rtO kaIFaiabIstewqt 5'~oIi b'O ablia tbru ,,auU ~ pudS* 't~~oeI~uii as pretaw~.d SMUPAC¶UNEO IV '~~~i'\"S COLTO. M*NCULSTaU on. tm , d IV beler wa;iter or gid-tO vand taa witb anv r iquid as Ot o.2M. a,4c YeI eileCi \"-Strange,\"» aaid the irat, a»d turmid to go, ' 'II waa a father fond, a1 ,\"d who were you, that are bemed so?\" 1111 said the other, «waa M. G. 7-P passcd till I an' ,ontrary, ;of mead- ne of the r letters, c agarn. rreapon- y about hich are niage A I gayv'e Sago, PO ore. A s 1 friends more lu b ythcir EdL fine it he ex- le mys- dy writ- is ideas. is sarne- passing s mnattcr HIom-- t fear c f g to be another beieve for the ibjeet, I s a very veryofle Lve rend eld the eproach o I arn fencc of uch in ais e otir We Sing roes, wC They The absolute authenticit ftefrging e u guaranteed. ant no testimonial is ever pub- lished by the Dr. CasselisCo without f nil personal enquiry as to i ts e. nuineness. Purchasers of Dr. Cassell's Tabiets in this cou.ntry may rest assur ed that they are getting a r eally reliable and tested r eredy for Nervous Breakdown Neurathenla Elidney Trouble D7aepf B Nonoe Faïlure Sieepieanesa Stornach Disorder Wating Infantile Weakness Anaemnia Malnutrition Palpitation and they are specially valuable for nursinq: mothers and young grls anproachîfla motherhood. Al DE uggista and Storekeep er a throughou t t' Dominion seli Dr. Ca\"sell's Tablets3 at 50 cent\u0026. People in outlying districts should koep Dr. Cassella Tablets by themi n case of emetgency. A free sample box will bernent you on reeeipt of 5 cents, for mnailing and packing, by the sole agents for Canada, H. F. Ritch!e and Co., 10, McCaul- street, Toronto, Ont. Dr. Cas- sell's Tablets are manufactured solely by Dr. Casseil's Co. Ltd., Manchester, Englsud. kL 1 rg e- à",
         "TeWoetes\"ia Noms Mdonthly Winnpeg, Feb., 19,15 Thé.unwe'.ulu.ttutes f or \u0026d By Thoiaa Boyd if we relnethaber ýthat in \"ie household *e ane making by oui own examples tite veq, t f veice,ý look and manuer of t\u0026 l\"Màkii en\u003e o dalr take ourselves te ta o ivlnq-way ln the pasIte lie- àaplyý-fken word, the irritated IoQo, 4nd the- utuned voie. Wheu vo rel»sethat îlb. ehildren's spirite are but the maore ruffied and ther nerves cbafèa'by uscoling\u003e\" ve sh*hl eel that hia abit merits our poor opinion, an'! wiii veleous. amy substitues that tuay prove effective and have fewer M) re- site. That which vo ail recognize as \"ac0di»i.net s* much In athe verdî as iribèmainer, perhap.. Beftjdei th* ceunis against it givea above. there la thie te say that il does net se, rmpieb its purpose. It arouse the combative. us ef f, thechild, put. it on thae defen-- siv.. Autherity, decision, eau b. shevu aS veR!, and better, if the parent ie en- tfrnly eomposed or seemu to b. no. .T!Kbswn of Daniel Webster said bis father'. habit witk hlm in his bybood vas-tbo tand him betweea tb. paternal knees, geutly aud flrrly cla.p hlm by the arme, and thon look aI hlin long asud sor- rowfly, without speaking, anct vithout î»Oer. Ho said these mournful looks. nover failed of effect. Net many parents eau brang te boar upea their erring hil- dm oueiLa face snd suchk oye. au:niel Webster; but his method might often vork vella spite ef that fact. Christ bimluef ouly looked reproachfully on Peter wben la the hall, aftr the arrest, that'disciple hai denied hiai; yst Peter veut eut and wept bitteriy on account 91 hi. weakaes sud dieloyaity. Gentle and entireiy self-centrolled lslk with-tbe child about hie mieconduet can- mot veil fail te influence il. A manawr and! voicesaise that manif est the love and benevolence thait the mother feel' wlpài, whuRe au irritated method hides the #q$pd intention. -A few decided word., gently üttered, and prompt action iu tbe vay of prepor-E ilenale sud uecesssry punisbmeul are the Mting u*tàed and remedy. The cbild vil readfily diecera if th. parentse mid 14 clearly made up and ber wiii resolute \"e te 'te course ef action. Noue ef us viebes te b. piclured in thet inomeries of our childron hereatter as8 l!aving been -petulant or irscible or lscking in self-control The scolding mauner cornes periloualy near te givingr uupleasant photographe te romain for the years te come4l h eA e1aml gvrument cau béfeached witheut nuch smaging impressions. Soîfpoise, serene ooka, calm, decisive worde are best. Guarding Against Envy By Calvin Diii Wilson It je a sornewhat difficuit tank to guide childiren into due aspiration and ambition for achievernent and accornplishment, and y.t keep them free from ugly and in- jurions envy of those who already have what they are yet striving after. Yet it je neceseary for their well-being and happinese and beet success that they Iearn the distinction and keep it con- stantly in mind. They should have it made plain to them that while aspira- tion is nobleand essential, envy is wrong and harrnful. The fact that serneone else pesesses cultivation or education '~does flot detraet from another's chances of gaining the lixe. They bave no nîonopoly of these attainments; they have not exhausted them or worn thern out. *They are open to ail who will pay the price of persistent effort. In such matters as goed looks, if one inds himself or herseif excelled, the offly thing to do is to niake up by other Clean Stomach, Cicar Mind.-The stomach is the worksbop of the vital functions and when it gets out of order the whiole svstem i clogs in sympathy. The spirits flag, the mind droops and work beconies impossible. The first care should be to restore healthful action of the stomach and the best prepara- tdon for that purpose îs Parmelees Vegetahie Pillo. Generai use for years has won theni a leading pface in medicine. A trial wil atteat their value. Iqualitle* for lhe jack of beauly. A flue manner, voice, brlgt taik, the gif t e1 song and ether Queh attaigment~et talents et teu Make the les anduonme people more attractive and winuing thanI those Who have uothjng but good loQks. It i. se vitIa fine cIltee. Tcadi h. childrca tbat if pthcrs are more elegantly clad titan tbeinselves, they may stîli make up gmong Iheir companions by graefieoq good nature, SUIl14iigaines or 'otier like iatters. 'The leader# amongchidreu. and Young people are net even usually the uaerely pretty uer tbe eues wbo think mont ef cloîbea. In auy tase, impies. the child Ihat lb. wsy la open for hm or ber te attain sornet1hing qit. au desirable as others bave, even iti la net lbe sa ineêi Dwl upon- the barm. of .euvy, thst il $poils ILe disposition, gives an ugly ex- pression le th. face, causes bitter feel- ange sud sharp words. More than tbats, vo should repeice lu the fâne qualities and talents et Ur friends. i hoe vise Goethe bias said, _'There isne defense aginst superiority except to love il.\"? TRiat in, if eut frieuds are superier. sud vo admire ad love thein vs are ideu- tifled vith them. nd suaa their good fortune. If ve love âine qualibies, the sprit et enyy vaniahes. Train the çLl in tbis better spirit. Aise, tbe ebild ebouid know Ibat envy binders bise wn chances ef gainiqg the vcry thinge vhieh lie admires in anollier. While ho is allowing himseolf le be filledt wilb ugly feeiiugi, hlis ncnglcctîng hie opportunilies te train himaeof and fur- ther bimself. Stories aud Effecta By Elizabeth L Adamns Whon a certain teddlekins had te ho srnused, ber mothor would take her ou ber lap snd 'holding a child's illustrated book, vould tll a very simple littho story frein a picture or twe. Sornelime sbe veuld repoat eue story word for word, five, ye. ton times, befere baby wonld show any sign et fatigue. Peint. ing te the objecte in the picture she wouhd eay, \"Sec, bore is a littho boy, sud Le bas a face sud Ivo bandesuad lwo foot, sud ho vears s bat and valet snd trousers and sîtees, and ho bas a little dog. Hoe sys te the dog, Corne on,, Rover, lot'. mun. Rover sys, 'Bow-wow, bow-vov,' sud away lhey run dowu the walk te the street. The boy laugb suna sys, 'Ta, ha! that's fun! Let'e run again!' Boy bas fun, dog bas fun\" Or, it would bc, \"flore ie Susie wilIa ber dlean drese on and cdean sboes. She bas s daily snd s littIe carrnage. She sys, Now, dohhy, I will take yen for a ride on the sinoolb valk under îLe shady Iree.' Dolly site very etili snd Susiewheels ber carriage along. Susie soos a atone in the way, but ene doon net lot tbe carniage go over il, becanse she does net vaut eo burt dolly, or lot ber faleut.\" The another tok great came Ihat ail :he chuldren in the pictures vere geod bhildren, did kind things, and yeb had good limes, pienby et fun. One ot the resulte efthis sort et story. telling vas that lte child lesmned te aee wbat vas ia a picturo. She wouid bouch bat sud foot sud parasol with ber lithoe lunger. On receiving a nov picture site would look at it intentiy sud point te srnetbing familiar. Oftea she would it on lte floot snd etudy ber pictures, and, as sIte learned te baik, namne many f the objecta portrayed. Whea she went ut with ber mother she was very oh- serving, would point to objecte sncb as ad been peinted out le ber sud nsmed in pictures. Aise, more than once, she as diecovered lmying to set ont lthe ýtories sbcho La-d about doil or kitten, )r the vslk dowa street. t t, t: fi m si s oi s( ir st 01 The Dospotism et the Juniors T wonder why il o 5 often forget that the oIder children are as ntich ho ho con- qidcred sud as carefully guardc\"i as the little ones who are, net very far trnm boyiîood? Vaur boy of twelî-e or four-- Woman and theflime Business Melhods ia Kcoping Accounts How te Keep Books that vil Show Where the Mouey Goes By Doris Richards LTwo things are le ho gaiued by keep- ig close acceunîs. One ie, that ee keeps eut ot deb, aud the ether ie, that one bas greater oomfort on the same in- corne, tor lhe purcbaeing power of rnoney bocomes a knovu. quantity, and there are a bundred lbings about saving or planning wiseiy that come under con- sideration, which are nover noticed un- lese the searchigbt et a cash payrnent je burned upon tiaom. The populamiby et the telephone je ne- sponsîble for some carelessiiess on the part ef housewives in daiiy manage- ment of accounte, but this convenience need net heoene's undoing if care is exor- cised. Whobbem you shop by telephone on go le, market, inqiaire te price or articles Ihat day. A store-keeper mas- be perfecthy houest, but ho may havýe more than eue grade of goods or more tItan one sized package of the sanie ar- ticle, sud yen may bo given the most oxponsive or the largest article, when bbc smaller would bo sufficient. It is bether bo do cnes marketing bv carefaîl section. foaîsekccipcrs living in a city can etten sale 1)» watching adcrtiscmnns for special siles, and here1 -loch Chandier fHarris. flic anthor cf \"lIttle tj(fliti.;, Wavis at biis desk cite Tigltt w-len an old -tie reporter loclsed over a ni sa id: .joe,Iliow (0dolspel1 wii'o waýt-st)o g'fe tic e hrt ci-en a cii 111011 e- N .-i f 3101are ,,goiîg te tise anv. Billr IgîeS n igtasviVg th li iu (M u iti a .''P A Fi - - . - - -- -- lý- tee ta'diwlu a ~apthat muet b. ta4en Intc, sco e b.next day. He 18 ri 'ln a Raisn that requirn. close attïwti.a. Ni Io wrltlng hie. theme, and la net fhdlng th. tank etsy. Along comnes th. littie brother. 'e tries. b cllmb upon the big br 'other\u003e. knee, heosnatches a pen-' cl, and makes a mark upon the map, or ho insiste Ùpoâ intcrrupting the home woik of the older lad- by little foraya and dashes and requesta for. a storr, lun- t111 the patience of the older boy is ex- hausted. Repeated efforts te, send the l1111e one away provlng futile, there ia ftally a scene and a skirnlish, rough words are'spoken and the, arnaler child begins te ery -and goen wiLfl a grievance to bie mother. Three ltimes out of four the mother catches oup the little one, kiases and hugs him and reproves ber older chjld for hie III behavior.. He bas not behaved iii, and his e t to do bis work la pesoe bas been invaded, but for him. there is no sympathy. 1A girl of ten. or twolve je generally willing and happy to ssiet inu-the care of the younger once ini the- fsrily. She lielpa them te dre suad undrese, devotes a sood deidloft ime te thein, and is lber mother's affectionate aid in their up- bringing. It i.nflot te be expected that she \u0026all invarisbly wish te take the littie Ruth or Jimmie with her every. where on walks end* rambles, and it je rigbt that ahe should have sorne time te, osil ber o\"n and b. at peaco when talking with ber clasemates and other friends of ber own age. The little chul- dren do not meau te be tyrannical, and would net be if tlîey-were not givon to inderetand that every one muet yioid to thom the instant they appear. Af ter a wbile, if other babie arrive and thoy are depoued frei.nosvereignty, tbey arc sonietimes very mucb .urpried. 1TVere i. almoet ne downfall in the course of human life soecomplete and audden as tbat which takes place when a Pew baby scends tho tbrone. The older cbild, hitherto -reigning undisputed, ooks amaziùîgly large in cem 1par isen ivith the wee -bundie in tbe nurse's arme, and ie at once liftcd out of the resun of infaney imb ttat of maturer life. It requiros on the part ef parent. a great [cal of tact and forethouglit te adjust the places of the cbildreu as they sbould bc. Often, indeed, tbe bcginuing ef yranny jsesetablisbed when the claims of the tinicet one are set in tbe fore- ground, and the preceding children are a uit ncglected. In the ideai home a system of mutual belpfulnes\u0026 reaching around the :c, binds Lbe housebeld together in perfect armony. The litle once\u0026bave an un- doubted dlaim on the careeses, the care rn the loving protection ot those who axe eider. This being admitted, it is for the parents to sese that the eider ones Ilso are immune from interruption 'thjat indor lhem froin proceeding with the work that they are daily obliged to do. The Grandmother By James Oppenheini. The glory ef ber face still hives witb usg, The glory of ber heart works ini eur hearte, The glory ef her Seul is warînlh of Sun,.- And iight of Sun, and in ber holy presence Hushed are oîar wild world hcnrts with pouring Ponce! Ah, golden dsys, ah, inelloîv lnd\"an Summer, Ah, golden Aubumn of the vear of Man- The das are bers, the golden days are bers! She has known Lite; ebe bas knowu earliest dreames Of wtandering cbildhood, earliesf girl- bood dreams, Eariiest womsniy love; tlie pasi\u003ei of the Moîber; The burden of the Maker of bhe H.oiie; The pange of Birth; the qiiceksand clutch et Deabh- Wife, woman, toiler, mnother, guiardian, nurse- 0 lowly sugel oetbhree generations! She bas gone lhrough it ail; ail dreains ive know, Ali pangs we seek to tear from ouir tru bearts, Ali joys that tbrili us, ail îvild heurs of grief, Ali folly, wisdom, ai hat makes up if e, Ras she gone lhrough-gone bbrough unknown to Fame, Jnbonored, unapplauded. rnek and pure, And le, now she emerges from bte Fight, The Smeke sud Thunder andi the Noise of Lite, Radiant, meliewed, and the golden davs1 Are bers; the golden Autumu days ar2 hers! Tnvexed by brawling problenis of tie liour Fer very glance selves ail; -h- bringtjt us \u0026sweet solution et the Life on Eartlî, ca, tender bouches of eternal Cod. Çoh preached ini words. but i-n iiiing froin lier soul s1 Autumnn bsze' in tbe gold.en Iiidian ilIs thirough the woodlaîids, andi the Worl1d is lost. the telephone may prove an assel, for one may telephone te several shops, te iflnd where one oan buy to the boit ad- vantage that day, goods te be sent C.0. D. The charge accotait prevenuls te a large degree, this. liberty of seleclion. But sorne vomon may 6ay: \"This le ail about bow te koep out et debt, but I began wrong. f arn in debt, sud cannot sec lighit ahesd, whàt shahl I do?\" Do net despair, but begin the reform st one. There are two wsys. Start paying casha for everything.. Save on the daily oxpenses in every possible wsy. At the end of the -week or -menlb, wbcn. over one's allowsnce cornes in, psy wbat can hoe pared on the old buile. Ihis way the debte will creo.p downaleowly but eurely, aud there wili ho keen inleret iu praclising the necesssry economies. The second plan ie the sarne, without the admission te the etore-keepers that the charge account bas stoppod. Psy eomelhing on account, on esch bill at the end of the month, taking care tbat there je a certain 8um paid, ever and above Ihat month's expeuditure. Exorcise overy care. cut down every possible luxur3,. Calculate a good apportionment of the rnonthly income as it is, net as yen hope it will be,' counting in a certain sum to- yards the debte. When one ie free again t-Ah, by thiat lime the lesson is learned, as te wbat Business System in keeping aceunts really means, and bow it. can make for a fsmily's happiness.",
         "Feb., 19,15 2 asset, for ILI ahop, te 1he best ad- to be sent :S to a large Lion. ': \"iThis 18 debt, but I and cannot do?\"p the reform Ys. Starf Save on issible way. inth, when. t. pay what 's. In this 8 l0wly but en interest coOfomies. ie, without eepers that 3ed. Pay bill at the that there and above -rcise every bie Iuxury. eut of the 8 you hope In sum to- ,h, by tlîat s to wliat accounts make for Another Great Premium for the Ho me- mu~, 6 Knives 6 Forks 6 Tea Spoons 6 Dessrt Spoons 2 Table Spoons 1 Butter Knife 1 Sugar Spoon 6 Knives 6 Forks 6 Tea sSns 6 Dessrt Spoons 2 Table Spoons 1 Butter Knif e 1 Sugar Spoon P£ER eu aio er 7t- YCII e r r \u0026 er set, which met witli such rm ak ble moem T ii. ms e u\" of .28 p ce.sd eaCh a\" i s a prod uciof1 l e w 4bnow m [j Wil ra : oeCopany, and guaramteed by thew-it s the. but known paftter.of Table Silver inCada. enbeSsed laradèsgup. Cempe\"ta au. ervsi fsSmppla, W. aunicipate au ezcepbiooeally heavy demnand for ibis predm, aisourge outr eadesa to eamt rickiz u sa J aluascp\"i Remember we psy aul chares. and the utioey wail bie mi imnue\u0026i*ey on recopiao yone order. v WE'E MILIODUR NEW SPRINO OATALOOUE If you doWtt receive your copy -by February 15 write us and we will sec that you get it by returfi mail. We want you to have this catalogue because it is a good deal bigger, and a good deal better, than cîther of the two wel have already issued. Not only are our illustrations better but our values also are better-the, best obtainable, we believe, in Canada. 'the reason is that being a purely catalogue house we can, do business for a good less money than city retail stores that have to pay high renta and equip with costly fixtures. That means tliat we can do bus- iess on a very narrow margin of profit, and ojir prices rellect the economy of our business system. WE ARE ALSO GIVING PROMPT SERVICE In almost every case goods are. shipped within 24 hours from the time the order is receive d.' During our sale we were flot able to do this because the amount of business that came to us over- whelmed us; and though we largely increased our staff of helpers -from 50 to 265; and though we worked night and day we could not keep up to the business that was coming to us. However we have increased our warehouse space by 50. per cent, and we are'now giving-and will continue. to give-ur reg- ular 24 hour service. Test us with an order; if you have neyer dealt with us before we want you to acquaint yourself with our service and our values; and if you have deait with us,'and happened unfortunately to be among those w ho were disappointed during our sale we want you to give us an opportunityr of showing you the kind of servic~e we give when conditions are normal. If you happn e. .bu , In.lnip.g \u003ckwe ln i.B.nspdor et sO Um tErne w ushll e hpleausi te ha»e ou o«Il te ue m CI-RISTIE GRANTrCO*' LIITicD. CATNADA lit110PRINOESS STREETI ýs with iw, ka il, our th of Sun,.,-- ber holy ,ýrts with w Ind\"an ypar of days are qs known liest girl- assiorî of e Homile; nid cluteh gllar(lian, Àions! Il dreains i our torn libours of nakes up through and pure, lie Fighit. blie Noise den davs- days ar2 s of t'le hrings t9 Eartlî, Cod. ing frein ri Indian and the tiior of sk euee r looked o11 speii Ifv wo\" Remwus 1 a coiti 'y to uise well g-O ý il",
         "n"
      ],
